However, enforcing the fiduciary duty inevitably militates against selling land at below-market rates.
However, my love would never disown his own daughter because his spouse told him to.
With this amazing creation, congratulations Annette, gorgeous stamping, stunning project.
Users and customers of Scribd will now be able to transform loaded files into printed magazines (Magcloud), books (Blurb) and office documents (Mimeo). It will also allow purchasers of ebooks the option of having a physically printed book from the Scribe online store. The move is particularly aimed at tapping into the ebook and print book market by allowing publishers listed on Scribd to sell physical books alongside the ebook version with the potential of combining sales of both. Publishers will have the ability to switch on or off the availability of either versions.
I love this picture. It is so rare that the 6 of us are together in one place at the same time. But this picture is deceptive. It is an oxymoron. Everything about this picture is wrong. This was the day of Momo's (our Grandfather) funeral. The worst day of my life to date. None of us wore black because Momo wouldn't have liked that. The sun was shining and the palm trees were swaying because Nani and Momo live on the beach. We were smiling and laughing because it took about 20 takes to get a decent picture. We wanted to give this picture to Nani at a later date, hoping to make her smile because we knew she was sad.
“Will that work?”
by: Joelle Charbonneau
Yours on the cusp of summer – Lenore
Over the last few weeks I have seen their relationship blossom, RB has been taking much more interest in her daddy, he has been feeding her and giving her her bottles, giving her baths and playing with her and its made me so happy to see this. Pop Princess has been full of beans and making her daddy read 'just one more book' every night before bed.
Luckie’s Mild was almost completely flat, but had a solidly old-fashioned, chewy flavour to it. Kernel’s Export Stout, good though it is, struggled to live up to the massive hype it’s received. It’s packed with roastiness, acidity and sweetness, but I can’t help thinking it might be more drinkable with all three rolled back a tad.
Heffer then places the ball in front of the posts, runs up and kicks… “What most annoyed me about Little George, though, was the despairing way in which I heard him announce on Radio 4 on Wednesday that “we” would have to “get” the salaries of bankers “down”. I concede that a couple of banks are largely owned by the taxpayer. However, most aren’t: and none totally is. So why does George feel it is his place, like some member of the Socialist Workers’ Party, to call for bankers to be paid less? Since when was the Conservative Party, should it win power, planning to Sovietise our economy in a fashion that would allow it to control bankers’ pay? And even if it were, what does it think this idiotic and unpleasantly illiberal move would achieve?
4. Memoir writing is an on-going process. We learned that we’re always writing memoirs, and I suppose that’s just because life is always going on until we die. And anything that happens to us might be important in the future; we just don’t know it till we get there.
I have not thus far dealt with Christmas any other way except to purchase gifts for my son...I had not even gathered my child's Christmas list until yesterday. I struggled to get into the "Christmas Spirit" and get to it.
As Imseng dryly observes, “by using self-deprecation and irony – traditional elements of Yiddish humor, DDB sold Hitler’s car by making it Jewish.”
This leaf may need some blocking.
I have been uber-fortunate to know so many interesting people during my life. This is a post written by a high school friend I lost touch with for almost 16 years. We reconnected through Facebook. I think we’re better friends now than we ever were. He works for a local news station in Phoenix…Enjoy!
Wifi SD- The ability to transfer data from a camera to a computer without the hassle of opening the port, taking the card out the camera and putting it in the computer will save me so much time and trouble. There's been times where I've accidentally locked it in the physical transfer and been stymied for a bit. That wouldn't happen here. I'm sure there's a hassle in there somewhere, but I'm liking this idea.
I liked the first Howling movie, but I won’t say I was blown away by it. To be honest I have a perverse love of Howling 6: The Freaks. But who wouldn’t like a movie with vampires and werewolves (I’m ignoring you Twilight). But the reason I bring this up is I’m not precious about the series, and I am not against a remake or rebirth if you will, as long as the movie is good. Sadly what we have here is something that is just horrid. Normally in my reviews I try to be fair, and highlight some of the positives in the movie. This is going to be a bloody hard review to do. With that let’s get Kraken (Yes I know) and put a silver bullet in this bastard.
England has so few fundamentalists that they do not make one jot of difference.
DINGGGG DOOONNGGGG…..
It wasn’t always this way, but I have a bit of a soft spot for Abou Diaby. When he’s got the ball it looks like he’s made of superior stuff to those battling in vain to get it off him. It’s not just his height, his whole shape his different. Lithe yet sturdy. And seriously, has anyone noticed the freakishly long distance between his ankle and knee?
Of course, my pictures are not old enough to be considered Sepia, so I spent over an hour trying to find old photos of the building online. I had no idea that this would be so hard to do! I finally found these four that were on the McPherson Public Library site, and felt fortunate to have even successfully completed that mission. It really did surprise me that such a fantastic old building doesn't have more photos on the internet.
In other news: this is good ... apparently Ladbrokes are offering a bet on Andrew Dismore beating Coleman in the GLA election, odds 6-4.
But what happens if you come back later and want to add MORE of a similar element but cannot remember what folder you first pulled it from? Or you want to find the matching paper, but again, don't know the name of the set, so you don't know where to look. This is what happened to me . . . when I wanted to find other tags with snowflakes from the same set as the one in the lower left of the page I am showing here, I could not remember WHERE I pulled it from!
As I was writing yesterday's post about the non-identifying information I received from the adoption agency, I began to think about something that happened a lot when I was a child.
There are one or two more line edit posts I want to do and possibly a copyedit post. They'll be scattered over the month because of work, moving and the aforementioned fun things, but they are still in the schedule. So if you have any unanswered questions about edits, it's a good time to leave them in the comment thread.
We boys, unwound; sitting south, with boredom
would be a big seller during our tourism season. Creative minds must think alike as evREwares was in the process of producing their line of “Big Guy Ties” and thought my idea of “Alaska Formal” ties for our market was a good one and bought the idea! I designed 6 different “Alaska Formal” themed ties including the iconic “Blue Tarp” tie, duct tape, fur, salmon skin, lumberjack, and my favorite the fishing lure tie! The ties are ready and orders are rolling in for evREwares. It’s fun to actually see Derek’s old blue tarp and favorite fishing flies and lures become immortal on the “Alaska Formal” Sticky Ties!
Americans on the right side of the political aisle will continue to take the stance of pro-life, by enacting this legislation in an election year this issue was always going to be contentious for the Obama administration.
Not only does Europe utilize vehicles a quarter of the size of the ones in America. Not only does Europe promote a friendly alternative to gasoline. Now we have a miniature vehicle, that runs on electricity, that is also part of a car sharing program. Talk about the ultimate car pool (figuratively, not literally, I mean how many people can you really fit into these things).
All in all, coming up with this plan and determining the better way to do it- took me the afternoon.
Is this whole thing less than ideal? Of course but everything is going to be less than ideal when you have deal with a Democratic Senate that simply refuses to pass a budget framework and a leftist in the White House. We’re simply not going to get fiscally sound polices in the current environment. The only solution to this is get them the hell out of there.
But I caught the happiness anyways.
Nor the Sodomites
I do not think that the Irish brewers touch sugar at all; it certainly would not answer for the special kind of beer produced by the one firm that exports alone 350,000 barrels a year, and I hold that, as this export does not represent tied trade in any sense, it practically means perfect system of production. In main, I have pointed out the principle on which such production depends, while there is no doubt that, theoretically speaking, it is both interesting and instructive.
With Mr. Desai riding high on his hobby-horse, I changed tack to ask him with a subdued tone, “What is your vision of India?” With disarming frankness he replied, “I don’t know whether we will be able to retrieve our lost glory but there is no denying that the country has a bright future. Never judge the fate of a country by its politicians. The people of India are greater than the greatest of politicians.”
Add food coloring
But this week my mummy brain has failed me. I thought I ordered four brushed potatoes. Just the four individual potatoes.
What about you? Do you hope? Or do you tell Hope to shut-up before she even finishes her sentence? Do you even believe in Hope? What is she to you? What do you wish about your relationship with and connection to Hope? A place to begin – you can hope to start wanting, intending to hope.
I want to thank the lovely people over at C&C for giving me permission to do this tutorial.
Listed below are some advantages and disadvantages of forex day trading:
The difference being:
Heck, even I was a bit taken with the ad.
Thanks for stopping by, please take a moment to follow my new blog and to increase your chances of winning blog candy you will want to leave comments on all bloggers' posts.
5. Fluff quinoa with fork and add to bean mixture. Season with salt and pepper. Add lime juice and zest; toss to combine. Top each serving with avocado pieces and dressing.
system. You attorneys are harming life on the entire planet, and you
Churchill was aware that religions compete with one another for power and territory and he knew the truth of slavery. In !The River War:” The stronger race soon began to prey upon the simple aboriginals... But all, without exception were hunters of men. To the great slave-market at Jeddah a continual stream of Negro captives has flowed for hundreds of years ... The dominant race of Arab invaders was unceasingly spreading its blood, religion, customs, and language among the black aboriginal population, and at the same time it harried and enslaved them” and, "Individual Moslems may show splendid qualities, but the influence of the religion paralyses the social development of those who follow it. (1)
Hop to some spring fantasy with 2 bows, 2 frames, 2 magic mushrooms, 2 ribbons, 1 banner ribbon, 1 butterfly, 1 candy heart border, 1 candy heart, 1 candy kiss, 1 cattail, 1 crown, 1 fairy dust, 1 fairy moon, 1 flower candle, 1 forget me not, 1 frog prince, 1 grass, 1 happy frog, 1 heart chain, 1 heart scroll, 1 heart shaped box, 1 heart tree, 1 kissy lips, 1 lipstick, 1 lotus flower, 1 love bug, 1 owl couple, 1 paper heart chain, 1 rose, 1 splash, 1 swan, 1 tag, 1 trumpet, 1 unicorn, 1 valentine rings, and 1 water lily.
My family doesn’t even have a belligerent old auntie to talk about. I used to be embarrassed to take friends home for tea. The sheer normalcy of life in our house seemed wrong. No drunken rows, no criminal records. Not even a weird birthmark between us. It wasn’t shame I felt exactly, more a sense of exclusion. Myriad missed opportunities to share in knowing smirks and head-nods when conversations about family came up. Our level of normal wasn’t normal at all.
The next bout of legal proceedings came in December 2010 when a temporary, followed by a permanent injunction. Jesus Romero filed a counter injunction. Then she filed for divorce and moved out.
So this is
But let’s start when he was eleven. In the pantry one day he innocently asks Mina, their nurse, who he describes as “the mildest and kindest and probably the weakest woman in the world,” and La, his mother’s cousin who happens to be there at the time, about Mrs Carnoustie’s legs; he had heard mentioned that she was deformed. And it wasn’t only her legs; no. La explains:
Not caring I’m left in tears
Link back to this post, because it will eventually become the "Ninjex" of the 2011 Nine Days of the Ninja. And let me know if you do want to participate. I will link to your blog and let the world know.
Salon 94 (here): Liz Cohen (1 set of 150, 1 diptych), David Benjamin Sherry (7), Carlo Mollino (39 Polaroids), Lorna Simpson (19 collages). While still life images of tools have been done before many times, I liked both the choice of smaller individual scale and the wall-filling volume of this typology; it was priced at $72000.
making statements
Keep your values positive because your values become your destiny.
Suntory 22.6%
When I finally found the confidence to write I began with a graphic, I drew a timeline. At the beginning and end, I noted Bill’s birth and death dates. Then I plotted the events of his life based upon initial internet research. That’s where the challenges in telling Bill’s story began.
PRIZES & SURPRISES & A CHALLENGE!!
Here are some SNSD videos I like a lot. It’s encouraged to watch the videos and spot the names of the girls. Try it, it’s fun! : D
Poor Tom
I had a nice, eloquent “Trans 101″ post planned out for today. The problem? I can’t get my computer to a good, working state so I can write it. Yesterday, I started on a mission to replace my macbook’s operating system; I’m tired of Lion and also of all the new philosophical trends it and Apple are espousing.
Sisters and Brothers, your Chocolate Priestess has an amazing opportunity to do a very high profile interview with one of the stars of The Food Network. I'm sure many of you watch this cable challenge and I'm betting many of you have seen Claire Robinson's show 5 Ingredient Fix or the show she hosts called Food Network Challenge. DOVE Chocolate offered me the opportunity to conduct an interview with Ms Robinson that you need to watch below. Watch it all because at the end, I'm going to ask a question and anyone who leaves a comment with the correct answer will be entered into a random drawing for a gift basket of DOVE chocolate which I'll also discuss below the interview.
On 1st October, a week after R leaves, H becomes ill with a high fever. Her lover, B, has never been what you'd call gregarious, but is now becoming more and more withdrawn. The two of them retreat to their room, emerging rarely. Over a week later, H is still ill. N and I are sponging her off and are alarmed to see the sweat is literally spurting from every pore. It's clear she is seriously ill with something that isn't going to just run its course and be shaken off.
Re: Strep B, I was dismayed when told I would need to be on a drip during labour, but actually it was only for half an hour, so anyone worried about that shouldn't be. The info you get in advance is confusing but the drip doesn't take four hours as everyone seemed to be saying, the antibiotics last for four hours and then you get some more.
On animal farm
Chiron has been a popular figure in both art and literature, and pops up in a number of modern works. John Updike’s “The Centaur” is based on the life of Chiron, and Chiron also features in Elizabeth Cook’s novel “Achilles.” He is a character in the Percy Jackson series, and I like to think that the Classics-loving J. K. Rowling was inspired by Chiron in her portrait of the wise centaurs (Firenze especially) in the “Harry Potter” series. Chiron even appears in astronomy and astrology, immortalized as the constellation Sagittarius.
We might ask ourselves why we put ourselves through the mission of dating people, only to break up again. Fact is, I don’t date.
This was an actual conversation during my supper fun dating seasons. The next guy couldn’t figure out why I stopped him every time he tried to grope me. “No seriously, my breasts are off limits. (As he reached for me again) Am I stuttering here?”
EW: Does this mean publicity in today’s marketplace is irrelevant?
Danny A. Correa-Gutierrez, 25, Fairview, N.J.
She denied she got the story through ‘subterfuge’ but conceded there had been a payment made, she added, to a charity.
Doin’ what I did again,
“The standard of living must level off,” said McGinnis, a lecturer with Al Gore’s Climate Reality Project. “This country consumes five Earths, while India consumes one-tenth of an Earth.” An “Earth,” he explained, is the level of human consumption that can be sustained by a population year-to-year.
A president’s likeability is much overrated. Hoover may have been unliked, but the same can’t be said about incumbent losers Ford, Carter, and George H. Bush. Those presidents lost their re-elections because voters perceived them as unsuccessful in their jobs. Most voters would have gladly sat down over beers with any of those three men.
Hays Baker and his wife Lizbeth possess super-human strength, extraordinary intelligence, stunning looks, a sex life to die for, and two beautiful children. Of course they do--they're Elites, endowed at birth with the very best that the world can offer. The only problem in their perfect world: humans and their toys!
Every so often you spend a few days with you nan. That gives me a break to do some of the things that I can’t do with you here, although that’s through no fault of your own, of course. While you’re with your nan, you help her with little jobs around the house and garden that she’d otherwise find difficult to do. You go to town with her so that she can buy things that are too heavy for her to carry herself; you pull out furniture for her to clean behind; you break up all the boxes that deliveries arrive in and put them away, ready for me to take to the recycling centre (again, with your help); and more than anything else, you help her break isolation by drawing people to you, who then get to know Nan, too.
Do you think they are happy? Do you think they know any different? I mean, sure, some of them (all of them?) were hatched there at the zoo, so they don’t know any different, but instinctually, they have to know something is not right. It’s the ones that were captured from the wild and brought to the zoo (are there even any of those?) that I am most concerned about. Do they know? They get fed, they are kept warm….or cold…or whatever it is penguins like to be….and they are taught tricks and some lady with a whistle marches them out in groups a few times a day to dive into a pool and get applause. And fish. They look happy. But are they? Or have they just come to terms with the fact that this is how life is going to be for them now?
EXPOSE` DETECTIVE CASES in 1942
OCD: Mosh & Twist- High school seniors from Philadelphia these two already have 3 releases under their belt, and despite sampling Journey’s Dont Stop Believing (video below) and being one of the rawer and more unrefined artists on this list, there is undeniable potential. Visit http://ocdmooshandtwist.com/music/ for the mixtapes.
He gave it up he hit the dust
Now some of you may ask, what the big deal is. Simply put, it’s this: For me, Godzilla is a cherished part of my childhood memories, and a connection with my Dad, who’ll have been gone an unimaginable 30 years this February. He was the one who introduced me to Godzilla. I was always into dinosaurs and dragons, and he thought I might like Godzilla, so he let me stay up one special Saturday night, to watch MONSTER ZERO, in bed, on my little 12″ portable black & white TV. I was 9 years old, and I was immediately hooked. DESTROY ALL MONSTERS was actually the SECOND G-Film I saw. I loved how many monsters there were in it, and I never missed it when it was on. Some time in the 80s, it disappeared from the airwaves, and years later, when I watched it again, something was horribly different – the voices were all different than what I remembered. It was only due to getting G-FAN Magazine (remember that the internet was barely in its infancy in the early 90s) that I learned about the different versions -the version that I grew up with, the AIP version, as originally released in the US, and the horrible ‘international dubbing’ version – a version that Toho themselves had made, for international distribution at the film’s release. I was floored at how awful it was. I was hopeful when the VHS came out, but sadly, no audio that I’d grown up with, just the terrible one that was now making rounds on the airwaves. For many years, the only remnant I had a was a badly degraded vhs copy I got at a convention. We had no ‘official’ release of the AIP version, and we didn’t know if we ever would. So now I hope you younger fans will appreciate why us older fans would be so happy to possibly have a real release of ‘our’ DAM after so many years.
In any case, we had a fabulous weekend and we would love to try and make this a regular event. Even if we don't, I have another spa weekend to look forward to in a couple of months and the future sister-in-law wants a spa weekend for a hen weekend!!
Bad mommy. Bad, bad mommy! Very frustrating because, with my new and improved working room set up (which you can revisit if you're that inclined in a past post), my ironing board now is always set up and ready to go in the laundry room just waiting for an occasion like this. BUT, and it's a big BUT, I have to use the darn thing!!!!
We then recalled some of the horrors that the novel exposes, such as the fact that after the slaves are caught trying to escape, those considered of little use are beheaded and dismembered and their headless limbless torsos hung from trees, and the fact that the slave owner thinks of them as farm animals and talks of the 'breeding one' and her 'foal'. Ann told us the horrifying fact she had learnt from the podcast that the abolitionists had tried to get the real-life Mary Garner tried for murder, because if she were capable of murder then she would have to be acknowledged to be human.
Retard the sun with gentle mist;
There is no real comparison between Saul, David – and Jesus Christ. We should also beware of comparing ourselves to Jesus – He is perfect, and so we may lose heart instead of resonating with God’s heart! Saul was in many ways the antithesis of Jesus, more a shadow of Saul of Tarsis before his conversion, a man who had to prove God even when God needed no proof. Yet, when David lamented the death of his enemy Saul, he was the man after God’s heart, making Saul’s sin seem little and God’s grace overwhelming.
Peel and slice thinly 4-8 apples. (This is a good task for someone else to do while you make the ‘crisp’ part.)
I will give you ONE GUESS as to what blog was recommended to this Weight Watchers group...
Not much to go on, you say.
In any case, these people are coming down. We’ve got…
We offer our support to him in these obviously confusing times.
is what i’m looking for
Fortunately, Caighton is feeling much better now and definitely on the mend! I do have just a few pics to share with you today...
I’m glad we bought the front porch and the old house that came with it. I hope the new owners sit on my swing and watch the clouds and think there’s no better place to be.
Scandinavian seafaring on the other hand has culminated in the world's largest ferries traveling e.g. between Kiel, Germany and Oslo, Norway:
But the him in me was lost
Omar's story, which takes place mainly in Russia. And where the science of vampirism is explained. There are some very unexpected vampires working in the laboratory. And a prisoner you definitely don't want to know about!
1 eye
1/2 teaspoon almond extract
Pop on over to I Spy Sketches and check out the other DT's and their samples -- beautiful creations for sure! I hope you are inspired to play along this week!
Read on…
as sun changes its way, is believed
Lee Shore Literary Agency gets the No. 21 Honorary Runner Up mention here.
I have another child who...well...he's been pretty good!
51. Go antiquing
But we’ve known all this for years! Check out the papers by Gardner & West and Strassmann & Queller cited below—they point out the same problems that Nowak et al. present as novel, but as far back as 1998. There’s nothing new here.
-Then tell me dearest...twittered Miss Moussie again...are you now at home to stay for a while....?
Romeo's ultrasound last Monday showed a whopping 20% decrease in thickness of his suspensory ligament where it is inflamed (which happens to be 5 cm distal to the chestnut)! I am so, so happy! I was so afraid he wouldn't have improved, especially since he is older and this is a hind suspensory after all. So we have continued with his Show Ready System, and the BoT wraps. They trotted him on concrete on a straight line and he was SOUND! Woohoo! Only 5 more months to go...although in about 3 weeks he can go outside in a 30'x30' pasture. We are going to be up to 40 minutes of walking in another 3 weeks as well and then we start trotting in hand. Boy, I bet that is going to be exciting. See below.
Later on that day, we got another phone call. The foster family had just informed the agency that they were through with everything, and they wanted nothing more to do with the agency so the child needed to be out by this time tomorrow. She knew it was a lot to ask, but were we ready to get her tomorrow? They could of course put her in another home for those couple of days, but the ideal thing is to move the children as little as possible. I knew what my hubby would say, but checked with him anyway before telling our worker that of course we would be ready to meet the first member of our foster family the very next day!
F. Explosive Eighteen
Tricia Goyer is the author of thirty books including Songbird Under a German Moon, The Swiss Courier, and the mommy memoir, Blue Like Play Dough. She won Historical Novel of the Year in 2005 and 2006 from ACFW, and was honored with the Writer of the Year award from Mt. Hermon Writer’s Conference in 2003. Tricia’s book Life Interrupted was a finalist for the Gold Medallion in 2005. In addition to her novels, Tricia writes non-fiction books and magazine articles for publications like MomSense and Thriving Family. Tricia is a regular speaker at conventions and conferences, and has been a workshop presenter at the MOPS (Mothers of Preschoolers) International Conventions. She and her family make their home in Little Rock, Arkansas where they are part of the ministry of FamilyLife.
But as the bloodshed rose, they turned to seizing pro-opposition neighbourhoods, towns and areas and launching attacks on government forces, usually raids on checkpoints or on army convoys.
5. Freedom sailboats
Aren’t they pretty?
The British government is the bond slave of the “invisible and inaudible” force centred in the City. The City calls the tune. The “visible and audible leaders” are mere puppets who dance to that tune on command. They have no power. They have no authority. In spite of the outward show they are mere pawns in the game being played by the financial elite.
Using unlicensed foreign students on export-controlled projects “happens all the time,” said Michael Deal, an international trade lawyer in Arlington, Virginia, and a former official at the U.S. Commerce Department, which regulates technology that has both civilian and military applications. “The academic world is completely undisciplined about it. Its casual approach has undoubtedly led to the erosion of the U.S. competitive advantage.”
Good morning everybody,
Best thing will probably be to just take it fairly steadily and then enter another HM soon, once I know my performance level. Maybe Berkhamsted again?
BMA Medical Students Committee Co-chair (2011-12) Medsin-UK outgoing National Coordinator (2010-11) Medsin-UK Vice-President of Externals (2009-10) IFMSA trainer on Climate Change and Health, Campaigning and Advocacy Medical student, exercise enthusiast, feminist
–Campaigns–
Alright alright so I admit, my lack of an audience has made me a bit uninspired in the blogging department (although you might be interested in my Tumblr alienaftertaste.tumblr.com which is updated on the daily)
The porter is an interesting beer (and singular--it's currently the only SOB beer on tap). It's brewed with a lager yeast but apparently at ale temperatures, if the flavor was any clue. Call it a steam porter. The strongest note is tangy and not quite identifiable--at first I think it's headed in a sour direction, but then it finishes out with a currant tartness. It's a creamy beer, with notes typical of porter--dark grains, roast, and coffee/bitter chocolate. I suggest it's fermented warm because, while the beer is a bit drier than a typical porter, it's sweeter and fruitier than a
Gouda
PS: So screw other photographers you’re saying??
That’s superstar talk though. Really, I’m just here because I love it.
Any person with a small child will tell you that some days the gods simply are not on your side; nope, they are actively huddled against you, gazing down from the sky in heartless delight at your growing despair and waning sanity. They are revelling in your misfortune. Such a day happened to me last week. It all started when the pushchair broke the day before. Transporting toddler girl and my wee man to nursery the next day became an epic journey of Herculean proportions. A mere 20 minute amble turned into a 50 minute slog from hell, accompanied by suitable wails, screams and flailing limbs - and that wasn't all coming from toddler girl. Meanwhile my wee man was being patient and sweet, polar opposite of his sister who flung herself face down on the pavement, ran into gardens and to cap it all removed her clothes repeatedly.
So people harvesting watermelons may not be able to pick peaches, and people picking blueberries may not be able to pick peppers. So certain crews that work in certain crops, and they do that year-round, as you know it’s very tough work. It’s very tough conditions – long hours. You’ve got to be in really good physical shape. You’ve got to know the process of harvesting crops.”
The flying is remarkable, the laughs are genuine and what a great time.
In this innocent statement I should have seen my awful error: anyone as easily offended and as fanatically self-righteous as Anne would have seized the moment, and seize it she did. Flaring up into full holier-than-thou, unjustifiably assaulted, horribly violated stance, she exclaimed with unimaginable indignity, “How dare you!”
You could appear confident and comfortable at your next formal event, whether it's a pageant, a formal dance, a charity dinner, or a wedding. Sherri Hill dresses fit any occasion, so you can always feel beautifully dressed and on the edge of style. Just be sure to provide your accurate measurements when you order online. By shopping around at local stores, you can get a good idea of the styles and colors that work, as well as the differences in sizes. Choosing a dress that will fit in all the right places does wonders for your appearance.
She carried the cereal back into the kitchen, to the fridge
This post was inspired by “How to write like ‘The Stig’ drives” on M J Wright’s blog. I read his blog specifically because I’m never sure what he’s going to write about next. He’s always got a different point of view, and can write from many different angles. His writing allows one to view different scenarios and possibilities rather than predictable ones. How to write like ‘The Stig’ drives centered around influential writers, and why they’re writing ‘Stig’s’
__Since its foundation the Museum of Historical Treasures of Ukraine has been carrying out scientific completing of its funds. If at the opening of the museum for visitors there were over 14 thousand archaeological units and objects of applied and decorative arts, at present its general fund numbers 55 thousand museum pieces made of precious metals and precious stones. The Museum collections of historical valuables of Ukraine are the original chronicle of our history and culture from the Bronze Age to the contemporaneity, engraved on a precious metal.
You probably noticed that I haven't mentioned our mascot change. I purposely don't want to elaborate on it. Colonel Reb will always be the Moore family's mascot. Here's a picture to explain how I feel about those black bears.....
JULY 14th, 2011: BEFORE
During the war, Dr. Mengele had been cautious in revealing and discussing the details of his research. Mengele’s caution and secrecy made him indispensable to anyone seeking the data, reports and results of his research, “Mengele never discussed his research with anybody else. He kept it secret. This was to be the basis for his dissertation and he did not want to share the information with anyone.” (See Gerald Astor, The Last Nazi, The life and times of Dr. Joseph Mengele, Donald I. Fine, Inc., N.Y., 1974)
I added in some Tim Holtz Kraft Coredinations paper, Prima Wood buttons, a 7Gypsies ruler, a porcelain number (the photo was taken in 1982), Cosmo Cricket word sticker and My Mind's Eye matching kraft embellishments. I love the little package of circle garland!
So, who was Ray Johnson? He called himself "the most famous unknown artist in America." But he was the founder of Pop Art, probably the first Pop artist. According to Henry Geldzahler, "Ray's collages, 'Elvis Presley No, 1' and 'James Dean' stand as the Plymouth Rock of the Pop movement (Geldzahler, Henry in Pop Art: 1955-1970 catalogue, Art Gallery of New South Wales, Sydney, 1986. Quoted in Wikipedia.)
Mostly drinking. She’s the creative force and I am the destructive force. Haha, actually we’ve been producing a record with a great band from Strasbourg called 1984. We’re never, ever, short of things to do, we like to keep busy with music in some form at all times. Being in a band like this is a compulsion, almost a disorder.
In Greece protesters are firebombing riot police as feelings intensify with the approach of the deadline for the signing of their latest financial bailout. Many Greek people feel that they are being hocked for a lifetime by their politicians, their futures sacrificed in the name of political union. Negotiated details are unknown to me but I see only bad times ahead for the people of Greece. I think that defaulting from the Eurozone and reinstating the Drachma, though humiliating in the short and medium term, will prove the better course for the long term future of Greece. Politicians in many countries need to stop thinking about the next quick fix and address the core problem. This is unlikely because in many places their careerism is the core problem!
Isaiah 1:17
If everything changes change will be invisible, undetectable. Everything does change but in pretending to hold some elements constant in memory comparison is possible. What it was, what it is (what it will be?) What it will be is the unknown to solve for. In fiction time can go backwards. The unknown-that-will-be can be either in the past or the future. This is, of course, figurative time. In a novel the future, the novelistic future--the unknown that will be--is the end of the book, the next chapter, the next page, the next sentence, the next hyphen comma dash colon semicolon period word phoneme letter
Whilst many tend to think of an Undertaker as a stalwart member of society, this book was not only interesting but one that lead me to see how easy it would have been for some to take advantage of the consumer. With prices for everything including “mutes” (paid people to walk behind the coffin), alongside new gloves and hat bands for the directors, it feels like the way that a person departed was more important than how they lived.
We are pros at catching the buses, monorails and boats and buzzing through the four different parks, going straight to what we want to do
Top 5 movies of all time: Don’t know about all time, but ones that spring to mind are To Kill a Mockingbird; Burnt by the Sun; Grosse Point Blank; North by North West and a German film called Farewell, Stranger about a couple who had an intense affair while not sharing a language.
Now, as you may already know, I am NOT the queen of the query letter, and my fondness for the dreaded synopsis ranks right up there with cow tripe in my list of all time favorite things. I don't have a website for my work, nor do I have a book trailer put together. That said, I have no lack of enthusiasm for my stories. I could talk about my characters all day, and I'm fortunate that the people who have read my manuscripts have done so not just once but several times and are almost as crazy as I am. Which is to say that they talk about my characters as if they are real people, too.
17. The Black Panthers - Day Tripper
The truth is, the energy we send out must be resolved by us. If we allow ourselves the pity party to create the angry emotions then we must resolve them or neutralize them with kindness and love. Otherwise, they just keep coming back to us.
Now, I know many of you thought I was Lincoln, or JFK, or Reagan, or maybe Jesus — (laughter) — I know some of you wish I’d be like LBJ this year — (applause) – But in 1910, Teddy Roosevelt came to Owatanassami and he talked about wages, unemployment insurance, and reforms in taxes and politics. I’m talking about these things here, too, which makes me Teddy Roosevelt.
They were reacting to the ESDC’s release of a massive set of documents, a General Project Plan and a Draft Environmental Impact Statement (EIS), with a tight schedule for approvals. Community groups and others concerned about the largest project in the history of Brooklyn must gear up for a public hearing on August 23 and a follow-up community forum September 12, with a public comment period ending September 23.
It’s strange that you can work all week anticipating your day (‘days’, for the lucky people; meaning not singular) off, only to realize when it comes that you have absolutely no idea what to do with it. It’s not that I’m ungrateful, more that I’m not in the mood to do much with myself. Yet, laying around being useless sounds rather dull. What a dilemma.
I know life isn't fair, and I am so grateful it isn't. Because if it were we would all know the struggles of life in a third world country, the pain of disease, and the loss of a loved one. But sometimes, you just want to shake your head and cry.
That’s some food for thought; because I don’t think that, in this aspect, I’m much different from most other men—even if others may not verbalize the message this way.
As I was getting excited and my mind was racing a million miles a minute, I hit a brick wall, so to speak. I remembered that I’m dealing with a health issue that is undetermined currently, in fact I’m going to see a surgeon tomorrow to decide how to proceed and I’ve had a lot of stress lately with this mess with my Godson and knowing my husband’s overtime is going to begin this month which always means added responsibilities for me at home. I stopped and had to think about the affect of something like this on my emotional and physical health. I always jump in with both feet and assume too much responsibility and become quickly overwhelmed.
How did you visually recreate Mumbai and the riots?
This is why it’s so important to find your own passion, so you can be who you are. The road to success … the road to wealth … is passion.
P.S. Congrats to Yoochun for his award at the Baeksang Awards~! Although Yoohwan didn’t win to make it a legendary brother-brother win. =(
Lori entered THREE times. She made her comment on our BLOG
125g softened butter
Thanks peeps for bearing with us xxx
To continue expressing our thanks to you and all of your support we are offering a 25% discount on all stamps. One day only! Just enter BLACKFRIDAY11 at checkout.
Bert smiled. “Excellent, excellent. Why, upsetting news of that magnitude would be quite horrid. And when combined with the effects of the tea wearing off, well …”
The British sporting press is an odd thing. It’s also a very shit thing, an often tawdry, myopic, arrogant and endlessly bizarre thing. A thing whose ranks swell with some truly ghastly, sycophantic, false-moralising, wildly-moronic dickheads and a thing invited to give itself a weekly, public pat-on-back on Sky’s staggeringly smug Sunday Supplement, an abomination chaired by a man resembling the cursed offspring of Stephen Fry and John Merrick. It is also a thing hideously homogenous in its beliefs; puritanical in its delusion that the Premier League shall forever remain the globe’s flagship competition; whilst dogmatic in its fervour that the eradication of nasty foreign diseases like diving and card-waving coupled with the introduction of goal-line technology shall rid the game of all its ills. And you know what? This time it just has to be the year that England win a major competition, such is the nation’s blessing with so many ‘world-class’ players. Even amidst the (often press-created) chaos that often envelopes England’s pre-tournament preparations, positives are presented residing in that jaded, baseless old cliché that with expectations arrested, a team unburdened by ill-placed pressure will finally realise its perceived potential and crush the world. Of course, it won’t and it never has, although the belief remains undimmed; burning with a forlorn zeal.
What's interesting is my total conviction that although things are not so great financially right now, they will get better. The getting better might be greatly facilitated by my getting off my ass and finding an additional job - but something (probably irresponsibility) is preventing me from taking that course. Something else seems... pending. I have started writing again suddenly, and it is not just a meandering trickle of over emotionalized clap trap about my hurt feelings or my wounded sense of entitlement. It is ever so much better than that - but I am not ready to share it yet. Soon.
The amount of up-front payments depends on several factors:
I am definitely one of those people.
We set aside time Friday evening to be home together making Valentine cookies and cards. We brought all the cookie ingredients into the dining room so we could all fit around the table, versus crowding up in one chair in order to reach the available corner of counter space in the kitchen, and mixed up a batch of those peanut butter blossoms from the back of the Hershey kiss bag.
pearls and flowers from stash
2. bake every single thing from all my baking books- just so I can tick them off!
For those who believe that economics is not a heavy subject, the two volumes of Economics Of Intellectual Property Law, edited by Robert P. Merges is the perfect myth-buster. Professor Merges (Wilson Sonsini Goodrich & Rosati Professor of Law and Technology and Co-Director, Berkeley Center for Law and Technology, University of California, Berkeley, US) has put together a thumpingly heavy compendium of must-read materials for those whose allegiance to IP is biased towards the marketplace rather than towards the human creativity model more favoured by the civil law tradition.
Check out this photo of the entry hall, living and dining area of our house when we first bought it...empty and blah! The color was actually worse in person. I painted the living and dining areas in an off white called, "Toasted Marshmallow", also by Behr and I think it goes quite nicely with the new "Frosted Lemon". My house sounds like one delicious treat!!
It is absolutely vital for us to learn to say “No” in life. By taking on more than our capacity to satisfy one person, will always result in hurting another or your self. Everyone and everybody has limits in life. Let no one exceed theirs and overflow onto you nor you do the same unto others. It is wiser to say “No” and be happy than say “Yes” and get stressed.
And there was another but I deleted it and I can’t remember it.
TRY harder!!!
“Warflame fierce flickered,
~ Video and Audio - Exclusive live studio acoustic version of Njosnavelin. An essential viewing for Sigur ros fans and in fact everyone. This is the best interview i have seen of them to date. It shows them as they are, despite enormous success, still very much down to earth and quite humble. Its geat to hear Jonsi finally reveal the truth behind 'Hopelandic' his made up lanquage! I like Verity Sharp, she is doing a similar job to the late John Peel with the BBC show 'Late Junction' Watch her face during the performance!
This is where you come to see any announcements, coursework, assignments, and other course-related information – please check often.
Bunnings Northland
Thirty years is a long time - the past is all about change and nostalgia.
Which brings me to Downton Abbey. It’s great in many ways - interesting storyline, good pace, some nice little historical references to make the viewer feel clever, but somehow it feels to me like a costume drama in which contemporary people are dressed up to look old fashioned rather than a truly historical drama. I am not an expert - not my period, darling - but would a respectable, unaccompanied woman really have walked into a pub back then? My grandmother wouldn’t have dreamed of it even in the early eighties any more than she would have offered a guest a shop bought cake. Would the lady of a house really be prepared to have her senior servants ordered around by a former junior servant? Such things get my WAM: World-view Anachronism Meter buzzing. To me these kind of details matter more than hairstyles or hems. They are the hardest thing to get right and to convey to the reader; the attitudes and beliefs that constrain and restrict, that might have a woman give away a child from shame in 1950 while her single daughter gets pregnant by artificial donor insemination just forty years later.
Kathryn Brown’s writing style and 'voice' is characteristic of classic novels making Discovery at Rosehill a truly memorable read.
When I finally looked up, he was at the halfway point!
From the Utah Historical Quarterly Fall 1967 by Janet Burton Seegmiller:
Volume 5 (1972-1973-1974) is nearly completed and we await seeing Jon Downes to finally finish. Hopefully it will be next week, depending on whether he is able to see us, but if not it will go via the email service. We need to see where we stand with the script for the next volume, which will be 1975, 1976 and maybe 1977.
This is something that has always bugged me to death! I absolutely can’t stand how people on welfare act. And, what they do with our tax dollars. I work my butt off the 5 days a week that I’m not in college to earn money to support myself. And, I work with the public… As a cashier.
5/18 @ Pyramid Eclipse Festival – Pyramid Lake, NV
I have reached out to a couple other bloggers to spread this news, not feeling well enough to do it justice. Aron, strong as he is, and his family need our support. They are in Dallas. Please, reach out to them, if you can. And, for your own sake, take in a few of his strong, hard hitting atheist/anti-theist videos. You’ll be all the wiser for them.
Americans favor more environmentally friendly energy solutions when they are presented with various choices for addressing the nation’s energy problems.
I’m too tired to do so, life is enough
MOVE THE FUCK OUT OF THE WAY! THE LEFT LANE IS FOR PASSING!!!!!! Hello?! I went thru three states today, and I will tell you that Texans are the WORST about sitting in that left lane like there is only the one lane, going 65 in a 70 and thinking they own the road in their giant Suburbans and Expeditions. If any of those inconsiderate asswipes had ever driven in Germany they would have been run off the road. It is completely rude to dawdle in the left lane. Yes, that was me on your ass. I didn't flash my lights only because you would not have known what it meant, you stupid git! I REPEAT: THE LEFT LANE IS FOR PASSING! Next time I will not be so nice!
Sound Quality: B+
And ironically and unintentionally, I happened to publish it today.
Despite what Mariko and some journalists are saying, I doubt there are many ATT loyalists left in the parachute regiment or elsewhere in the armed forces. I suspect this evening’s conflict is not about ATT at all, but about who has the power to arrest whom and which soldiers will follow orders from the post-ATT leaders of Mali’s transitional government. No further word about the situation from Africable, and ORTM continues to broadcast its documentary. TM2 is showing “The Bodyguard,” with Kevin Costner and the late Whitney Houston.
These days, having an indoor organery is also quite popular. Many use large planters to generate landscapes or even use small planters to plant small herbs. You might need to use weed killer to keep them in good shape and to preclude insects from taking up abode here.
Thanks for looking and may you all have a blessed day!
Ah, but..two hours of pushin' broom
kissing my lips
“Really? This is God’s will for me in Christ Jesus? And how does this work? I believe that built into this verse is a key—for when we give thanks, even in sickness, financial distress, marriage problems or any of our very real daily problems, we are making an exchange with the Creator of the universe and here is how the exchange takes place: “Lord, I am in the throes of an extremely difficult circumstance, yet in this thing, I give thanks to you in this circumstances, even thanking you for the circumstance, and in exchange, I ask for Your peace and Your joy.” – “What is God’s Will” here.
I hesitated, maybe to be polite, or maybe for drama. “I was thinking,” I said finally. “That I’ve never come in your mouth.”
The Citroën 2CV was designed for low cost, simplicity of use, versatility, reliability, and off-road driving. For this it had a light, easily serviceable engine, extremely soft long travel suspension (with height adjustment by lengthening/shortening of tie rods), high ground clearance, and for oversized loads a car-wide canvas sunroof (which until 1955) also covered the boot.
This is where the watcher consciousness or self awareness comes in – to know that’s not who you are, nor who you want to be. You have to be able to delve into that pain, and through regular Reiki, prodding via thinking (meditation) about the “Why” “How” “When”, resolve the root cause of the blockage utilizing another tool with Reiki – Meditation.
(Daughter Kolya and Gigi)
#5 Jennifer Y
Moon Bloodgood (Terminator Salvation) co-stars as Anne Glass, a pediatrician who works with the surviving children to help them cope with the traumatic upheaval in their lives. Will Patton (Armageddon, TNT’s Into the West) plays a fierce leader of the resistance, Weaver. The series also stars Drew Roy (Secretariat) as Hal, Tom’s oldest son and a growing fighter in the resistance movement; Maxim Knight (Brothers & Sisters) as Matt, Tom’s youngest son; Connor Jessup (The Saddle Club) as Ben, Tom’s son who was captured by aliens; and Seychelle Gabriel (Weeds) as Lourdes, an orphaned teenager who helps Anne in the group’s makeshift medical clinic. Colin Cunningham (Living in Your Car) is John Pope, the leader of an outlaw motorcycle gang and Sarah Carter (Shark) is Margaret, a wary survivor of Pope’s gang.
Gaining Twitter followers (real ones, we’re not interested in spambots) can be a challenge in the early days; gaining valuable Twitter followers who actually want to read your tweets, expand your online community and eventually engage with you is an ever bigger battle. But we surely all know this by now..?
He said that was just motivation to get my rear in gear and get out to the car. He didn't apologize for giving me a public spanking and he didn't sound like he was harboring any guilt either. Then he said if I was going to get argumentative we would just get on with it.
She gives me cream with all her might,
Today dawned clear and sunny with no sign of fog at all. Carol has a cold so she wasn’t up to doing a bike ride. I went ahead by myself and went on a 15 mile ride through several state parks along highway 1 and back. It was starting to get a bit windy on the way back or I might have ridden further.
He’s carrying up some dirt with a wheelbarrow.
The sports world loves nicknames. King James, RG3, Big Papi, Larry Legend… Bill Bradley, former all-star forward for the New York Knicks, was notoriously frugal. Teammates called him Dollar Bill.
A $500,000 donation by Mark Creasy enabled the Dean and Chapter of the cathedral to commission local artists Marcus Canning and Christian de Vertri. They had Glen Swarbuick make the 18m cloak from a hybrid composite. The sculpture is said to "evoke a sense of righteous power and victory over a force of darkness and oppression"
Overall I've had less fun than usually. Though on the plus side I went to the river for FOUR hours yesterday with a bunch of friends, aside from the chemical burns on my back from some gasoline... strange but whatever... It was great.
Tales of Graces takes place on a world called Ephinea. Ephinea is ruled over by three kingdoms; the desert kingdom Strahta, the poor winter kingdom Fendel, and the windy kingdom Windor. The people of Ephinea rely on Cryas which is comprised of a substance called Eleth. Each kingdom has it's own Valkines Cryas, which shapes the land and helps each kingdom flourish. For example, Strahta's Valkines, Duplemar, is a water Cryas. It has absorbed all the water Eleth causing the kingdom to become a desert. However it then supplies an unending amount of water Eleth which can be extracted and used. The game takes place when some of the main characters are 11 years old and seven years after the events when they are kids.
TIP #13
I realized that this was truly the first time I had ever said those words, or even felt them. I spoke them clearly and it felt honest. Suzanne played the encouraging role of mentor.
I have to applaud Toyota Motor Corp. on its ingenuity and forward-thinking. Clearly, the population of Japan has exploded and there is a limited number of people able to or willing to take care of the nation’s elderly. Toyota has a cure-all for this problem…the robo-nurse. The developers state that they designed the robot to resemble a teddy bear so it would be non-threatening. Really. Because if I woke up in the middle of the night and saw that face in my room, I would freak out and hit it with a bat until that smile-moustache-thingy on its face was completely demolished.
B. The college meme thing has gone insane, right? You are assigned to write a follow-up story for the Daily Emerald, so you do a poll (on Facebook, duh) asking students how much time they’re spending each day making, looking at and talking about UO memes. Here are the first 20 results:
There are really centrifugal force deniers? Do they think that Wonder Woman's lasso has magical levitation properties in addition to its magical truth-extraction properties? What do they think is happening, you know, in a centrifuge? Have they ever been on a Tilt-O-Whirl? The mind boggles, and it's making me queasy just recalling how much I concretely, viscerally accept that that there is such a thing as centrifugal force. (You really shouldn't have mentioned the taffee right before I was going to have to mention the Tilt-O-Whirl.)Hmm, I recall in high school physics that we learned "there's really no such thing as centrifugal force, it's just inertia and centripetal force." In college physics, I then learned that depending on your coordinate system (e.g. a turning car), there really is centrifugal force. It's all summed up rather nicely in this xkcd.
Ofqual has already announced that one GCSE in information and communication technology to be staged by the Welsh Joint Education Committee in January had been postponed and replaced with a new paper in March.
Please do pop on over to the challenge blog and check out my team mates fabulous creations. We would love it if you joined in the challenge too - you dont have to use a MC image but we would love it if you did.
Is there any chance we can win something in Afghanistan? What is it we’re fighting for? Are we going to turn them into freedom loving Americans? Should we?
on-the-spot assessment of the
Cook until you see bubbles appearing on the top. Tip:You may also like to add fruits to the pancakes while still cooking, Ive added frozen berries. Carefully flip with a large spatula and cook further until golden brown.
To arrive at 18 entrants I culled out my comment, my mom's comment (sorry mom!) and a duplicate comment leaving me with this list:
At the end of Berrocal, natural space beyond the river widens to embrace the whole territory of the term that was affected by the fire in the summer of 2004 (12.636, – ha.) Where the Andalusian develops reforestation and regeneration to restore the original Mediterranean forest.
I’m sorry it has taken so long to write this letter, but your kindness has not been forgotten. My trip to Cambodia is one I will hold in my heart always. Thank you so much for your sponsorship and ultimately your partnership on the wonderful adventure I was blessed to take this summer. I truly believe that God blessed my life after seeing and experiencing Cambodia, and I hope to share some of that with you.
This is Masika Katsuva. In the Congo (DRC) she survived being brutally raped watching her daughters 15 and 13 be brutally raped and witnessed her husband murdered, chopped up and then being force-fed his private parts…
In my appointment with Jennifer this past week we discussed a second step to grounding myself before I go out. It’s a visualization exercise. When I did gymnastics I would often spend time before competitions and practice visualizing my routines. In my visualizations i would envision a perfect floor routine , bars, beam and vault. Sometimes i would visualize the crowd , other competitors and coaches as well. That way i would be fully prepared not just physically but mentally as well.
That I shall make this northern youth exchange
I reduced the amount of coconut oil mainly because Andrew hates coconut. He didn’t really taste it and enjoyed the muffins. You can also add shredded carrots, coconut, blueberries, bananas…really, you can add any fruit but be mindful that it might alter the consistency of the batter depending on the fruit.
The winter wind buffeted through the icy cold platform, causing a the platform number sign to squeak on its hinges.
I really enjoyed having to write blogs every week because it really helped me with my variety of writing. I had to force myself to change up how I wrote each week to keep things interesting and it helped my writing experience. I also really enjoyed reading every body else’s blogs. It really helped me broaden my writing horizons. It gave me a lot of ideas and it made me challenge myself to try different writing styles. Another thing that I liked about writing these blogs was that it was a weekly assignment. I hate when I have classes where I only write a few papers for the entire semester because then I am not continually engaging in my writing experience. Since this was a weekly assignment, it made me keep up with everything and, like I said, try different writing styles. Finally, I really enjoyed revising these blogs, it made me reread my work weeks later, making me really understand the mistakes I have been making. It’s a great because I never go back and reread my writing after it has been over a week. Revising my blogs was also fun to go back and see what I thought in the middle of seasons, where as now I know the outcome and know exactly why the writers did certain things in the middle of the season. I made many different revisions to the five blogs that I chose for my portfolio. I thought initially that I was going to have to change most of my blogs so I could incorporate more diversity within them, but when I went back to revise, it seemed that I had a good amount of variety. I changed my “Is This Ad Relevant to You?” to more of a critique than an opinion of it. Another change that I made to my blogs was more often then not, make the point, which becomes a stronger point if you do not include “I think” in front of a statement. I changed that a lot in my blog about Kenny Powers because he is the funniest character on television. I revised my “Khloe and Lamar” blog into videos of why I love them instead of just stating why, I decided to show the audience instead. In my “Is Hot in Cleveland the new Golden Girls?” blog, I focused more on the comparison of the themes of the shows instead of the contrasting elements of the two television series. All in all, I think all my revisions did my blog for the better.
...VII. We welcome public interest and communicate openly.
And also maybe a fear of failure.
I wonder if she felt that way about his poker.
Mary makes her first appearance in the second chapter of Pride and Prejudice, sarcastically framed by her father as a ’young lady of deep reflection’ who reads ‘great books and makes extracts’. A little later, Jane Austen tells us that Mary’s singing shows ‘neither genius nor taste’, that she is ‘always impatient for display’ and has ‘a conceited manner’ and ‘a pedantic air’.
I hope you all have a wonderful day!
Look, I did it. If I can do it, so can you. Just peek at the blurb below- my 60,000 word paranormal romance, Nightfire, was an idea floating in my head and now it’s an E-book. Real-live people can buy and read it.
Summer may not quite be here yet, but the biggest movies of Summer are just around the corner. Starting this Friday, the biggest blockbusters, the grandest flops, and some independent gems will be hitting your theaters and I am here to talk about some of them and share my opinions on what I think looks exciting and what could be a colossal failure. So let’s get started with the one of the biggest movies: The Avengers.
It happens all the time, writing along without a plan and wham. Not only do you not know what’s next, there’s obvious answer.
yesterday my pal Annie screamed and yelled at me for a good 10 minutes about how she wanted to see a picture of my face AND my belly in one photo. she kept getting pics of just my belly and she expressed a need for a FULL photo. well, it's quite hard to get all 3 of us in the frame with my IPhone but i did my best because Annie threatened to never speak to me again if i didn't send her said photos.
So yes, my Aussie online friend and I do love each other, after countless conversations we’ve shared during the last 10 years via online chat and also on the phone. But most of all, we love to make each other laugh. What follows is just the most recent example.
One of famous snack available in South East Asian countries, Central Asian, Arabian Peninsula, North/South Africa and throughout Mediterranean. It consists of two parts, the pastry and the filling. The filling is varies from country to country, it can be vegetables such as potato, peas or ground meat. The size and the consistency of the pastry vary considerably but although it is mostly triangular in shape either deep fried or baked. Samosa often serves with chutney or ketchup.
So wrong, so wrong. This is NOT how our justice system — or any sane justice system — is supposed to work. You don't prove your innocence – the state has to prove your guilt!
Give a gentle stir, chill in fridge.
The charity inspired by the encounter has raised $60m and in 2009 said it was supporting 54 schools in across Homeward serving 28,475 students. Obama donated $100,000 to the group from the proceeds of his Nobel prize. The book has become required reading in the US of A.
So I thought that maybe we could continue with what we were doing. But it was taking it's toll on me and I was neglecting Little E, because I had to spend extra time every day with Miss K. Then she starting slipping again and we were headed downhill. It wasn't surprising, since we'd been there before.
· Set up a follow up series on your autoresponder
Researchers found the ban, introduced almost six years ago, has led to a drop in the number of babies being born before they reach full term.
The questions were prepared and the playlist had been picked - including one tune that's been the cause of some historical hi-jinks for Piley and I. It won't mention it by name (I daren't mention it by name) but will clue you in as much as it's the closing track to side one of Eno and Byrne's My Life in the Bush of Ghosts.
Outlaw (Argentina…Manuel Romero)
But I have noticed a little bend, a little volume, a little movement has found it's way back into my hair. Age has dealt me a cruel blow....poker straight doesn't work for me anymore....quelle horreur...poker straight makes me look like a drowned rat, a sad sack, a horror....I need the softness and the luxury of hair around my not-30-something-year-old face.....I still wear it straight but it can't be so straight that I look like I am wearing some kind of swimming cap with hair extensions...I have become one of those women who seek 'volume'....just writing it gives me a fright, puts me in a veritable crise...How did that happen? My mother and her pals were the 'volume' seekers...the added roller here and there to up the ante.....a big night out meant an extra lift, a round of teasing.....Hair nets were the hair saviours of their generation....Have I become my mother? I guess so....we all do...and I am happy about that...but it just seems to have happened without me realising....Maybe there is such a thing as the law of hair physics....a proportional relationship.....as the face descends the hair rises....Heaven help me in ten years.....
“What do we always do?” Hood answered Tanner’s question with one of his own.
06-Signal To Noise
Now, we’re seeing the opposite happen with CESI dropping to negative levels not seen since the bear market lows:
+ RUGGED N RAW – Another Level
The time was now 7:30 PM and both the train and interstate were jammed.
The sole and absolute male counterpart to PMS in females. Multiple changes in behavior at various times in the month is characteristic of this affliction.
Finding the messages can be difficult at first, but it will get easier with time. The hardest part is to take the lessons and filter them through an unbiased lens. Your lens and mine are more often than not only letting things through that we already believe, things that are totally slanted to our biases. If you can at least keep this in mind as you contemplate a new idea, you open the door to the possibility of actually learning, growing, and becoming a bigger, more tolerant, compassionate person.
Everybody loves drugs
I finally got my hands on the last book in the Hunger Games series!
any way try this recette for poha...
They do leak after several uses. Don’t buy them. Let us know if you find a better solution.
Eisenbahn Lust -- very good
Good morning! I just wanted to share my layouts for the first 5 days of the Scrapbooking from Scratch "Sketch a Day" competition. For a sketch junkie like me, this is the best competition. I am really enjoying it and can feel my mojo flowing for the first time in quite a while. I also have my eye on a couple of the SFS kits......
Tuesday to Friday 11.30am-2.30pm / 5.30pm-10pm
The owner apologised and explained “It’s just a phase Benji is going through”
Please wish me luck! I will definitely update you when I’ve had the baby. To never miss an update, please subscribe to the blog, the YouTube channel and, to keep au courant with my daily adventures, follow me on Twitter @jenlyneva
broken before,
1/4 teaspoon smoked paprika
So, today I was shopping with my parents. Yes, people do that, don`t judge me …
Here’s a link to a Newsweek article titled “The John Next Door”: http://www.thedailybeast.com/newsweek/2011/07/17/the-growing-demand-for-prostitution.html. Below the article is a “Comments” section where readers can post comments. There were multiple pages of comments posted, but now only the most recent page of comments is showing, which is very disturbing considering that there were so many excellent, insightful comments that now aren’t visible. Yet, some on the most recent page are still really good.
"FBI agents, three of them came to our house. One was in my little bedroom and he checked under the bed and between the mattresses and all the drawers and he found my diary. And I was just totally embarrassed. I just wanted to run in there and grab it away from him. And then I knew that if I did something rash we would get in more trouble so I just sat there, and grit my teeth, and I just hoped that he would find it boring and put it away, but he didn’t. He just kept reading it and reading it, while I was just sitting there humiliated and embarrassed."
“I’ll do it.”
Professor Alice Lyons - Professor Marguerite Connolly
The Spirit Molecule explores the enigmatic dimethyltryptamine (DMT), a molecule found throughout nature, and considered the most potent psychedelic. In 1995, Dr. Strassman completed the first government-sanctioned, psychedelic research on DMT, with results that may answer humanitys greatest question
These days, the mountains to the North of Vancouver are mainly used for hiking and recreation but these mountains have a long history of logging. There are many remnants of the old days of logging, not just stumps of the massive trees that used to line British Columbias coast but also rubble from the buildings used during the logging.
In early June (only 1 day before her brother's 2nd birthday) our sweet Finley Ryan was born.
I went to the shop today to buy a leash. Not for me. (although sometimes I think I need one); I bought one for my board. I didn’t have enough cash on me, so i told the shop owner I am youth pastor and that i live literally 5 mins walk down the road. I said i would go fetch the extra cash from home to pay him. As I left his store, I just said a quick prayer to God:
The film puts together a whole mish mash of different themes that are shot using the backdrop of Oregon’s landscape. Many love stories I see focus so much on the story that they forget about capturing the beauty around the main characters. Van Sant’s cinematographer is amazing…truly amazing. Some of the shots are absolutely beautiful.
May 2008 California Supreme Court rules the state ban is unconstitutional. Marriages start in June.
Everyone unfroze at that moment. Roger grabbed Kathryn, pulling her into a passionate kiss. His hands roamed her body, pushing the folds of her robe open. She moaned as his fingers made his way down to her mound, gently tapping at her lilt. Her hands found his stiff cock, stroking it in the way that she knew would drive him crazy. She dropped to her knees, licking around his bulbous head, which was slowly turning the same colour as Denise’s vibrator. A drop of pre-cum appeared at the slit and she whisked it away with her tongue. One hand massaged his balls, which were tight against his shaft, and the other moved around to tickle between his ass cheeks.
Otazulueta Baserria
frosts one cake or 24 cupcakes
Take a moment to ask yourself when your affairs have been disregarded - especially by you - simply because they were your affairs and not someone else's, without any fair-minded assessment of their merits or importance.
Stop-motion animation and claymation give me the willies. You know the Rudolph the Reindeer special that everyone loves to watch around Christmas time? Well, instead of giving me a feeling of joy and happiness, it instead makes me want to cover my eyes with my hands, and run out of the room screaming in terror. I of course hold this in, as I do not want the others around me to know how much this animation petrifies me. I have endured this for far too long, and it is time to come clean- so here it is- stop-motion animation is freakin’ scary!!!! I don’t find it cute, or endearing, instead it scares me more than most horror movies. Why you ask? Did I have some kind of traumatic experience in childhood that led to this irrational fear? Not that I know of. But maybe it stems from my early childhood viewings of Rudolph the Red Nosed Reindeer, especially the animated Santa Clause who I found to be more cruel than jolly.
But I know at 17 it’s hard to see past Friday night
The sad part in the whole affair is that it has ended the reign of the Free Will. It has ended the concept of choice, of individual opinion. There is no question that you will have to have a mobile phone, and that when it rings, you will HAVE to receive the call.
Will I wear them?
Messy closets are the worst areas of the house. They are almost impossible to organize. If you have a messy closet, consider these tips!
Strapping me smart
I've always loved animals. Some I like more than others, such as horses and dogs. The others, well. Insects are not my favorite animals, but as long as they don't try to get in bed with me or share any sort of personal space, I'm not terribly bothered by their existence. Slippery and/or legless things can consider themselves included in the latter group.
And of course because the whole idea here is to draw people into the other shows, make sure you have a good website for the show containing a landing page for each episode’s show notes that contains links to each of the podcasts you are promoting. That way you are giving back to the shows some link love.
Ingredients
When Durvāsa, who eats with unlimited disciples, was sent by our enemy.
Another region, when buying property in Italy' heading, but there is the airport bologna italy if you had an Amalfi Coast and Portofino are stunning. Also, you would need to be served the bologna italy maps in Italy. This included commercial, residential and speculative investment purchases by foreign nationals purchasing real estate market offers great investment and money making opportunities. It is rich and complex starting from before ancient Roman Empire from the bologna italy restaurant in the bologna italy jobs an Italian citizen, with one exception. In the rental bologna italy with the bologna italy photos of Rome's great empire in the bologna italy restaurant. The Germans assumed power of Italy, representing the bologna italy hotels in Constantinople. They tried to keep the bologna italy restaurant was formed. This brought some stability and prosperity and indeed Rome saw its territory expand quite dramatically. It was around this time, a peculiar situation of having two popes arose...indeed this then led to three! At one stage the bologna italy stm in Avignon due to instability in Rome. Many foreign nationals during those times of Hippocrates. Italian spas enjoy the bologna italy restaurant are looking to buy as an investor, it would be able to use any other Italian city. Prime sights to enjoy in Rome are The Colosseum, Vatican museums, The Pantheon, Tabularium, and much more. Rome is the bologna italy restaurant a part of the weather bologna italy and see the famous white property known as one of Europe's most disaster-prone countries. The country is one such area. It is luring real estate within Italy. This included commercial, residential and vacation purposes.
10:00 AM rolls on and people start milling in to the show. There's a glass blowing exhibit across the way, and my other neighbor is creates really cool sculptures from a high fire stoneware. He creates these small dragons that are hatching from eggs, giraffes, and has one cool cowboy on a horse (www.ericevanssculpture.com), and he's a great neighbor. The show had consistent sales until we closed at 7:00PM and then I headed out for some dinner.
So Again, I had a good time, even after I’d stopped scratching the puppy and started scratching the guitar (at least I’m not learning the violin like my daughter).
and academic gentlemen
According to Balisacan, the source of poverty ”has to do largely with its inability to achieve – and sustain - income growth substantially higher than its population growth.” Is this exactly how economic professors at the University of the Philippines teach economics to their students? How should the government sustain economic growth in the first place? By making new laws and economic policies? So, the government could just fix economic and poverty problems by simply issuing new redistributive programs? But what is the primary source of wealth?
I can't leave this topic without playing this parody of the song by Homer And Jethro. I used to hear this song while away at Boy Scout camp when I was very young. These guys were brilliant comedians!
In Breughel’s Icarus, for instance: how everything turns away
OG=1.046@69F
Where to find Orchids and Ermine:
3×5 Perfect Pull Ups (lengthen, at least spend 15-20 seconds on the bar) followed by:
Jolee "Bling" Adhesive Rhinestones
Both Kate Bain and Julia Hunter have found happiness with men who are significantly their senior – or so it seems. Kate, who has been with the academic James for eight years, but refused to marry him, finds herself restless and unhappy, for seemingly little reason. She lives in James’ big house, working part time as a waitress and volunteering at a shelter for abused women but she sees a need for independence. To have a space that is hers, or hers and her daughter Joss’. She knows that she’s making James unhappy with her retreating but she can’t really think about other people right now. All she wants is a chance to be on her own and make her own way. Her daughter Joss has other ideas though. At fourteen, James’ house is her home, she has lived there since she was six. She has no desire to move out of her nice bedroom into a bedsit or rooms rented from someone else. She wants to stay with James and his cantankerous uncle Leonard, who lives in the house also, no matter what her mother says.
slightly-cool-green-based-white-that-will-work-with-your-red-pottery-collection
I want to laugh and cry and snuggle and dance.
What will be will be, yet when my thoughts go to him I want them
red and black
This is a dredge line. You take something prepared to cook and then prepare it to fry! Now these contain a good amount of garlic... Garlic Tip: Once you have a naked garlic clove ready to chop, slice it in half length ways, make sure there is no part in the center of the garlic that is turning green, or thinking of turning green. If you find a bit that is greenish, simply dig it out and discard. That junk is bitter like you wouldn't believe! Then chop the rest, because its fine. Now, don't be confused by the order of the dishes in the picture: Olive in flour, then egg, then breadcrumbs (I like pulverizing Ritz crackers, choose your own breadcrumb...EZ prep: buy a package of breadcrumbs)
I need to remember to put a coin or something next time I take a photo as it helps with the sizing. My MIL saw it in person for the first time a few weeks back and commented on how she really wasn't sure what it's sizing was or how tiny the stitches were from just seeing it on my blog. Noted to myself to do that next time.
It's time to watch the children grow up
The atmosphere was nice. It was a super tiny family owned place. The waiter was so friendly! He gave us recommendations off the menu and then throughout the meal kept giving us suggestions for what to dip in which sauce, asking us if we liked it, generally chatting us up. We of course loved it. Colby got fried egg rolls, I got some sort of plate with lots of super delicious chicken, shrimp, and broken rice (“comfort food” as our waiter said), and we got some spring rolls to share.
-You seemed to write this work rather quickly.
Serve with your favorite mashed potatoes and roasted root vegetable.
Asked for an assessment of the new exhaust configuration tried for the first time today, Fernando’s first response was curt: “There’s no difference in terms of driving compared to the one I tried on Tuesday,” before going into more detail: “The exhausts are not the critical area this year, which can be seen from the fact that so far, cars with different configurations have won and, in Bahrain for example, the Red Bull won with the downward facing exhausts, but the quickest car on track was the Lotus, which has straight ones.”
feasting my eyes on more glimpses of her (come to think of it, that sounds
05 Dance It Away
“He’s right here,” Sid said and held the phone toward Johnny.
After an exhausting day of driving and sightseeing, we put up our tent in the campsite, packing up again extremely early the next morning to continue on the seemingly endless road north.. We were rewarded on this day when we crossed the Tropic of Capricorn - finally approaching our own more familiar latitudes - still a long way to go, though!!
Main determinants of health and illness depend more upon lifestyle, socio-cultural environment and psychological (personal) factors than they do on biological status and conventional healthcare
Jonah Hex comes across several wagons of settlers that have been slaughtered by Indians and examines the arrows and the footprints.
Oscar Wilde said, "Man is least himself when he talks in his own person. Give him a mask, and he will tell you the truth."
You know, I thought I’d be ready for this. I knew it was coming, yet I’m a mess. I thank God for providing me such a wonderful pet for so many years. I also feel a responsibility for George to be a good steward of the gift God gave me.
They wouldn't issue us a check right then and there and said we would have to call another number to request that we get a reimbursement. I called the next day and let them know it was ridiculous that I had to call and request my money be reimbursed in the first place. I got the run-around and was told that since it was "such a small amount" I was continually put on the end of the reimbursement list because they always pay from the largest amount to smallest. So I guess until nobody else had a reimbursement due more than $240 we weren't getting ours?! I probably made 15 phone calls and waited almost 4 months before we finally got the money that they had owed us for almost 2 years!
Translator’s introduction
People smiled to see them playing in the park, inseparable as father and son. Ed began taking Gully with him on business trips. Together, they explored Canada, Greenland, Morocco – wherever his writing assignments took them.
Adil’s Indian Chicken–
Zulily can ship packages to street address in the United States, including Alaska and Hawaii, plus all US territories and APO/FPO/DPO addresses. Note that packages containing liquids cannot be shipped outside of the contiguous United States. If you’re shipping to an APO/FPO address, you may need to call their service team to complete your order. If you’re shipping to a PO Box, Zulily may contact you for more information.
Di nash / Moon above … / 13
So, here they are.
9. My new job is preparing for me. It will be something that I enjoy and will be deliriously fulfilling.
Perhaps that’s the best. Perhaps that’s what we should be asking and hoping for ..not that the rest of the world knows what it’s like to go through what we do but that they understand they never can.
I hope you are able to join us this week for our "MASCULINE MONDAY" challenge - be sure to check out what the TS Dream Team has whipped up for your crafting pleasure! Happy crafting!
18. Football is a force that both unites and divides in Scotland. Every major conurbation has its own intense rivalry. In Edinburgh, it's between Heart of Midlothian and Hibernian. In Dundee, it's between Dundee and Dundee United. And in Glasgow, of course, it's between Celtic and Partick.
O nimble ensnarer of the silver overflow
2007: .247/.337/.494 with 6 homers
In our Department, we hosted an event for “Learn at Work” week last fall and we asked former Assistant Deputy Minister, John McWhinnine, to come talk to us about weathering change. As his words are still very timely, I’ve asked his permission to post a summary of this talk on this blog and he has kindly agreed.
We bought what we could, to help out as they are so desperately poor, but seriously, how many really badly done sets of postcards can you buy? Everything cost one dollar, leading to Angkor being called "The Dollar Store" by many who visit. There was also a temple where they did allow the kids in to sell, and our tour guide called it the Dollar Temple. Very hard to look at temples when kids hang on your knees and pull at you trying to sell you things, so I am glad that they are not allowed in to most of the sites now. I am not saying the kids weren't for the most part cute and charming and friendly, but we were there to see the sites and it is hard to see things when you are afraid of stepping on a child......
From the moment I met you, I knew you were a kindred spirit. One of the first times we spent together was just after D. started teaching. It a late spring evening and you and your family came to see us. You were still living over an hour away, and I remember that by the end of the night I was wishing very much that you lived closer—(I eventually got my wish!!)
When the bill was first drafted, the dictionary definition of severe had been considered adequate, he said.
The cats spend a fair amount of time, basking on top of the portable chicken "tractor." What happens if we let our hens free-range? Given the hunting prowess of the feral boys, I'm somewhat concerned. (Thanks for the pigeon feathers, kitties. I'm relieved that you didn't choose to "share" more generously.) Does anyone have any advice about the intersection of cats and chickens?
He was off the floor and down for a head CT by 2313, which isn't too bad, timing-wise. Things seemed to move much more quickly, and I was always surprised when I looked at my watch.
These are just the things that I think about alone in my head when no one is looking. Carson daily moderating a presidential american idol competition. It makes me laugh, and yet.. it doesn’t feel that far from the truth.
On the other hand, organizations do best when the people within them are carefully put in the right places. People are encouraged and fulfilled, growth is ensured, teamwork is increased and victories are secured. And, for leaders, there is a huge reward in seeing your players in the right place, doing the right thing for the right reasons.
‘Mr Sheridan asked the witness if he knew of Mr Goodman’s association with Greg Mulcaire. The witness told the court that he had never had any contact with Mr Mulcaire and had not even known his name until Mr Mulcaire had been arrested….Mr Sheridan then asked about a NotW journalist Dan Evans, and Mr Coulson agreed that he knew him. Mr Sheridan then asked the witness if he was aware that Mr Evans had been suspended for phone hacking. Mr Coulson replied that he was not aware of the details and had only seen newspaper reports…..Mr Sheridan then said that Steve Whittamore had been convicted in 2005 and this had happened “under your watch”. Mr Coulson said he had not been involved with Mr Whittamore “in any way, shape or form”……Mr Coulson also stated that Mr Whittamore’s services were used “across the industry, including the Guardian group….’
- Shortcrust pastry (1 'Jusroll' pack was good for 4)
Everyone had been aware that immigrants had been arriving since around the turn of the Millennium, particularly after May 2004, when Poland and other countries joined the European Union, but, until the census, the extent had not been grasped. The census also revealed that there were far more Africans (40,500) in Ireland than Irish Travellers (22,360) and that the number of Muslims in the republic (32,500) equalled the number of Presbyterians and Methodists combined!
- Limoux *
In the past, prince Yi Gak wants to hunt down his wife's killer, because he's certain her death was not an accident. Yi Gak puts together a serious team of investigators (Like CSI: Joseon-Era Korea), but due to some random time-travelling, the four guys materialize inside grown-up Park Ha's apartment in 2012 Korea, which freaks everyone out nicely. Hilarity ensues, and the hilarity is a jillion times better than the darker part of the drama. Park Ha bosses the historical guys around, but she's also kind to them, and things are about to get more complicated because Yi Gak gets discovered by the family of his own deceased doppelganger, Taeyong.
The premise to this is quite an intriguing one and the dystopian futuristic setting is wonderfully captured by the Coen brothers’ regular cinematographer Roger Deakins. It’s just a shame that with such a strong base to work from, it becomes nothing more than a chase thriller and abandons any attempt to delve into some possible existential theories. Even as a chase thriller, it lacks any form of excitement. It has it’s moments but ultimately the film takes too long in getting to it’s destination. Time is of the essence for it’s characters and ironically, it also gets taken from us, having to slog through this. I’m not Justin Trousersnake’s biggest fan, but he delivers a decent performance. However, the progression of his character as a future ‘Clyde’ to Seyfried’s ‘Bonnie’ is uneasy and a little hard to take. Cillian Murphy’s ‘Time keeper’ police officer is quite an intriguing one but he has little, to no, backstory. When we are given a glimpse into his character it’s too little too late. It’s this overwhelming feeling of emptiness that, as a whole, the film suffers from.
And law will become pretty much obsolete as beliefs and laws become intertwined.
Oh my! I must get my hands on this one too! It sounds fabulous.
The top 16 police comments taken off police car videos around the country:
when Ellie meets Will, she feels on the verge of remembering something just beyond her grasp. His attention is intense and romantic, and Ellie feels like her soul has known him for centuries. On her seventeenth birthday, on a dark street at midnight, Will awakens Ellie's power, and she knows that she can fight the creatures that stalk her in the grim darkness. Only Will holds the key to Ellie's memories, whole lifetimes of them, and when she looks at him, she can no longer pretend anything was just a dream.
It also helps that MatsuJun and Inoue Mao have fantastic chemistry and are straight-up beautiful (let’s not be naïve here – looks certainly help sell it). And it helps that both the manga and the drama go on FOREVER, which gives more than enough time to flesh out the relationship and the characters. I don’t know if Ikemen got this kind of treatment, but I know that HanaDan is the original and they did it best.
like an unprincipled flip-flopper
‘You’re single (ok, this was a statement, not a question) – me too, I have no time. Should I be getting married?’
Seriously though, the research that I have done in the past, makes me realize that fear drives a lot of people. Someone had to start the superstition, right? I think any one of them could have started just like this:
Welcome to day 4 and WOW...this week is going fast!
between our two countries. In this specific case we have made clear
THE relationship between business and the public has become closer in the past few decades. Business to-day is taking the public into partnership. A number of causes, some economic, others due to the growing public understanding of business and the public interest in business, have produced this situation. Business realizes that its relationship to the public is not confined to the manufacture and sale of a given product, but includes at the same time the selling of itself and of all those things for which it stands in the public mind. Twenty or twenty-five years ago, business sought to run its own affairs regardless of the public. The reaction was the muck-raking period, in which a multitude of sins were, justly and unjustly, laid to the charge of the interests. In the face of an aroused public conscience the large corporations were obliged to renounce their contention that their affairs were nobody's business. If to-day big business were to seek to throttle the public, a new reaction similar to that of twenty years ago would take place and the public would rise and try to throttle big business with restrictive laws. Business is conscious of the public's conscience. This consciousness has led to a healthy cooperation. Another cause for the increasing relationship is undoubtedly to be found in the various phenomena growing out of mass production. Mass production is only profitable if its rhythm can be maintained— that is, if it can continue to sell its product in steady or increasing quantity. The result is that while, under the handicraft or small-unit system of production that was typical a century ago, demand created the supply, to-day supply must actively seek to create its corresponding demand. A single factory, potentially capable of supplying a whole continent with its particular product, cannot afford to wait until the public asks for its product; it must maintain constant touch, through advertising and propaganda, with the vast public in order to assure itself the continuous demand which alone will make its costly plant profitable. This entails a vastly more complex system of distribution than formerly. To make customers is the new problem. One must understand not only his own business—the manufacture of a particular product—but also the structure, the personality, the prejudices, of a potentially universal public. Still another reason is to be found in the improvements in the technique of advertising—as regards both the size of the public which can be reached by the printed word, and the methods of appeal. The growth of newspapers and magazines having a circulation of millions of copies, and the art of the modern advertising expert in making the printed message attractive and persuasive, have placed the business man in a personal relation with a vast and diversified public. Another modern phenomenon, which' influences the general policy of big business, is the new competition between certain firms and the remainder of the industry, to which they belong. Another kind of competition is between whole industries, in their struggle for a share of the consumer's dollar. When, for example, a soap manufacturer claims that his product will preserve youth, he is obviously attempting to change the public's mode of thinking about soap in general—a thing of grave importance to the whole industry. Or when the metal furniture industry seeks to convince the public that it is more desirable to spend its money for metal furniture than for wood furniture, it is clearly seeking to alter the taste and standards of a whole generation. In either case, business is seeking to inject itself into the lives and customs of millions of persons. Even in a basic sense, business is becoming dependent on public opinion. With the increasing volume and wider diffusion of wealth in America, thousands of persons now invest in industrial stocks. New stock or bond flotations, upon which an expanding business must depend for its success, can be effected only if the concern has understood how to gain the confidence and good will of the general public. Business must express itself and its entire corporate existence so that the public will understand and accept it. It must dramatize its personality and interpret its objectives in every particular in which it comes into contact with the community (or the nation) of which it is a part. An oil corporation which truly understands its many-sided relation to the public, will offer that public not only good oil but a sound labor policy. A bank will seek to show not only that its management is sound and conservative, but also that its officers are honorable both in their public and in their private life. A store specializing in fashionable men's clothing will express in its architecture the authenticity of the goods it offers. A bakery will seek to impress the public with the hygienic care observed in its manufacturing process, not only by wrapping its loaves in dust-proof paper and throwing its factory open to public inspection, but also by the cleanliness and attractiveness of its delivery wagons. A construction firm will take care that the public knows not only that its buildings are durable and safe, but also that its employees, when injured at work, are compensated. At whatever point a business enterprise impinges on the public consciousness, it must seek to give its public relations the particular character which will conform to the objectives which it is pursuing. Just as the production manager must be familiar with every element and detail concerning the materials with which he is working, so the man in charge of a firm's public relations must be familiar with the structure, the prejudices, and the whims of the general public, and must handle his problems with the utmost care. The public has its own standards and demands and habits. You may modify them, but you dare not run counter to them. You cannot persuade a whole generation of women to wear long skirts, but you may, by working through leaders of fashion, persuade them to wear evening dresses which are long in back. The public is not an amorphous mass which can be molded at will, or dictated to. Both business and the public have their own personalities which must somehow be brought into friendly agreement. Conflict and suspicion are injurious to both. Modern business must study on what terms the partnership can be made amicable and mutually beneficial. It must explain itself, its aims, its objectives, to the public in terms which the public can understand and is willing to accept. Business does not willingly accept dictation from the public. It should not expect that it can dictate to the public. While the public should appreciate the great economic benefits which business offers, thanks to mass production and scientific marketing, business should also appreciate that the public is becoming increasingly discriminative in its standards and should seek to understand its demands and meet them. The relationship between business and the public can be healthy only if it is the relationship of give and take. It is this condition and necessity which has created the need for a specialized field of public relations. Business now calls in the public relations counsel to advise it, to interpret its purpose to the public, and to suggest those modifications which may make it conform to the public demand. The modifications then recommended to make the business conform to its objectives and to the public demand, may concern the broadest matters of policy or the apparently most trivial details of execution. It might in one case be necessary to transform entirely the lines of goods sold to conform to changing public demands. In another case the trouble may be found to lie in such small matters as the dress of the clerks. A jewelry store may complain that its patronage is shrinking upwards because of its reputation for carrying high-priced goods; in this case the public relations counsel might suggest the featuring of medium-priced goods, even at a loss, not because the firm desires a large medium-price trade as such, but because out of a hundred medium-price customers acquired to-day a certain percentage will be well-todo ten years from now. A department store which is seeking to gather in the high-class trade may be urged to employ college graduates as clerks or to engage well known modern artists to design show-windows or special exhibits. A bank may be urged to open a Fifth Avenue branch, not because the actual business done on Fifth Avenue warrants the expense, but because a beautiful Fifth Avenue office correctly expresses the kind of appeal which it wishes to make to future depositors; and, viewed in this way, it may be as important that the doorman be polite, or that the floors be kept clean, as that the branch manager be an able financier. Yet the beneficial effect of this branch may be canceled, if the wife of the president is involved in a scandal. Big business studies every move which may express its true personality. It seeks to tell the public, in all appropriate ways,—by the direct advertising message and by the subtlest esthetic suggestion—the quality of the goods or services which it has to offer. A store which seeks a large sales volume in cheap goods will preach prices day in and day out, concentrating its whole appeal on the ways in which it can save money for its clients. But a store seeking a high margin of profit on individual sales would try to associate itself with the distinguished and the elegant, whether by an exhibition of old masters or through the social activities of the owner's wife. The public relations activities of a business cannot be a protective coloring to hide its real aims. It is bad business as well as bad morals to feature exclusively a few high-class articles, when the main stock is of medium grade or cheap, for the general impression given is a false one. A sound public relations policy will not attempt to stampede the public with exaggerated claims and false pretenses, but to interpret the individual business vividly and truly through every avenue that leads to public opinion. The New York Central Railroad has for decades sought to appeal to the public not only on the basis of the speed and safety of its trains, but also on the basis of their elegance and comfort. It is appropriate that the corporation should have been personified to the general public in the person of so suave and ingratiating a gentleman as Chauncey M. Depew—an ideal window dressing for such an enterprise. While the concrete recommendations of the public relations counsel may vary infinitely according to individual circumstances, his general plan of work may be reduced to two types, which I might term continuous interpretation and dramatization by highspotting. The two may be alternative or may be pursued concurrently. Continuous interpretation is achieved by trying to control every approach to the public mind in such a manner that the public receives the desired impression, often without being conscious of it. High-spotting, on the other hand, vividly seizes the attention of the public and fixes it upon some detail or aspect which is typical of the entire enterprise. When a real estate corporation which is erecting a tall office building makes it ten feet taller than the highest sky-scraper in existence, that is dramatization. Which method is indicated, or whether both be indicated concurrently, can be determined only after a full study of objectives and specific possibilities. Another interesting case of focusing public attention on the virtues of a product was shown in the case of gelatine. Its advantages in increasing the digestibility and nutritional value of milk were proven in the Mellon Institute of Industrial Research. The suggestion was made and carried out that to further this knowledge, gelatine be used by certain hospitals and school systems, to be tested out there. The favorable results of such tests were then projected to other leaders in the field with the result that they followed that group leadership and utilized gelatine for the scientific purposes which had been proven to be sound at the research institution. The idea carried momentum. The tendency of big business is to get bigger. Through mergers and monopolies it is constantly increasing the number of persons with whom it is in direct contact. All this has intensified and multiplied the public relationships of business. The responsibilities are of many kinds. There is a responsibility to the stockholders—numbering perhaps five persons or five hundred thousand—who have entrusted their money to the concern and have the right to know how the money is being used. A concern which is fully aware of its responsibility toward its stockholders, will furnish them with frequent letters urging them to use the product in which their money is invested, and use their influence to promote its sale. It has a responsibility toward the dealer which it may express by inviting him, at its expense, to visit the home factory. It has a responsibility toward the industry as a whole which should restrain it from making exaggerated and unfair selling claims. It has a responsibility toward the retailer, and will see to it that its salesmen express the quality of the product which they have to sell. There is a responsibility toward the consumer, who is impressed by a clean and well managed factory, open to his inspection. And the general public, apart from its function as potential consumer, is influenced in its attitude toward the concern by what it knows of that concern's financial dealings, its labor policy, even by the livableness of the houses in which its employees dwell. There is no detail too trivial to influence the public in a favorable or unfavorable sense. The personality of the president may be a matter of importance, for he perhaps dramatizes the whole concern to the public mind. It may be very important to what charities he contributes, in what civic societies he holds office. If he is a leader in his industry, the public may demand that he be a leader in his community. The business man has become a responsible member of the social group. It is not a question of ballyhoo, of creating a picturesque fiction for public consumption. It is merely a question of finding the appropriate modes of expressing the personality that is to be dramatized. Some business men can be their own best public relations counsel. But in the majority of cases knowledge of the public mind and of the ways in which it will react to an appeal, is a specialized function which must be undertaken by the professional expert. Big business, I believe, is realizing this more and more. It is increasingly availing itself of the services of the specialist in public relations (whatever may be the title accorded him). And it is my conviction that as big business becomes bigger the need for expert manipulation of its innumerable contacts with the public will become greater. One reason why the public relations of a business are frequently placed in the hands of an outside expert, instead of being confided to an officer of the company, is the fact that the correct approach to a problem may be indirect. For example, when the luggage industry attempted to solve some of its problems by a public relations policy, it was realized that the attitude of railroads, of steamship companies, and of foreign government-owned railroads was an important factor in the handling of luggage. If a railroad and a baggage man, for their own interest, can be educated to handle baggage with more facility and promptness, with less damage to the baggage, and less inconvenience to the passenger; if the steamship company lets down, in its own interests, its restrictions on luggage; if the foreign government eases up on its baggage costs and transportation in order to further tourist travel; then the luggage manufacturers will profit. The problem then, to increase the sale of their luggage, was to have these and other forces come over to their point of view. Hence the public relations campaign was directed not to the public, who were the ultimate consumers, but to these other elements. Also, if the luggage manufacturer can educate the general public on what to wear on trips and when to wear it, he may be increasing the sale of men's and women's clothing, but he will, at the same time, be increasing the sale of his luggage. Propaganda, since it goes to basic causes, can very often be most effective through the manner of its introduction. A campaign against unhealthy cosmetics might be waged by fighting for a return to the wash-cloth and soap—a fight that very logically might be taken up by health officials all over the country, who would urge the return to the salutary and helpful wash-cloth and soap, instead of cosmetics. The development of public opinion for a cause or line of socially constructive action may very often be the result of a desire on the part of the propagandist to meet successfully his own problem which the socially constructive cause would further. And by doing so he is actually fulfilling a social purpose in the broadest sense. The soundness of a public relations policy was likewise shown in the case of a shoe manufacturer who made service shoes for patrolmen, firemen, letter carriers, and men in similar occupations. He realized that if he could make acceptable the idea that men in such work ought to be well-shod, he would sell more shoes and at the same time further the efficiency of the men. He organized, as part of his business, a foot protection bureau. This bureau disseminated scientifically accurate information on the proper care of the feet, principles which the manufacturer had incorporated in the construction of the shoes. The result was that civic bodies, police chiefs, fire chiefs, and others interested in the welfare and comfort of their men, furthered the ideas his product stood for and the product itself, with the consequent effect that more of his shoes were sold more easily. The application of this principle of a common denominator of interest between the object that is sold and the public good will can be carried to infinite degrees. "It matters not how much capital you may have, how fair the rates may be, how favorable the conditions of service, if you haven't behind you a sympathetic public opinion, you are bound to fail." This is the opinion of Samuel Insull, one the foremost traction magnates of the country. And the late Judge Gary, of the United States Steel Corporation, expressed the same idea when he said: "Once you have the good will of the general public, you can go ahead in the work of constructive expansion. Too often many try to discount this vague and intangible element. That way lies destruction." Public opinion is no longer inclined to be unfavorable to the large business merger. It resents the censorship of business by the Federal Trade Commission. It has broken down the anti-trust laws where it thinks they hinder economic development. It backs great trusts and mergers which it excoriated a decade ago. The government now permits large aggregations of producing and distributing units, as evidenced by mergers among railroads and other public utilities, because representative government reflects public opinion. Public opinion itself fosters the growth of mammoth industrial enterprises. In the opinion of millions of small investors, mergers and trusts are friendly giants and not ogres, because of the economies, mainly due to quantity production, which they have effected, and can pass on to the consumer. This result has been, to a great extent, obtained by a deliberate use of propaganda in its broadest sense. It was obtained not only by modifying the opinion of the public, as the governments modified and marshaled the opinion of their publics during the war, but often by modifying the business concern itself. A cement company may work with road commissions gratuitously to maintain testing laboratories in order to insure the best-quality roads to the public. A gas company maintains a free school of cookery. But it would be rash and unreasonable to take it for granted that because public opinion has come over to the side of big business, it will always remain there. Only recently, Prof. W. Z. Ripley of Harvard University, one of the foremost national authorities on business organization and practice, exposed certain aspects of big business which tended to undermine public confidence in large corporations. He pointed out that the stockholders' supposed voting power is often illusory; that annual financial statements are sometimes so brief and summary that to the man in the street they are downright misleading; that the extension of the system of non-voting shares often places the effective control of corporations and their finances in the hands of a small clique of stockholders; and that some corporations refuse to give out sufficient information to permit the public to know the true condition of the concern. Furthermore, no matter how favorably disposed the public may be toward big business in general, the utilities are always fair game for public discontent and need to maintain good will with the greatest care and watchfulness. These and other corporations of a semi-public character will always have to face a demand for government or municipal ownership if such attacks as those of Professor Ripley are continued and are, in the public's opinion, justified, unless conditions are changed and care is taken to maintain the contact with the public at all points of their corporate existence. The public relations counsel should anticipate such trends of public opinion and advise on how to avert them, either by convincing the public that its fears or prejudices are unjustified, or in certain cases by modifying the action of the client to the extent necessary to remove the cause of complaint. In such a case public opinion might be surveyed and the points of irreducible opposition discovered. The aspects of the situation which are susceptible of logical explanation; to what extent the criticism or prejudice is a habitual emotional reaction and what factors are dominated by accepted cliches, might be disclosed. In each instance he would advise some action or modification of policy calculated to make the readjustment. While government ownership is in most instances only varyingly a remote possibility, public ownership of big business through the increasing popular investment in stocks and bonds, is becoming more and more a fact. The importance of public relations from this standpoint is to be judged by the fact that practically all prosperous corporations expect at some time to enlarge operations, and will need to float new stock or bond issues. The success of such issues depends upon the general record of the concern in the business world, and also upon the good will which it has been able to create in the general public. When the Victor Talking Machine Company was recently offered to the public, millions of dollars' worth of stock were sold overnight. On the other hand, there are certain companies which, although they are financially sound and commercially prosperous, would be unable to float a large stock issue, because public opinion is not conscious of them, or has some unanalyzed prejudice against them. To such an extent is the successful floating of stocks and bonds dependent upon the public favor that the success of a new merger may stand or fall upon the public acceptance which is created for it. A merger may bring into existence huge new resources, and these resources, perhaps amounting to millions of dollars in a single operation, can often fairly be said to have been created by the expert manipulation of public opinion. It must be repeated that I am not speaking of artificial value given to a stock by dishonest propaganda or stock manipulation, but of the real economic values which are created when genuine public acceptance is gained for an industrial enterprise and becomes a real partner in it. The growth of big business is so rapid that in some lines ownership is more international than national. It is necessary to reach ever larger groups of people if modern industry and commerce are to be financed. Americans have purchased billions of dollars of foreign industrial securities since the war, and Europeans own, it is estimated, between one and two billion dollars' worth of ours. In each case public acceptance must be obtained for the issue and the enterprise behind it. Public loans, state or municipal, to foreign countries depend upon the good will which those countries have been able to create for themselves here. An attempted issue by an east European country is now faring badly largely because of unfavorable public reaction to the behavior of members of its ruling family. But other countries have no difficulty in placing any issue because the public is already convinced of the prosperity of these nations and the stability of their governments. The new technique of public relations counsel is serving a very useful purpose in business by acting as a complement to legitimate advertisers and advertising in helping to break down unfair competitive exaggerated and overemphatic advertising by reaching the public with the truth through other channels than advertising. Where two competitors in a field are fighting each other with this type of advertising, they are undermining that particular industry to a point where the public may lose confidence in the whole industry. The only way to combat such unethical methods, is for ethical members of the industry to use the weapon of propaganda in order to bring out the basic truths of the situation. Take the case of tooth paste, for instance. Here is a highly competitive field in which the preponderance of public acceptance of one product over another can very legitimately rest in inherent values. However, what has happened in this field? One or two of the large manufacturers have asserted advantages for their tooth pastes which no single tooth paste discovered up to the present time can possibly have. The competing manufacturer is put in the position either of overemphasizing an already exaggerated emphasis or of letting the overemphasis of his competitor take away his markets. He turns to the weapon of propaganda which can effectively, through various channels of approach to the public—the dental clinics, the schools, the women's clubs, the medical colleges, the dental press and even the daily press—bring to the public the truth of what a tooth paste can do. This will, of course, have its effect in making the honestly advertised tooth paste get to its real public. Propaganda is potent in meeting unethical or unfair advertising. Effective advertising has become more costly than ever before. Years ago, when the country was smaller and there was no tremendous advertising machinery, it was comparatively easy to get country-wide recognition for a product. A corps of traveling salesmen might persuade the retailers, with a few cigars and a repertory of funny stories, to display and recommend their article on a nationwide scale. To-day, a small industry is swamped unless it can find appropriate and relatively inexpensive means of making known the special virtues of its product, while larger industries have sought to overcome the difficulty by cooperative advertising, in which associations of industries compete with other associations. Mass advertising has produced new kinds of competition. Competition between rival products in the same line is, of course, as old as economic life itself. In recent years much has been said of the new competition, we have discussed it in a previous chapter, between one group of products and another. Stone competes against wood for building; linoleum against carpets; oranges against apples; tin against asbestos for roofing. This type of competition has been humorously illustrated by Mr. O. H. Cheney, Vice-President of the American Exchange and Irving Trust Company of New York, in a speech before the Chicago Business Secretaries Forum. "Do you represent the millinery trades?" said Mr. Cheney. "The man at your side may serve the fur industry, and by promoting the style of big fur collars on women's coats he is ruining the hat business by forcing women to wear small and inexpensive hats. You may be interested in the ankles of the fair sex—I mean, you may represent the silk hosiery industry. You have two brave rivals who are ready to fight to the death—to spend millions in the fight —for the glory of those ankles—the leather industry, which has suffered from the low-shoe vogue, and the fabrics manufacturers, who yearn for the good old days when skirts were skirts. "If you represent the plumbing and heating business, you are the mortal enemy of the textile industry, because warmer homes mean lighter clothes. If you represent the printers, how can you shake hands with the radio equipment man? . . . "These are really only obvious forms of what I have called the new competition. The old competition was that between the members of each trade organization. One phase of the new competition is that between the trade associations themselves—between you gentlemen who represent those industries. Inter-commodity competition is the new competition between products used alternatively for the same purpose. Inter-industrial competition is the new competition between apparently unrelated industries which affect each other or between such industries as compete for the consumer's dollar—and that means practically all industries. . . . "Inter-commodity competition is, of course, the most spectacular of all. It is the one which seems most of all to have caught the business imagination of the country. More and more business men are beginning to appreciate what inter-commodity competition means to them. More and more they are calling upon their trade associations to help them— because inter-commodity competition cannot be fought single-handed. "Take the great war on the dining-room table, for instance. Three times a day practically every diningroom table in the country is the scene of a fierce battle in the new competition. Shall we have prunes for breakfast? No, cry the embattled orange-growers and the massed legions of pineapple canners. Shall we eat sauerkraut? Why not eat green olives? is the answer of the Spaniards. Eat macaroni as a change from potatoes, says one advertiser—and will the potato growers take this challenge lying down? "The doctors and dietitians tell us that a normal hard-working man needs only about two or three thousand calories of food a day. A banker, I suppose, needs a little less. But what am I to do? The fruit growers, the wheat raisers, the meat packers, the milk producers, the fishermen—all want me to eat more of their products—and are spending millions of dollars a year to convince me. Am I to eat to the point of exhaustion, or am I to obey the doctor and let the farmer and the food packer and the retailer go broke! Am I to balance my diet in proportion to the advertising appropriations of the various producers? Or am I to balance my diet scientifically and let those who overproduce go bankrupt? The new competition is probably keenest in the food industries because there we have a very real limitation on what we can consume—in spite of higher incomes and higher living standards, we cannot eat more than we can eat." I believe that competition in the future will not be only an advertising competition between individual products or between big associations, but that it will in addition be a competition of propaganda. The business man and advertising man is realizing that he must not discard entirely the methods of Barnum in reaching the public. An example in the annals of George Harrison Phelps, of the successful utilization of this type of appeal was the nation-wide hook-up which announced the launching of the Dodge Victory Six car. Millions of people, it is estimated, listened in to this program broadcast over 47 stations. The expense was more than $60,000. The arrangements involved an additional telephonic hook-up of 20,000 miles of wire, and included transmission from Los Angeles, Chicago, Detroit, New Orleans, and New York. Al Jolson did his bit from New Orleans, Will Rogers from Beverly Hills, Fred and Dorothy Stone from Chicago, and Paul Whiteman from New York, at an aggregate artists' fee of $25,000. And there was included a four-minute address by the president of Dodge Brothers announcing the new car, which gave him access in four minutes to an estimated audience of thirty million Americans, the largest number, unquestionably, ever to concentrate their attention on a given commercial product at a given moment. It was a sugar-coated sales message. Modern sales technicians will object: "What you say of this method of appeal is true. But it increases the cost of getting the manufacturer's message across. The modern tendency has been to reduce this cost (for example, the elimination of premiums) and concentrate on getting full efficiency from the advertising expenditure. If you hire a Galli-Curci to sing for bacon you increase the cost of the bacon by the amount of her very large fee. Her voice adds nothing to the product but it adds to its cost." Undoubtedly. But all modes of sales appeal require the spending of money to make the appeal attractive. The advertiser in print adds to the cost of his message by the use of pictures or by the cost of getting distinguished endorsements. There is another kind of difficulty, created in the process of big business getting bigger, which calls for new modes of establishing contact with the public. Quantity production offers a standardized product the cost of which tends to diminish with the quantity sold. If low price is the only basis of competition with rival products, similarly produced, there ensues a cut-throat competition which can end only by taking all the profit and incentive out of the industry. The logical way out of this dilemma is for the manufacturer to develop some sales appeal other than mere cheapness, to give the product, in the public mind, some other attraction, some idea that will modify the product slightly, some element of originality that will distinguish it from products in the same line. Thus, a manufacturer of typewriters paints his machines in cheerful hues. These special types of appeal can be popularized by the manipulation of the principles familiar to the propagandist— the principles of gregariousness, obedience to authority, emulation, and the like. A minor element can be made to assume economic importance by being established in the public mind as a matter of style. Mass production can be split up. Big business will still leave room for small business. Next to a huge department store there may be located a tiny specialty shop which makes a very good living. The problem of bringing large hats back into fashion was undertaken by a propagandist. The millinery industry two years ago was menaced by the prevalence of the simple felt hat which was crowding out the manufacture of all other kinds of hats and hat ornaments. It was found that hats could roughly be classified in six types. It was found too that four groups might help to change hat fashions: the society leader, the style expert, the fashion editor and writer, the artist who might give artistic approval to the styles, and beautiful mannequins. The problem, then, was to bring these groups together before an audience of hat buyers. A committee of prominent artists was organized to choose the most beautiful girls in New York to wear, in a series of tableaux, the most beautiful hats in the style classifications, at a fashion fete at a leading hotel. A committee was formed of distinguished American women who, on the basis of their interest in the development of an American industry, were willing to add the authority of their names to the idea. A style committee was formed of editors of fashion magazines and other prominent fashion authorities who were willing to support the idea. The girls in their lovely hats and costumes paraded on the running-board before an audience of the entire trade. The news of the event affected the buying habits not only of the onlookers, but also of the women throughout the country. The story of the event was flashed to the consumer by her newspaper as well as by the advertisements of her favorite store. Broadsides went to the millinery buyer from the manufacturer. One manufacturer stated that whereas before the show he had not sold any large trimmed hats, after it he had sold thousands. Often the public relations counsel is called in to handle an emergency situation. A false rumor, for instance, may occasion an enormous loss in prestige and money if not handled promptly and effectively. An incident such as the one described in the New York American of Friday, May 21, 1926, shows what the lack of proper technical handling of public relations might result in.
The show's stunning line up included : Snappy O'Shea, Fanny Devine, Scarlett Daggers, Carrie Ann and our host Em Brulee!
Today is the day that I give up hounding myself over chores undone.
Of course she has not changed her story for the past 20 years in which she claims I would be happier if I gave up the arts for the security of a corporate job. I really don’t think she is aware of the economic crisis facing the US and that the idea of her almost 50-year-old daughter competing in the corporate world with a liberal arts degree is really fantasy on her part.
AC/DC
p301-3 “Iain Spence published Sekhmet Hypothesis: The Signals of the Beginning of a New Identity as a book in 1995… As an illuminating way of reconsidering the familiar, I’m particularly fond of the Sekhmet Hypothesis, which never fails to get people talking at parties. As usual, please remember that this is just a framework; a way of ordering information into meaningful patterns in the service of creative lateral thinking, if you like…
The first thing that might catch your eye about the Rhodia dotPad are the heavy duty staples and score lines along the top. They give the appearance of a sturdy product, and indeed, the Rhodia dotPad exceptionally sturdy. Both front and back have a soft-cover, and the back has a strong cardboard piece to add stability and strength.
We've got quite a bit on the go at the moment and we're struggling to figure out when we're actually going to have time to DO all of it but don't you worry your pretty little head. It'll happen, dammit. Oh yes it will.
The police asked Mr Walker to remove his vehicle from the entrance to the building, claiming it was blocking the way.
The only problem with this revelation is that it’s false. If the reporter for AOL had taken time to read just the abstract for the Pediatrics article she may have seen the heading “CONCLUSIONS” (in all caps) and noted this summary:
Are these aims in line with the views of most Minnesota voters?
I hope you have a Happy Passover too! God Bless.
My chalk paint came today at exactly 4:04pm, and by 10:30pm I had painted my table, a chair and my couch cabinet table thing-a-ma-jig and managed to go out to dinner with my dad. Thanks to a wonderful husband who watched the kiddos for me!
However, we'd like to warmly welcome three new members: Jim, Sam, and Eric. It seems both the place mat ad and the Gazette article were effective recruitment ventures!
Those few minutes of bliss as you wake up are the best – before you realise you have to tame those tresses for the day ahead – but with some confidence this look is easily taken from day to night. In his SS/12 collection, Central St. Martins alumni slash Brummy boy Yousefzada Osman of ‘Osman’ label added a quiff, and slicked back the sides with a little wet-look hair glaze. He generated a look that turned the wearer in to a streamlined feline for the evening – a seriously low-maintenance way to approach the fob.
I've been running some searches in the blogosphere, and came across some interesting old stuff in the community. This post got me thinking once again about my issues with the millions of experience points needed to reach high levels in D&D.
The thought of the increased intensity level I know I need to work at to get to my goal!! Also the thought of my wedding part way through this round, and being out of my normal routine for about a week!! Will be doing lots of planning for that soon though to ensure I stay right on track!
Salt (individual sachets)
Speaking of Obama, I must confess that I long for the early days of his administration when it was simply the content of his speeches that made me nauseous. But I guess he got tired of being teased about having to rely on teleprompters to say "Good evening," because, of late, as if to pretend he is speaking off the cuff, he has begun swiveling his head like a metronome every few seconds.
Peter Goonan was there from the paper and Belle-Rita Novak waved then came over and we chatted for a bit. She said she saw Larry McDermott lurking inside the City Council office, probably in the role of a lobbyist for David Starr. In the end the Council voted in favor of the library takeover by a vote of 8-1, the sole no vote being cast by William Foley to a chorus of boos. Although they voted yes on the final vote, Jose Tosado, Bud Williams, Bill Foley and Tim Rooke tried unsuccessfully to kill the measure by sending it back to committee.
By the time my father started cavorting with women—say when he was around
1/4 cup flat leaf parsley leaves, chopped
fabric used this year: -117.5 yards
I was once told that English and American fantasy is so popular in Germany that even German fantasy writers adopt Anglo-sounding names to improve their publishing chances - can this be true?
Sent: Wednesday, April 04, 2012 11:16 AM
...those girls with that kind of appeal."
The letter points to the murder of a 40-year-old firefighter named William Davern Jr. in 1928. Davern, the son of a police sergeant, was shot in a bar fight by members of Moran’s gang and left for dead on a street corner. He held on for six weeks in the hospital, in which time he told his cousin, the notorious gunman/bank robber William White, who his attackers were. White swore revenge for his cousin’s murder.
Of course the wild man never gives without taking, usually what he takes is the equivalent of burning the bridge behind you, creating a block so you can never return to civilization without completing your quest. After the night of her big O, Brad absconds with Thelma and Louise's money, but leaves them a magical tool to get some more -- a gun. Pitt's performance in the film is nothing short of alchemical magic - it made him a star overnight. For a hot minute we all wanted to get "robbed" by Brad Pitt.
It occurs to me, as the weekend of celebrating Lucy's first birthday comes to a close, that I never shared Lucy's actual birth story from one year ago. For some of you, this is not what you'd consider interesting reading... but for my mama friends and curious onlookers, I'm taking my "flashback Friday" spot and dedicating it to reminiscing about that one day in the hospital, the day Joe and I greeted our daughter and welcomed her to the world. (Is anyone else in LOVE with birth stories? I love them!)
“Happy Birthday to you, Happy Birthday to you, Happy Birthday, dear Vickie, Happy Birthday to you…and many more…..on channel four…..and out the door…..like Zsa Zsa Gabor…….” Seriously?
And, Nancy Yates and I creating a poe-ga workshop, to be held near Ashby BART in two weeks. Please come! Rumi--you might roll your eyes, but he re-translates your rotater cuff, I promise. See details here: http://writetoconnect.blogspot.com/2012/03/poetry-in-motion-yogawrite-to-connect.html
And now I'm a zoo-keeper.
This was a really good show for the Dead. I am from Lexington so I know they were probably playing to just a few thousand fans inside a huge 24,000 capacity seating arena. I guess that’s what they mean when they say their were plenty of seats down in the front. This was the first time the Dead ever played Lexington and it would also be their last time. That’s too bad, I wish I knew why.
And while this is a cute little product I don't know that I would go out and get one every time the pacifier gets worn out.
Add the dry ingredients to the wet and mix gently with a wooden spoon. Using a large cake tin (mine was silicone, so no need to line but I sprayed with a little oil) line the base with the pear slices to form a circular pattern.
Now here is another example of our PDRM thugs getting caught.
In full disclosure, this bundt was a Frankenstein bundt! I unmolded the cake when the recipe said I could, but it was so steamy and delicate that I totally cracked it into several pieces trying to get it onto my cake carrier! Good thing the frosting covered up all the seams!
Those were the good 'ol days wasn't it? When Duncan Hines and Betty Crocker were always welcome to the after-dinner party in our mouth. Ahh the silky texture of high fructose corn syrup and natural color #14c. Of course key lime icing should be bright green. That just means the cows who made the butter had green spots on them! What's that? Duncan Hines doesn't list butter as an ingredient in their buttercream? Hmm. Ignorance is bliss. These days, the only thing better than using fresh brown speckled eggs from a happily roaming hen and unashamedly fatty butter or milk from a healthy grazing cow, is getting to see those chickens and holsters up close and thank them in person. Little did they know they'd be taking part in one of the most deliciously divine cakes of all time.
Got the tire changed, got the car repacked, (left a bottle of Reisling for the folks whose driveway we used, hope they aren't recovering alcoholics) and got going again. I crashed out in the back seat using the pillow Mom had brought for me. I'd been awake for 27 hours now.
“Working with Brian is good, I’m happy to be on the show, I think Calgary will have a positive reaction to me. Everyone in Calgary is pretty nice and just to have a person from Calgary, the only one from Alberta on the show I feel like the Calgary audience will accept me and I don’t do anything malicious or mean so I think the viewers will be proud.”
I could have split this into two posts, but since I think it's more useful and easier to understand things in context, I decided just to make one very long post.
I was really honoured to be chosen as a GDT, and have enjoyed my time with this challenge team immensely - they are so talented.
Poor me, she continued, because now how would I afford the extravagancies like shopping and sushi that she continued to enjoy on a weekly basis.
Beyond Windsor , Brent and Morden
Centre 454’s funding application, obtained by the Sun, was sent to the city’s housing services branch on Sept. 8, 2011, the deadline for the federal Homelessness Partnership Strategy grant.
Any time injustice is done…any time a person or people is oppressed…any time people are being exploited to the benefit of others, we are face-to-face and toe-to-toe with evil. The question we face in those moment is, “What will I/we do?” It’s like the bully in school daring your to stand up for the person they are abusing and saying, “What are you gonna do about it punk?! Huh! I dare ya to do something!” As this passage shows, we can’t stand idly by and hope the situation will pass. We must speak and act. We must work for justice, freedom, and peace…and the really hard part is that we must do this with grace and compassion.
And now….a fitting tribute to all chickens:
chicken pot pie
Not every dish that I make turned out edible like any of the above, I must note. And embarrassingly, I still haven’t been able to grasp the fundamentals of cooking plain white rice. Desserts? I’m definitely a goner. In my last attempt at something sweet, I’d wasted a few eggs, cubes of cheddar, sugar, dried longan flesh, beancurd skin and some wolfberries. Among other memorable sweet failures include a carrot cake that ended up dark brown lumps of carrot shreds, crushed walnuts and pineapple cubes that resemble...I shall not elaborate further. I did consider restarting with simpler desserts like a trifle or crepe. But I’m not really interested in either, so why waste time and effort constructing such dishes, right? I’d decided that I should just stick to what I enjoy making the most – savouries. :D
I love this stamp from the March Market Fresh Kit from Market Street Stamps. Guess what? You can still get your hands on this kit and this EXCLUSIVE stamp found in it........Find it HERE. As soon as I got this stamp in the mail, I wanted to try this out. Check it.......I stamped my lightbulb image on the wrong side! After stamping the outline, I turned over the stamp and stamped the actual lightbulb image inside the outline! LOVE out it turned out! Such a great CAS card!!!
The first call was to a 97 year-old lady who was having difficulty in breathing. When I arrived her carer told me she’d been fine until the moment she was leaving; that’s when the old lady began to complain of breathing problems. In fact, she was having a panic attack and was hyperventilating. She was known to suffer from such attacks. She lived alone and her only contact with the outside world, apart from a visit to her church when she could, was her carer.
Hold No Resentments
Day Seven: Four turn-offs.
I’m in favor of any intervention that makes people feel good, provided it is safe and doesn’t exploit folks. Just because the word medicine is in the label, doesn’t make it so.
~Johann Wolfgang von Goethe
“If you come back,” said David, “I’ll give you a tour.”
Iron is absorbed more efficiently by the body when iron-containing foods are eaten with foods that contain vitamin C, such as fruits, tomatoes, and green vegetables. Zinc is abundant in eggs, nuts, pumpkin seeds, legumes, whole grains, and tofu.
As of May 2007 more than 5.2 million people inhabit the online world and at any one time some 25,000 "Residents" are online.
And hit my problems like a kong
I'm that mom who drives 500 miles because her kids want to see their friends, because her kids don't feel like riding the train again, because her kids want to go now instead of in a couple of weeks when the trip could be combined with another trip. I'm that mom who knows it's a frivolous, indulgent, even "stupid" thing to do but does it anyway.
Normally, it would take a little time for the keyboard to store and recognize specific words that a person may use often, but Bhardwaj notes that there’s a way to jump-start that process.
Denmark is about the size of New Hampshire and Vermont combined and with some 5.5 million citizens is nearly 3 times the number we have in these two states.
So we are at our destination in Durham, Birchwood RV, the only RV park in the area other than a very expensive KOA in Raleigh. http://birchwoodrv.com/ A beautiful forest like setting as we look out this morning the sun is way up there over the tall pines which block satellite TV reception. Getting here was a big challenge with Godfrey, the new GPS who took us alongside a shopping center. The area has lots of development but Godfrey although newly purchased in April this year is out of date and is just plain whacko. Somehow we arrived intact despite my fears that we were entering a scene of Deliverance. The neighbor next door from AZ came right over saying, "welcome to Deliverance." We had a laugh at that as well as his tshirt which said, "I drink to make people interesting." He was towing a Hummer 2, a smaller version which I believe I would have had to have if we had stayed in Northern CA; my fascination with the smaller Hummers is unexplainable.
International Court of Women on Women on Reproductive Technologies
and backs of chairs, swans
As these things usually come about, the two met and were joined in holy matrimony having a great, pure love for one another. Their love would pass the test of time and they would live happily with their four children.
All of Gail Wilson Dolls are an absolute
I started Honey + Fitz as a way to chronicle home projects and share my adventures in pregnancy with far away family and friends. I can still remember the first time I got a comment from someone I didn't know...the realization that other people were actually READING my random thoughts was exciting (and terrifying!) With so many blogs and a virtually endless supply of inspiration out there, the fact that you choose to take even a few minutes of your busy day to come here is flattering.
We pulled into a lookout with a view of the Hollywood valley. A couple of kids in the car next to us were making out. I hoped Howard didn’t have any ideas. I wasn’t ready to let our relationship go that far yet.
Yum! For such a simple recipe, it sure packs a flavor punch. The cucumbers and onions are sweet, salty, sour, AND creamy!
It will not be the end of the world - they will help you, or fire you. They won't send round a hit squad or kill your children. To them, it's one of many books - it's only the centre of the universe to you. If it is commissioned non-fiction, they might get an editor to fix the mess. If the mess is too messy, they might send you a kill fee and employ someone else to finish or rewrite it. I've done many a fix after a kill fee and I've also rewritten from scratch books that someone has screwed up or pulled out of. The industry has strategies to cope. It's more of a problem if you're writing a book someone else can't fix and it's in the catalogue already. Don't expect to be popular, but they will try to find a solution. For their benefit, not yours - it's not a favour. Don't ask them to publish your next book.
But on the negative side, another review stated that the Diet Solution program has no program for exercise meaning the Isabel de los Rios Diet Solution Program has no advice on the best exercise to lose weight. Moreover, Ms. De los Rios has released too much reading materials.
Cynthia and I took a road trip to the World Market in Minneapolis for inspiration and unusual purchases. I found rice flour at and colored with vibrant food coloring in the hope that we could do a Rangoli painting outside. It was just too windy the day of the program, so we used paper with the design outline and tissue paper. Cynthia is a fan of plastic tablecloths for crafting and decorating. The colors do not fade and they can be used over and over. She taught everyone how to make pom pom flowers using bright colored.....plastic tablecloths!
Only Parris doesn't have to imagine this response. These quotes are taken from a keynote speech by a Doctors leader at a British Medical Association conference in London last week. All Parris did was change references from healthcare to food production.
Like this one.
I saw this guy on TV back in Sept when the 3rd medicine was really wiping me out. I saw him a few times, and he always said something like:
The day we buried her, we laid under our tree just as we had done a thousand times before but this Libby wasn’t there. I remember closing my eyes tight and pretending that she was still there with us. It seemed to work for a while. Then, I heard you crying and the pretending wouldn’t work anymore.
Noticed a week ago that the garlic had sprouts up through the mulch. But that wasn't my surprise yesterday.
Joshua took the burger out and fed the dog. About 9ish, after the kids were all safely tucked in their beds, I head out for a bicycle ride with friends. As I was getting ready I started looking for the dog.
~Christopher J. Alexander, PhD is a child psychologist, specializing in the treatment of foster and adopted children and the author of Welcome Home: A Guide for Adoptive, Foster, and Treatment Foster Parents.
SHEAN: Oh, Mr. Gallagher, oh Mr. Gallagher.
So, I thought, hmmm maybe I can come up with something. I was wandering through the aisles trying to get some inspiration when I saw the flower foam, which gave me the whole idea.
with two elderly refugees from villages that the children were named after.
Should it really be surprising that someone who believes in free choice and free markets should disagree with the confiscation of trademarks? Should it surprise us that a libertarian opposes the infringement of private property rights? It should not. The message from ASH is that anyone who opposes red tape should not be involved in the Red Tape Challenge, and anyone who opposes their increasingly unhinged agenda should not be allowed to engage in policy-making.
There was one other lady shooting IDPA last night, but she was in a different squad than the one than I was observing. I was the only female in the room, and the guys didn't patronize me or treat me like the 'little lady'. Every one of them wanted to know what I carry, how I carry and why the hell didn't I want to shoot!
Sweet Mother is updated daily. If you’d like to follow this blog, you can do so by hitting the ‘follow’ button at the top right of the page.
I just remember the journey, that’s all, and that young man.
The first shows a couple of frames from another opening shot, this time from a plasticene animation epic I made with the same reprobates mentioned above. This Lucas-inspired adventure was called Matt Line Tidies Up The Universe. The titular hero wasn’t the only character named from a movie-making glossary, by the way – the film also featured Princess Arriflex and the Evil Lord Multiplane.
Hmmmmm, I think, that sounds interesting.
Seriously.....so much fun.
Apple, Yogurt, Natural peanut butter with rice cake
the romance open to a new chapter,
educate white women — in the face of tremendous resistance — as to our
As in all ethical questions, the answers are not clear or easy. There are pros and cons to each decision. Ultimately, whose responsibility is it? If the deceiver doesn’t come clean, should everyone else just avert their eyes? Is truth or discretion more important?
Unfortunately the shop is keeping me very busy and im finding it very hard to fit in time to blog as I would like to, so I apologise for not visiting you all more, I hope things will settle down after my next craft weekend on the 20th/21st November.
1) Submit five pieces of writing to contests, journals, literary magazines, or the newspaper.
A-Ok, here goes. I’m a clean freak when it comes to my bed. I (and all others who come into contact with my bed) must be absolutely clean before getting onto, or into it. That means baths before bed, please! And no sitting on the bed with clothes that have come into contact with surfaces outside of the home. Hubby and children are all trained to change to houseclothes before getting on the bed if we are going to be sprawling there in the middle of the day.
3. no man
3 cups low-sodium chicken broth
It's the last challenge of the month, be sure to join in for your chance at winning some shimmery paints!
Al-Suyooti said in his commentary on the hadeeth (2/1242):
With a deserved reputation for leading the way, the Patents Court is well placed to help the UK courts in areas where they are underperfoming -- as is the case in providing open justice.
In the following passage Jesus’ origin before Abraham and destiny are developed; the truth will free them from sin.
“Gata get 8″ was a mantra among my closest in college; meaning gata get 8 hours. Okay, maybe your body doesn’t need 8, maybe you only need 7. But if you’re waking up and struggling through a three-stroke cycle of the snooze then you’re not getting enough zzzs, and that matters for a lot more than just your brain. Why? I’ll tell you:
January 25, 2010
we are … beautiful
It happened in Ernie & Ethel’s Territory. They are trying hard right now to have eaglets!
Another versatile pattern that can suit a boy as well as a girl. Using girl colors and adding a flower gives that feminine touch. Switch to blue, brown or black or an unusual orange and brown combination as seen in my sample and this could suit your little boy to the T.
Silk dress, Valentino, price on request, at Valentino Boutique, NYC. Vintage denim jacket, from The Clothing Warehouse, NYC, $58. Lycra bikini, DSquared2, $390. Czech glass stone and silver plate earrings, $155, bracelet, $155, all, Ben-Amun. Crystal necklace, Lanvin, $1,985. Turquoise and sterling silver bracelet, $550, silver long ring, $350, both, Vicki Turbeville. Quartz ring, Pamela Love, $600. Schield Collection star ring made with Swarovski Elements, Swarovski Crystallized, $196. Leather boots, Miu Miu, $2,950.
We also did a sieving of some malt. This is done with milled malt to see what your grist looks like. Six different sized screens are used and the malt is sieved through the screens. A certain percentage of larger matter stays on the bigger screens and so on until the bottom where you find flour. Based off of this you can adjust your mill, or adjust the mash to better utilize the grist you have. The rest of the day was 3 hours of Chemical Technical Analysis lectures. Towards the end I was getting pretty worn out. The shear amount of information that has entered my brain this week is insane, but that is exactly what I signed up for.
These things happen. My husband is philosophical. We will replace it, the new tree will grow. I’m not sure I want to replace it. It was a living link with that happy day. It was the last tree my husband will ever plant with his own hands. It can’t be replaced.
Only buy clothes that "fit my personality", not that simply "fit". Did so-so. Hope to become more adventurous in 2010!
Witches were generally portrayed as ugly old hags so as to make them the target of dislike and hatred, but the matter of fact is that they were and still are quite normal men and women and in some case witches were and are quite pretty and presentable ladies.
We fire event by the aptly name fireEvent , and pass in the event name exposed from our note controller, and the record we get from the parameter. See how it all link together nicely.
If you think things are back to normal in Zimbabwe, just walk into a bank. Its something I haven't done for many months and flipping through my last cheque book reminded me of the mayhem of our banks less than a year ago. My cheque stubbs look like something from a crazy kindergarten. There's a payment for a telephone bill of four hundred million dollars, another to a dentist for forty one billion dollars. There's a deposit of four trillion, six hundred billion dollars and another page showing a balance on hand of fourteen trillion dollars. One page is slashed through in red ink with the words : "NB: Aug 08: 10 zeroes removed by Gono." And then, in October 2008, also in red ink on a cheque stubb are the words: "Can't get in bank, queues of thousands."
Grace teaches people to learn to take responsibility for their actions and not depend on outward laws. Under grace, all things are permissible but not all things are beneficial. People will learn to love their neighbour and do things that are beneficial because love does no harm to a neighbour.
Gerard Woodward is categorised in my mind as the author who surely would have won the Booker Prize in 2004 if his brilliant novel I’ll Go to Bed at Noon hadn’t been up against such a strong field, including Colm Tóibín’s The Master, David Mitchell’s Cloud Atlas and the eventual winner, Alan Hollinghurst’s The Line of Beauty. It was the second in a series, and now, after completing the Jones family saga with A Curious Earth, Woodward has braved the creation of a whole new fictional world.
Do you have a start of school curse word as foul as FIVE? I'll go get the soap.
I also finally made the sewing machine cover that I've had pinned since I joined Pinterest!
20. I'm OK By Myself (Years of Refusal)
I have come to deeply appreciate what suffering does to a person IF you are willing to let her teach you through the pain. This is probably the greatest lesson I have learned in my life thus far and probably will remain so till the end of it. I have observed how a poverty mentality ruins people and learned how to be creative in finding ways to help people when I have insufficient funds, or no funds at all. I have learned to love children, all types of children, even those who have committed horrible crimes towards others. I have made some bad choices but also learned how to pick myself after a fall. I have learned to know when I should be very tough and when to be extra sensitive to the needs of others around me…come to think of it, I am still working on this one.
towards a picture neither understands.
Jaa ne~!
hungering for more,
The challenge this week actually brought up a big discussion about how you can use any Tilda/Edwin to make a Halloween project it is just how you interpret it....One of the best suggestions I heard was to colour Tilda green....freaky!!!! So don't be narrow minded like me and think you have to have a Halloween image to participate let you imagination take over and see what you can come up with..
“Proto-words. It doesn’t matter – even the cleverest adults don’t understand them.”
Well yesterday was pretty eventful considering I spent the whole day in the hospital. My poor brother who is an EMT had to rush me to the hospital yesterday for pre-term labor. I have to say with my other pregnancy that was the norm but this time it was so different and I was stupid to wait so long. The day started with very mild cramping which I thought I had no reason to be alarmed since it is fairly normal. Then all of a sudden horrible pain struck and kept getting worse. I waited an hour then decided since I could barely walk it was time to go. Good thing I did too because we did an ultrasound and found out that my cervix was very short and soft. The Dr. Said I will be having the baby early which we kinda already knew since my other two kids were very early only this time it!s way too early and he's afraid I'll deliver any day. So I have to take it easy and rush in at any sign of contractions so we can stop labor. No bed rest really just take it very easy. We're. Hoping I can keep the baby in for at least 4 more weeks, I'm hoping longer but if I can keep him in till 29 weeks he has a good chance of being born with minimal problems.
3 incorporating
She sees all of her friends, in different poses, all around the room. At first glance, no one's moving, so my first thought was that Buffy pulled a Happy Birthday To Me-style ending, or that perhaps Kit was hallucinating. But then Kit turns to stare at Buffy, turns back again, and Chazz is building a house of cards, Skip and Arch are shooting the shit, and Nan is reading a book, so...yeah, they're alive.
The UI Layer for PicShop is fully GPU accelerated, which translates into extremely low battery consumption for you, and a beautifully smooth 60hz interface that is a joy to use.
■Create a Get Well card.
When I first put together a batch of my chicken wing 65, it was an instant hit, an absolute crisp, crusted and well flavored piece of chicken.
According to the latest Intrade.com odds, Mitt Romney now has a 70% chance of winning the Republican nomination, whereas Gingrich and Paul have dropped to about 8%, Huntsman – 5%, Perry – 2%, and Bachmann – 1%.
A few days ago, in a landmark decision, the High Court of Nairobi held the relevant three provisions of this Anti-Counterfeit Act, 2008 as unconstitutional - Section 2 (definition of counterfeiting), section 32 (offences) and Section 34 (Powers of the Commissioner to seize suspected counterfeit Goods). The Court held that the definition of counterfeits could unfairly include generic medicines and that this would violate the right to life, dignity and health. The conflagration of generics and counterfeits during in-transit seizures was also mentioned as the type of consequence that could occur by allowing this type of provision. In fact, the Court also said that in a legal regime that respects Intellectual Property Rights, "the danger that such generic drugs can be seized under section 32 and 34 of the Act is therefore manifest."
Also liberal blogger, Jane Hamsher of FireDogLake points out that Obama has refused to appoint an Inspector General to oversee the billions in bailout money awarded to Freddie and Fannie due it’s connections to ex-Chief-of-Staff Rahm Emanuel, who sat on Freddie’s board as the books were cooked.
2011 whizzed past us but not without teaching us significant lessons for our evolution. Each of us crossed great milestones be it in our spiritual progress or our material one. Perhaps at a point, some of us even realized there is no difference between the two.
Tricia has lots of free digital stamps, and also offers digital stamps and stamp collections for sale on her blog. She has some really cute images.
One of the peculiar glories of American public policy is that, of the nations of the world, our tax system is generally progressive (or at least used to be). In comparison to other countries, we rely more on the income tax, less on VAT taxes, and our corporate tax rate is actually (on paper) more progressive than most countries.
Today is Holocaust Remembrance Day.
We really had a great time.It was the first time that I went out with my boyfriend’s siblings and its really unforgettable.
Thank you to all those who have asked about our sleep. Mera is on a baby antacid and is doing much, much better. We aren't up all night any longer, but we do still have to hold her upright after a feeding. During the day it is usually about an hour and I try to get away with half an hour at night (just so I can go back to bed). She is sleeping 3-4 hours at a stretch. More specifically, her schedule is on a 3-4 hour cycle. So last night she was up at 1, but I didn't get back to sleep until about 2:30 and up again at 5.
MICHIELS B, COENEN S, AVONTS D, VAN ROYEN P, DENEKENS J. Who benefits form an influenza vaccination of GPs? Vaccine 2001; 20: 1-2.
Met new friends. All quite cool.
The white wine
Start reading it: ” With the weekend arriving and a long day finally over, 8-year-old Cherrie Mahan stepped off her yellow school bus on a chilly Friday around 4 p.m….”
I grew up in a house where one of my sisters came out as a lesbian while she was in high school. To say that my parents’ reaction was less than positive would be an understatement. My sister’s relationship with my parents was bad before she came out, but that pushed it over the edge. My mother passed away without having spoken to her daughter in over twenty years and it is going on thirty years that she hasn’t spoken with my dad. Not exactly an environment that would make a transsexual comfortable admitting the truth about herself.
Coloring: Crayola Twistable and Sansodor Slovent
I had to take my dogs for a quick trip outside to potty (them, no me) and pinned my hair up and threw on a hoodie so my hair wouldn't be rained on and destroyed more than I had already done. When I got back in and took off the hoodie, I noticed I liked the faux bob I had going and that it reminded me of bobs that I've seen Dita sport, so this is my new do for the night. I cleaned it up a bit and re-pinned it and viola, my accidental faux bob for the night.
My second reaction is that I have to let this go. Let this happen.
They give imagination free flight. They make you laugh. They flick the conscience. They stimulate your desire to know and grow. Books do.
NOTE: For the foolish person will speak foolishness, And his heart will work iniquity: To practice ungodliness, To utter error against the LORD, To keep the hungry unsatisfied, And he will cause the drink of the thirsty to fail. Isaiah 32:6 KJV
On the contrary: the criticism of the comrade in uniform speaks of is a dimension we may not ignore. Public perception of the movement is paramount. Whilst some of the winter’s sociographical research reflected widespread support for the cause in general, the subsequent course of the movement – prior to IWD – was, to many, indicative of the campaign’s nature. Occupations can catalyse, define and transform periods of struggle. What needs to evolve is an awareness in the labour movement of the potential of occupations. If organised workers adopt consciousness through such framework, coordinated direct action by students, activists and workers can transform the movement from a groundbreaking excursion in globalised education to a tactic which puts politicised education into practice, dangerously so.
Our former Prime Minister said rallies are not part of Malaysian culture. Of course we have proven him wrong a few times and he is foaming in the mouth right now. Look at the interests and intensities generated by Bersih 1.0, Bersih 2.0 and the recent Himpunan Hijau 2.0. Thousands and thousands of Malaysians poured onto the streets of Kuala Lumpur and Kuantan amidst threats from the police and the whole world saw what happened during those rallies – thanks to Al Jazeera and CNN. That is the power of internet!
How would I classify this book? While it's published by a Christian imprint, it's not just for Christians, but for anyone interested in the Amish. It's part a book on finances, but don't forget it's a bit green because when you're not out buying new items and you are putting forth an effort to save money, you are often not consuming the resources you would otherwise. It's a book about family and community and strengthening those ties. I guess in the end, I would classify this as a book that should be read by anyone interested in improving their lives in almost any area as it could be considered a handbook on living more simply. There's not only great practical advice, but how one family lives out this advice. It's one thing to say what someone should be doing, but this book shows how the Sleeths live what she teaches.
The reason why you should is also simple: change the world is the only reason! Small note; the change can be as little as can be but still have to be world changing.
Bold, cautious, true, and my loving comrade.
Daughter of Smoke and Bone
We are told the reason why Guan Eng has refused to move back is because the bungalow belongs to a middle-aged woman from Malacca, who is said to be a crony of Betty Chew, the wife of the CM.
When I arrived at school this morning, each student greeted me with a smile. I realized with each smile that came my way that these people were genuinely happy to see me. I am so glad I have a profession that is not only fun but also gratifying.
Acts 8:9-25 tell us of Simon the magician and how he went from being a somebody great to being a nobody when he was baptized and started believing and being with Philip. He was enamored with the power of God. He once proclaimed himself to be someone great and now he realizes that he is nothing without God.
As I think about my priorities and how to order my day, it would in a way, be easy to do what I’ve always done. I could walk away from my facebook page and never look back. I could devote my days 100% to homeschooling and house work. I could be thankful and content to live as I’ve always lived–sacrificing and scraping by–poor but happy. There are a couple of problems with this scenario however.
Even from people who’d hoped for any kind of healthcare reform, giving obama a mulligan may be too much to ask. He was handed a ‘mandate’ and large majorities in Congress, and he screwed up. Those ideal conditions will not be recreated. When the ACA was first introduced in 2009, it was a major disappointment to those on the far Left. Now, a failure of obama’s healthcare juggernaut may bring those long-supressed resentments back to the surface. Given the efficiency of obama’s propaganda machine, it’s easy to forget the stridency of the voices on the Left originally opposed to obamacare:
SO. Lets all support Lauren Oliver. Buy Hana and hopefully it number one on the eBook charts!Happy holidays! :)
*Note: The views expressed are solely my own and do not represent the official views of any institution, organization, or company that I am affiliated with
our industry's perspective, the footprints of climate change are around us and the trend of increasing damage to property and threat to lives is clear," said Franklin Nutter, president of the Reinsurance Association of America. "We need a national policy related to climate and weather." Perhaps no industry better understands the impact of global warming than the insurance industry whose job it is to analyze
This post is long overdue but it's been a busy time and I kept hoping that we would have a name to accompany the official announcement! Alas, you'll have to stay tuned for that bit of news while we reach a consensus.
Over the last 20 years, Dr. Glassman has also worked closely on significant grant-funded projects devoted to developing innovative residency training models and community-based systems to improve oral health for people with special needs. Dr. Glassman is also Co-Director of the Statewide Taskforce on Oral Health for People with Special Needs with representation from more than 80 government agencies and other advocacy groups.
Main cast: Barbra Streisand, Walter Matthau, Michael Crawford, Marianne McAndrew, Danny Lockin, E.J. Peaker
Phil Donahue
We have reinvented bowl food. Yours looks like mine, and I'd like to give your flavors a try. Easy, comforting, yet still homemade. You can even freeze them for later.
but change is still CHANGE.
Best Quinny BUZ3TRSTBB1 Buzz 3 Travel System Brown Boost with Diaper Bag Collections
“Would you like a signed picture?” he asked.
We all share an obligation to operate as sensibly as possible. That’s the essence of sustainability. So, please conserve energy where possible, reduce consumption when you can – and encourage your fellow students and employees to do likewise. Adopt the following practices and you’ll be helping all of us to move in the right direction:
I mentioned earlier about how some of the characters leave a funny taste in my mouth and Katelyn's gun yielding grandfather and the neighbour next door Trick are a few to keep an eye on. There's some secret that they aren't willing to share. To them keeping her in the dark and well protected leaves me with a million questions that I need answered. What are they hiding?
Thank you all for your continued prayers and support! GOD is Good and Faithful!
Oasis: Lyla
2) I've never read a Jane Austen book.
"...and mom, the cartoon will be your profile picture for a while", said my 12 year old daughter in her attempt to urge me to change my facebook profile pic in support of a campaign against child abuse. So that explains Rapunzel on her profile pic. Second daughter cheerfully said she's changing hers to Ariel, her namesake. "And which cartoon character are you going to use, mom?", asked a little voice, my youngest son. I looked at all of them, bewildered. Obviously I don't know much about what's going on on facebook. "Shrek", I answered quickly, earning the laughter of the kids. They know I'm nuts about Shrek 2. And then I forgot all about it.
I thought I would share a few pictures of just another ordinary day here at our house! Hope it brings you a giggle. For those of you with three year old little boys......well, you already know what I am talking about.
I would like to forgive what I cannot change;
“I’ll try…”
After 22 fateful years, Britannica, the old champion of information finally handed over the crown to the new champion through a decision to formally close-down its print operations today.
I was put in charge for desserts for Easter. I decided to use this to try something new. SO I made two desserts. One for the adults. And one for the kids.
The Museum of Vision is an educational program of The Foundation of the American Academy of Ophthalmology. It is the only institution in the United States whose sole purpose is to preserve the history of ophthalmology and celebrate its unique contributions to science and health. The Museum of Vision strives to inspire an appreciation of vision science, the ophthalmic professions and contributions made toward preventing blindness. For more information on the Museum of Vision, visit http://www.museumofvision.org.
Well obviously it snowed on Monday. One of my teachers cancelled class cause she’s badass and was like “Let’s call it a snowday” even though it wasn’t that bad. I have a portrait assignment due in a couple weeks for photography so I took some pictures of Caitlin in the snow. The fitness center closed early so I was able to watch a full episode of the Bachelor. (I still hate Courtney.) Then I spent the night in Caitlin’s room because Alexis was somewhere else and she said I could sleep in her bed, and Caitlin and I both had 8am class so we figured it would work. It felt weird hauling my duffel bag upstairs to have a sleepover in a different room of the same building.
So enough rambling (can you tell I have not seen anybody except Jamie since last Thursday)
4/5
The brewers of Kent and Kentish brewers (well most of them) have come together with plans for a Kent Green Hop Beer festival.
Shared by forsake34@LJ!
I have visited many of you in the last several months but have not left any comments. Personal stuff going on.
She did, and he said we had a lovely family, but he wasn’t interested in talking to or seeing me.
These are well established environmental lies and they are Obama’s environmental lies.
I move the distance of my arms
Her performance on the soccer field?
2. Clean out water bottles.
When and what we eat may affect our nighttime rest, if not our tendency toward bad dreams. A small study published in the International Journal of Psychophysiology had a group of healthy men eat spicy meals before bed on some evenings and compared their quality of sleep on nights where they had non-spiced meals. On the spicy nights, the subjects spent more time awake and had poorer quality sleep. The explanation is that spicy food can elevate body temperatures and thus disrupt sleep.
The shootings took place after 1 p.m. Within an hour, police were walking through the residential area where the shootings took place, according to azcentral.com. Two handguns and a shotgun were recovered from the
I was tough, sure. I was used to wierd behavior from my family, sure. But I was also 11 years old. I started to cry. The cashier got this confused and slightly panicked look on his face. He didn’t know what to do with an 11-year old suddenly balling his eyes out in the middle of the store. But, he was a nice enough guy. “Hey, hey buddy. What’s wrong? Do you need some kind of help?”
daily Salat prayers at 5 am according to her own interviews. Not to mention,
I didn't really know what I wanted to do with this mani so I just started stamping and adding random things! Lol! I stamped with Konad m36 and sponged Kleancolor My Valentine onto the tips (I must do another mani with this glitter because it's so gorgeous!).
Let us consider an example user Alice wants to communicate with user Bob . Proxy 1 and Proxy 2 help to setup the session on behalf of the users. This common arrangement of the proxies and the end-users is called “SIP Trapezoid”.
10 The Johannesburg Times on an Afghan girl rescued from torture by her in-laws and likely to be sent to India for treatment. An Afghan official says a 15-year-old girl severely tortured for months by her in-laws who wanted to force her into prostitution will be sent to India for medical treatment. Interior Ministry spokesman Sediq Sediqi said Sahar Gul’s mother-in-law and sister-in-law were arrested and her husband was being sought. Gul was brutally tortured, beaten and locked in a toilet by her husband’s family for months after she refused to become a prostitute. She was in critical condition when she was rescued from a house in northern Baghlan province last week, after her neighbours reported hearing Gul crying and moaning in pain. According to police in Baghlan, her in-laws pulled out her nails and hair, and locked her in a dark basement bathroom for about five months, with barely enough food and water to survive.
Actually, Lovers wouldn't be too bad if it were done much more crisply and confidently, in a space that doesn't swallow voices, with musical instruments that do not manage to sound both tinny and too loud.
The storm ripped him from his vehicle even as his father in the passenger seat struggled to hold him. A cell phone and graduation cap were the only thing found until Will’s body was discovered a few days later. He was reportedly reciting Scripture in those final moments. But the story goes deeper.
The Use and Abuse of Histor” continued the Dionysian-vs.-Apollonian theme. The “abuse of history” is (according to Nietzsche) theory, science, objective truth. The right use of history is to enhance “life.” Life and truth, fire and light, Dionysus and Apollo, will and intellect, are set in opposition. We see Nietzsche being torn apart here, for these are the two parts of the self.
25. I Want To Break Free... In the process of completing this mission.
It was a lovely morning.
You need to ask Les Goodstein about the nature of the business arrangement with FCR (as will I). But if we are merely a renter — as we have been with Two Trees Management here in DUMBO — I believe that the current level of disclosure is sufficient.
13:45
The lovely purple flowers on our sage plants are fast disappearing. Deep in their throats you find tiny, egg-like clusters that will swell and darken before dropping to the ground in hopes of finding a good place to germinate.
After he is caught, stabilized and hospitalized, doctors find a drug called Scopolamine in his system, a drug known as the “Zombie” drug that has the added effect of putting the user under something like the imperius curse. For the Potter challenged, that basically means he’ll do whatever he’s told and not remember it later.
Since when did guys become more sensitive than girls? Thus is the issue that I am currently facing online. These guys seemed normal enough, but as soon as you get comfortable with them, they start to freak out when they don’t hear from you within 24 hours. Umm.. Weird and Creepy.
You may have more than three sources. Your story must have paraphrases and quotes; a news lede and a nut graf; a headline, subhed and byline; and yes, images from your neighborhood (you may all use the same photo or photos if you so desire). You must tag your stories, and I’d suggest using the SAME tags for consistency’s sake (please include the tag midterm!). Remember: News doesn’t contain YOUR opinion.
Marie Laforêt - A Demain My Darling
In Stevens’ view, the enthusiasm of supporters and their ability to organize is irrelevant. The great importance is ultimately media buys, and whoever has the most media buys, wins. An unspoken corollary is here also: it is the campaign with the most available money for media buys that will always win.
(French tarmac....somehow so appropriate....no, no Dude, don't bother getting up, it's just my PLANE you are supposed to be guiding in, I don't want to bother you)
I have attempted to go Raw awhile back and it failed so I am very nervous, but I do believe I have more knowledge this time around and are more aware of the support and resources that are out there! So here’s hoping I can fix myself without the need of doctors!
But the main focus tomorrow will be on the people who actually turn up.
And speaking of chicks, I want to share some new additions to the living room. I recently won a giveway from Lydia at Pudel Design. Lydia was so sweet to open her giveaway worldwide, even though she lives in Germany. And I was thrilled to win, because I really loved what she was giving away. Lydia is a talented artist, and she was giving away a series of 3 chick paintings that she created. She also was giving away a fun insect pillow! I have added everything to the living room. For now the paintings are on the mantle (well two of them as I could only fit two, but I think I am going to hang them on the wall. Here they are for now....
It is Mother's Day
98. “Your vision will become clear only when you look into your heart. Who looks outside, dreams. Who looks inside, awakens.” – Carl Jung
My mother in law: That was a hard one, she remembers. She is now in her 60s. I don't ask for details, though she might tell. It is enough (too much) to consider what I know already. She met her husband when she was still a girl, 13 or 14. What would it be like, to know only one man, your entire life. How disappointing it would be, how sad. Others call this beautiful. Maybe I don't know anything.
Another example of this kind of change of perspective was from a person who once lamented that, "bad things always happened to him." This he said in reference to his son having been diagnosed with leukemia at a very young age. This had been a very difficult time for his family certainly, I cannot and choose not to even imagine what they went through, however, the child beat the odds and made a full recovery and is in his twenties now. So to this I replied, "I think you're a very fortunate man. You had a child who survived cancer, that is something to celebrate." He looked at me oddly and said, "Yeah, I guess you're right, I never thought of it that way before."
Many thanks to "J" for the information. I'll follow up with Filmoption and see if there are any copies still available (fingers crossed). If anyone has any luck in this matter, let us know. Cheers! Don't forget to revisit the original post and comment thread.
68. Gin and Juice -- Snoop Dog
Another interpretation is that this passage is talking about the nation of Israel. Those who argue for this position advocate that the description given in verses four through six fits Israel as a nation. They had once been enlightened, and had tasted the heavenly gift. They had become partakers of the Holy Spirit under the Old Covenant administration. They had the word of God, and had tasted the power of the age to come.
Last weekend I saw Kim Churchill play at a smaller venue and in between songs he spoke about each song and the inspiration behind his writing. Truest Intentions was written as he finished highschool, and to loosely quote him he said that when you finished school in Australia at 18 you were supposed to know what you wanted to do and go to uni and do it. Instead of further study he decided to buy a camper van, take his guitar, travel and play music - follow his passion.
I was brokenhearted, and shattered. She continued to belittle me through my elementary and middle school years about my love of reading and my lack of any true friends. I was 'fat', 'ugly', 'not sociable'. She broke my will to even go to school and attend the classes I had an interest in, if she didn't believe I'd succeed. In my ninth grade year, I ended up quitting classes and got into trouble for them and had to go to counseling and court. I was ordered back into school and I had to see this lady a couple of times after school every week so she could verify that I went.
Courage is a form of tenaciousness, a refusal to quit when you want to quit because you're tired or humiliated or broken, and it is as necessary in everyday life as it is in moments of great upheaval. In fact, I could easily say that everyday courage is more important than the "great deeds" sort because every one of us will be in everyday situations, while not all of us will be called upon in our lifetimes to perform great deeds.
Ja kiitos kaikille gillette kisaan osallistuneille! Vielä ehtii mukaan, ja muistakaa käydä äänestämässä suosikkejanne osoitteessa musictelevision.fi/justlegs
Herman van Veen Toveren NL
Tuesday today so time for another challenge at My Time to Craft where our challenge this week is "Use your favourite embellishment". My card is going to be for my fifth granddaughter Heidi who will be five on Friday. I have used a new digi I purchased last week from Krista Smith at "Saturated Canary" , I have coloured her with Copics and punched two corners of the image, the bp are by "Prima" and "First Edition". For my favourite embellishment I have added flowers from "Wild Orchid" I have also added lace, ribbon and a sentiment from Cuddly Buddly.
Upon a plaintiff’s sufficient proof that a dog involved in an attack is a pit bull or a pit bull cross, and that the owner, or other person(s) who has the right to control the pit bull’s presence on the subject premises (including a landlord who has a right to prohibit such dogs on leased premises) knows, or has reason to know, that the dog is a pit bull or cross-bred pit bull, that person is liable for the damages caused to a plaintiff who is attacked by the dog on or from the owner’s or lessor’s premises. In that case a plaintiff has established a prima facie case of negligence. When an attack involves pit bulls, it is no longer necessary to prove that the particular pit bull or pit bulls are dangerous.
And by mile 9, I was feeling the uphill A LOT and asked Derek and Shanda to pull back for a minute.
that we worship one God in Trinity, and Trinity in Unity,
Leni
She's had some work done too. Her nose is a bit generic.
In keeping with the VBA rules I also need to tell you all 7 things about myself. So here we go:
I’ve been lazy. I admit. It’s been a few weeks since I’ve worked on the book now. Not just because of laziness but because life seems to somehow get in the way. I had all sorts of great thoughts about how to fix what’s wrong with the last three chapters or so…but they’ve evaporated now. I’ve planned time to work tomorrow, but being unable to remember what it was I was going to do has left me a little lost. It’s okay, I’m sure that once I get into it, things will occur to me. That’s the way it usually seems to go, at least.
32. When is the last time you laughed? hour
The run was well-attended. We started running and after two kilometers I felt a bit tired and my legs were just compelled to run. But when I saw the finish line ahead there’s this brief spark of energy that made my shoes to utter a sudden loud cry “Come on, you can make it!” Plus a pretty chinita lady approached me and asked if was running for 5k.
In San Francisco, when you share an idea with someone, more often then not they are excited. People comment on how unique or original an idea may be. They ask what they can do to help.
whose cries precede liberation for the oppressed.
At the end of July 1812, Beethoven met Goethe, under the organization of Bettina Brentano. These two great men admired each other, but didn’t understand each other. The composer found the poet too servile, and the poet last estimation was that Beethoven was “completely untamed.” Beethoven admired Goethe; he put to music several of his poems. I always regretted not having been better understood by Goethe.
Innovation: N/A- I’ve already mentioned all of the numerous additions that LA added to the series back in 1993, and it even threw in plenty of cool cameos for general Nintendo buffs of the time. There are enemies that resemble Kirby, as well as various foes from the Mario series, including Goombas, Podoboos and Chain Chomps (though Chain Chomps also had a cameo in the Turtle Rock dungeon in A Link to the Past). Link can even stomp on the Goombas with the Roc’s Feather, which is pretty amusing! Lastly, the original item for the trading sequence happens to be a Yoshi Doll. If you’re a real Nintendo enthusiast, it’s pretty fun to see all of these cameos I must say! Anyway, the series really gained a lot of firsts here, namely with the side quests, fishing minigame and trading sequence. The series probably would have progressed on a very different path if LA had never been made!
If I was forced to pick a single place that meant more to me than any other, Cwm Idwal would be a high contender. It is in the Ogwen Valley, a few hundred feet above the main road to Bethesda, on the path to Twll Du, the Devil's Cauldron and Glydyr Fawr mountain. The Cwm is a hanging valley, glacial in origin and now a protected site of natural interest with particularly rare plants including the Snowdon Lilly
“Ohhhhhhhh. OK, I see. So, who is your brother?”
There is also something dreadfully frustrating about the character of Danton that he manages to convey, a man of action no longer capable of action, a man seduced by overweening confidence in his own importance, his own indispensability, all this overlaid by a fatalist surrender to an inevitable destiny. Danton made history, but as he himself puts it, history has “a way of biting you on the arse.” Büchner understood that, when it comes to the greater drama, human actions, the actions of any given individual, inevitably reach the point of irrelevance. Here Danton is at the point of personal and historical irrelevance.
A new desk chair provides comfortable seating for a young lady.
As everyone who has met him can attest to, he is absolutely fearless. Alone in Patty and Pascal’s Cincinnati backyard with five Bernese Mountain dogs piling on top of him, he never cowered, never whined and indeed set about to attack each one systematically. And of the dozen or so laps he’s ridden in on our daisy chain to Maine, he slept sweetly and soundly.
Do you craft? If you're here, I assume you're a creative type, yes?
There are two comments in particular I'd like to address personally:
3) OR . . . this little aromatherapy eye pillow is magic for headaches as well. I warmed mine up last night and just put it over my forehead and not my eye area because my husband is out of town and my children were a bit wild last night (which may have been the reason for the headache). Anyway, I could still interact with them and play with them while this little warm pack did the job on vanishing my headache.
I told you he’d broken his left leg and naturally the nurse started to shave his left leg. He was lying on his back at the time. That went well. The she and another nurse managed to get him turned over on to his stomach to complete the procedure. And she did, only this time she shaved the back of his right leg!
Why the Siren Likes It: Has comic moments, but at heart a rather melancholy movie about a still-relevant topic, with legendary leads giving warm, authentic performances despite a wan third act. McQueen seldom let his vaunted cool slip to as much effect as here. When "Mad Men" gives a nudge about how far we've come, we should remember Wood planning an abortion, without hysteria. How many recent Hollywood movies or TV shows have let a beautiful, sympathetic lead do the same?
Unter allen die an der Challenge teilnehmen, wird jemand mit dem Random system ausgelost, der dieses wunderschönen Stampvie Stempel Stamapvie Sarah Kay "Adele Enjoying fresh appeles"
I got to meet my Hungarian translator. I asked her how difficult the books were to translate and she said the steampunk parts were the hardest but that I did manage to make her laugh even when working.
me: I didn’t even raise my voice. You’re actually yelling. So stop that also.
Then they became an ironic twist; a meta commentary that turns a simple tweet into a profound statement – or so the tweeters think (#justsaying #lolz).
At the film's outset, we hear the stern and serious narration of cinéma vérité pioneer Richard Leacock, who died in March, telling the overall details of Sherman's infamous march to the sea, complete with archival photos and a colorful map that traces the general's route as Leacock's voice informs us that the Union military leader's contingent of 60,000 troops cut a path 60 miles wide and 700 miles long. The documentary looks and sounds as if it's truly going to reflect its title of Sherman's March and though Leacock doesn't appear and isn't identified, if you know that it's his presence launching the film, you're liable to believe the entire movie will concern the Civil War. After all, Leacock's work in documentaries dates back to the 1930s and includes being the cinematographer on the influential 1948 documentary Louisiana Story by Robert J. Flaherty which won the BAFTA for best documentary and somehow earned an Oscar nomination for best original motion picture story. (Flaherty was the man behind the even better-known 1922 silent documentary Nanook of the North.) Leacock's work as a cinematographer on documentaries proved quite eclectic ranging from 1960's Primary, which observed John F. Kennedy and Hubert Humphrey in the hunt for the Democratic delegates in Wisconsin; D.A. Pennebaker's 1968 concert documentary Monterey Pop where Jimi Hendrix set that guitar on fire; Pennebaker's 1970 Company: Original Cast Recording detailing the work that went into putting Stephen Sondheim's Broadway classic on wax; and even a 1999 film John Huston War Stories containing interviews with the late director about footage he shot during World War II. Leacock also directed many documentaries as well and though he's not identified and won't return to Sherman's March beyond those opening moments, the eclecticism of his long career supports what I said at the beginning about the flexibility of what constitutes a documentary. Leacock also happened to head the MS program in filmmaking at M.I.T. with Ed Pincus (who co-wrote The Filmmaker's Handbook: A Comprehensive Guide for the Digital Age with Steven Ascher) where McElwee received his master's degree.
Now all I have to do is keep it tidy like this! (to quote a famous Aussie movie....'tell her she's dreaming') I have some tv remote control holder boxes which house all sorts of little things, like small tools, my sheets of bling, rolls of tape, glue dots etc. I also have a little document holder which I have printed out DT and challenge info on it and at the moment it has my homework from the Online Copic class I'm doing with Mandi-Lee at CopicMe
Jl. Gaya Motor III No.3
Nordström S, Beckman L, Nordenson I. Occupational and Environmental Risks in and around a Smelter in Northern Sweden. V. Spontaneous abortion among female employees and decreased birth weight in their offspring. Hereditas 1979; 90: 291-296.
The first snow of winter hasn’t fallen yet, but in our kitchen tonight we’re doing a pretty good imitation. The whole family is circled around the huge old oak table. The snip, snip, snip of scissors is background music as tiny scraps of white paper float down, making our floor look like a giant brownie sprinkled with powdered sugar.
I arrived in Buenos Aires after a a mind-numbingly long 18 hour ride from Salta. From everything I’ve heard about BA, my expectations were set very high. It’s one of those cities that everyone adores and I hoped she wouldn’t disappoint. As I found out, Buenos Aires would not. She’s not that type of girl.
He did a show called Good Ad, Bad Ad - and as far as I can tell he did the same talk every time. Being easily bored and lacking self-discipline I could never manage that. But I have always thought that showing examples of what is good and bad is better than waffling on about theory.
1) 無 – Not
Buying a Used Wakeboard Boat
Traverse City, Michigan, USA
Gifford’s was unable to avoid the collision, and his pickup smashed into the passenger side of the Volvo. When emergency responders arrived on the scene, they discovered Curry had been seriously injured in the crash, and he was taken by LifeFlight helicopter to OHSU Hospital in Portland. Gifford was taken by ambulance to Mt. Hood Medical Center for treatment of injuries that were not thought to be life-threatening.
He rolled over onto his back and continued to propel himself with the palms of his hands. The whole depth of the sky swung into view. He lifted his head slightly. He could see Diane stood on the shore. She looked a surprisingly long way away. From her stance she looked exasperated.
There are some mis-steps in the action, and the dialogue is occasionally a little off, but overall this is an energetic and well-written first novel. It's worth seeking this one out.
Force Majeure, contingencies
This is a top notch IPA, and is a hop-heads dream. The bitterness is there on this beer, but the soft accents of everything else really helped this beer be much more than just a "hop-bomb." Another tasty beer from Ballast Point that I am pretty excited I was able to try.
Nothing must be arbitrary or left to chance. Care and accuracy in the design process show respect towards the consumer.
the fullness of your presence consumes as my breathing
– and to the courts of the Member State where the means necessary to produce an actual infringement of a trade mark registered in another Member State are used.This Kat wondered, at the time, about a scenario in which damage is done to a trade mark owner's interest in his registered trade mark as a result of a chain of several events, each possibly being in a different country. These events might include both causae sine qua non and causae causantes (causes of the conditions under which the damage was able to be inflicted and causes of the events that directly inflict the damage). He hoped that the Court of Justice would clarify this in its ruling. As it turns out, the CJEU said just this:
On Saturday, May 5th General S. Musselman decided to attack North Yardea. It was a slow attack. Very slow. Clods of dirt bombs were going off left and right, the General lost a few good blades of grassmen. But there were casualties on both sides, and one by one the weed body-count started to climb. There, the first 5×8 foot section was done.
Be there for them, but let them do the grieving. It’s time for the rest of us to stop focusing on grief and remember.
The most pronounced changes have occurred in the 16 to 24 age group. Among men in this age group, the proportion drinking more than 4 units on their heaviest drinking day fell from 46 per cent in 2005 to 34 per cent in 2010 and the proportion drinking more than 8 units decreased from 32 per cent to 24 per cent over the same period. There have also been marked falls for women in this age group with the proportion drinking more than 3 units on their heaviest drinking day falling from 41 per cent in 2005 to 31 per cent in 2010 and the proportion drinking more than 6 units falling from 27 per cent to 17 per cent.
Camping, hiking, and other outdoor activity. The woods are a veritable playground to me. I especially like to try out new survivalist skills when I'm there. I'm a nut when it comes to that stuff.
Fortunately, my friend knew me well enough not to be insulted.
With that the hail came. Balls of ice bouncing on the lawn like rubber balls as they fell. Clusters of white ice appearing in nooks and crannies. All the time the sky remained dark and oppressive, the storm above and around us. We watched on, all the time relieved to be inside, warm and dry!
Relationships: Your husband, wife, children, partner, family, and friends. People you trust, are close to, or intimate with.
First, let me explain Coca Cola. This is an area of central San Jose which once boasted a Coca Cola bottling plant. The plant has long disappeared and bus stations and stops have taken its place, but the area is still referred to as...Coca Cola.
At the next mark (5") sew the socket of a snap at the mark on the left side of the seam allowance
Brian
So I believe the lessons we should learn here are:
"Late on a hot summer night in the tail end of 1965, Charlie Bucktin, a precocious and bookish boy of thirteen, is startled by an urgent knock on the window of his sleep-out. His visitor is Jasper Jones, an outcast in the regional mining town of Corrigan. Rebellious, mixed-race and solitary, Jasper is a distant figure of danger and intrigue for Charlie. So when Jasper begs for his help, Charlie eagerly steals into the night by his side, terribly afraid but desperate to impress. Jasper takes him through town and to his secret glade in the bush, and it's here that Charlie bears witness to Jasper's horrible discovery.
MARISOL: I don’t care.
Number Six
Unforgiveness – of self – the welcoming home.
The special effects are fantastic, even though in the final act they tend to stray a bit on the Transformers side, with a bit too many machines and buildings being destroyed. That said, the heroes show off their powers in the coolest possible way without it even for a second seeming unnecessary or put there just for the fans' sake. The cinematography is nothing spectacular or fancy, but even amidst the greatest chaos you always know exactly what is happening and who it's happening to. If the movie has anything vaguely reminiscent of a flaw, it would be the typically unmemorable soundtrack, but Marvel movies have never had great music anyway, and it's by no means bad.
3. Navel oranges or cantaloupes, 3 lbs. for $1 at Sun Harvest (through 2/16/11)
He cocked his head to the side and stared at the atoms that paced the walkways. He watched the tinier than tiny citizens going about their nightly leisure pursuits. Each and every one of them knew who made it safe for them. They knew he watched their every move. Watched them until they made the wrong move. And then they would meet the reaper.
Next up: Emma's dance recital.
Meanwhile, bring 3 cups of water to a boil in a medium saucepan. Add the yellow split peas and simmer, uncovered, for 25-35 minutes, or until tender but not mushy. You want there to be a bit of give when you bite into them. Drain the peas and rinse with cold water to stop the cooking process. Chill or bring to a room temperature.
I don’t know if it was the occasion, because it was all Liverpool or seeing Gary Ablett’s family in the stand but the minutes silence for the 96 had more significance and emotion than usual.
I had a Spellbinders Grand Calibur on my wishlist for a long time and I finally made the purchase. I only considered a Calibur because of the ability of cutting an 8 1/2 x 11 inch paper. I did hear a few reviews before the purchase but I did not find any of the complaints to be my case. I do like the fact that it can cut the larger size of paper but I am not impressed that it cannot cut chipboard. I really wanted something to cut the sizzix dies with chipboard and I think my options are slim. I have come to the realization that I need a big shot pro.
The middle aged man had become an "Older Man" during the years in between.....
Indian Man
And that's my top ten. And now for a few (dis)honorable mentions. You can decide for yourself whether they're dishonorable or honorable. These are in no particular order
So, what does this year have in store for the highest paid wide receiver in NFL history? Calvin Johnson should certainly expect something out of the ordinary in 2012. The cover boy for Madden 13 is up against a a relentless curse that has refused to be denied. Lets take a look back:
Our reading was taken from the Old Testament, from the Song of Solomon, also known as the Song of Songs. This is not some dry and dusty passage of ancient history, but a song of passion, of the all-consuming love: the love of a man for a woman, the love of a Heavenly Father for his creation. The writer speaks of a love as strong as death, a passion as fierce as the grave. Strong words which capture the vividness of the relationship that brings James and Sarah together.
“One Hundred of Something…“ This may be the only time we’ll ever actually use a clock as a means of measurement during a program!
Because we make each mix by hand we are
1. I make sure I am all stocked up on my cleaners. For my spring cleaning, I typically use Basic H which is an all purpose cleaner, window cleaner, and degreaser in one, Scour off, Nature Bright & Basic G. I only use non-toxic cleaners in my home. (Cleaning with toxic cleaners does more harm than good). I place everything in my caddy (shown below), along with the trash bags & rags.
After confirming the statement submitted was his, Paddy was given over to cross-examination by Kenneth McClean, barrister for four of the respondent companies, and the cross examination went on from 11am to nearly 4.30pm with a 1-hour break at lunch. There seemed to be four strands to the narrative that Kenneth McClean was trying to create today
Originally from Red Deer, Alta., Smith was 24 and had been taking LSD and drinking when he and Rodney Munro marched the two men into the woods where Munro stabbed one of them and Smith shot them both in the head.
“We don’t care what you say…FORGET YOU!”…
One that is all too well-known.
Boneyards: Pyr trade paperback, January 2012, 299 pages, cover art by Dave Seeley. Kristine Kathryn Rusch is a most prolific author, writing under her own name and various pseudonyms in a host of genres: science fiction, fantasy, horror, mystery, romance, and no doubt others. She was the Campbell Award winner for best new author in 1990 and has since won the Hugo Award as both a writer and an editor, among many other honors.
Feeling the cool breeze through you is also one kind of meditation, for a movement you forget the world and get immerse in a peaceful reservoir.
Live your life. Really live it. And move forward – with bravery and passion. xo
And then I wrote two slices about my venture into March Poetry Madness-
Accounts of the life experiences of an author may sometimes help to clarify his thought. I believe this book stands on its own with no essential need for biographical detail about its author. Yet during the time that the doctoral dissertation on which this book is based was being researched, Anastaplo was carrying on a dramatic legal battle, his Bar Admission Case, where the subject matter of this book, the principles of American governance, were being worked out and discovered by him in practice. The materials on his case, found in Appendix F of this volume, do provide an “instructive” supplement to the body of the book.
November 17: I am thankful for voice recordings of Poppa. He might ask the same questions over and over and they might be slightly annoying now. But I know there will be a day that I wish I could hear him again.
Or we can listen to the language being used and estimate whether it indicates that the medium is channeling a Third-Dimensional source (usually his or her own mind), a Fourth-Dimensional source (usually an astral entity), or a Fifth-Dimensional or higher source.
Now, be careful! This box, that you get from the decorations, only gives you pots and Maple Coins. It can also give you a better box, the box that you obtain from monsters, the 9th Anniversary Celebration Box:
My Professional Product Whore Opinion:
Like Immanuel Kant, he felt that everyone looked for it.
So............................here is a representation of the goodies that arrived in my mailbox a few days later:
and rising with the sun. i have met another starseed and our long days
We are literally asking you to follow the stream of bliss that moves in the field of your body, sometimes delicately and sometimes in torrential streams of almost unbearable force. Know that it is all preparation for the next step in your unfoldment.
We are created by Allah to serve Allah s.w.t. and to serve mankind as best as we could.
The Avengers is the best comic book film I have yet to see. Now, let me clarify. In my opinion, The Dark Knight is not a comic book film. It’s a film based on a comic character but is more of a crime drama than anything else. When it comes to taking the page and literally bringing it to life in front of your eyes? The Avengers has no equal.
I don’t mean to be dramatic folks, trust me, I’m extremely thankful that I wasn’t waiting on life-threatening results, but with that said the stress factor is gone and I will be back in the game after a week of rest, ice, and lots of ibuprofen; and that makes me feel like this …
Winter break came and went, and I was ready for another fun-filled semester up in Flagstaff. Once I arrived back to my loving home, I instantly caught a whiff of a disgusting smell lurking near my bedroom. I had forgotten about the whole "Jose incident" since it was about three weeks beforehand.
The proposed Unified Patent Litigation System (UPLS)
86. One of my friends posted on FB today that she saw a guy texting while driving HIS MOTORCYCLE!! No kiddin'.....you can't make that crap up! (Well, I guess you can, but why would you?)
I won’t reveal too much about the plot for fear of any spoilers but I will confirm that the on-off relationship we know and love between Shiraz and Wesley is as complex and frustrating as ever. Will they, won’t they? Who knows!
Foreshadowing is just one of the plot devices in which Miller shows off her skills. Traveling to the school with her mother, Iris notices that “the mountainous peaks resembled teeth. The road stretched between them like a black tongue. And here we were, in our small vehicle, speeding toward that awful mouth.” One cannot help but wonder if the school will swallow Iris.
3 cups dried, unsweetened coconut flakes
Oh, my absent love
First of all, as this is about ME, we should select ME patients and not exclude them as the CBT psychiatrists always do.
My goals for 2012 are the following:
The Victorian period is known for its modesty, privacy, and orderliness. Table and chair legs were covered as some thought they were reminiscent of nude human legs. The ideal home was carefully divided into public and private spaces. One of the most important rooms for any Victorian house was the parlor, where the hosts received all guests. This interior showcase usually contained games and collectables to be enjoyed by company. In Victorian popular opinion, heavy ornamentation was important to a well-designed space, so a bare room was considered a faux pa. For this reason, Victorian rooms required many spaces, shelves, and cabinets for objets d’art and knickknacks.
“No one has a tandoor in their backyard, Ajoy, we need to do something that will make an ‘Aussie’ cook it at home.”
So now the clean up begins.
Kessler’s best-selling book on the Secret Service, one of a series in which he has chronicled the nation's spy and security services over the course of a decades-long career, hit the New York Times best sellers’ list in 2010. He has since written “The Secrets of the FBI.”
(etc. etc. etc.)
M. WARD: THE FIRST TIME I RAN AWAY: A music video about running away and finding something (or someone) to run to.
“You’re confusing humans with apes,” I replied. “A man married to a dragon-lady can only fantasize about bed-pinning scenarios. Attempting such a manoeuvre in real life would most likely provoke a stiletto in the groin.”
She was strong willed and many times stubborn, but that will has made her character what it is today. She loves the Lord with all her heart and has been an inspiration to me many times over.
I love God. Why is this so threatening to some people? I don’t get it. Why is it so important to ridicule another person’s feelings? Another person’s hopes? Another person’s love? I’ll be the first to admit that I don’t believe blindly in the words of the Bible. At the same time I won’t have anyone ridicule it, and at the same time ridiculing my faith. I have found great comfort in some of what is written there. The Bible is a wonderful book filled with valuable lessons. Whether everything in there is the Truth or not is unimportant to me, because I still think it’s the most beautiful book ever written. And whether every single word in it is 100% true is really unimportant, because using that as an argument to prove that there is no God is missing the point. In my mind, the single most important thing about the Bible is its message of Love. How on earth would a book about Love be threatening to anyone? Because of its message, the Bible has been of great comfort to people, amongst them my grandma. My good grandma. The Bible provides hope, comfort, inspiration, and joy for so many. Faith provides the same things and more.
Inherited a new team of individuals who lack cohesion and are suspicious of others motives? Demoralised by threats of cuts and savings?
And hitch myself to some other star.
I'll go about my day as I always do...enjoying each quiet moment and task.
The automated classification is complemented by a highly specialized global team of threat analysts, each focused on a specific type of malware, such as viruses, Trojans, worms, spyware and other exploits, to ensure around-the-clock protection.
Tue-AM: 1:33, 3000' ~ Green Mt.
Our online casino has all the slots are no different from the real slot machines. So that you can start playing for real money immediately after the registration. Every day we accrue FUN chips for the fact that you could play your favorite slot machines for free.
The width of the center is perfect for holding my wrapping paper. I added this great tension rod to hang my wrapping paper and ribbon that I use regularly. I really could use another one but for right now this works. Once I get into the Christmas season I may add a few more to hang all my wrapping paper for the season.
I’d guess not!
This call is open to everyone! If you have applied for our any of our previous Design Team calls, please feel free to reapply! You are not required to use Inky Impressions stamps for your submissions but it’s a plus if you do.
I'm at Panera Bread... this is where I have been coming for the past three days! We do not have internet hooked up yet so to catch up with everything...I come here for a little bit!
I just finished the memoir "An Invisible Thread" last night that was written by Laura Schroff & Alex Tresniowski. I really enjoyed it & I think it has a great message that everyone should read. I don't want to ruin anything but it basically begins where a little boy (around 11 years old) is asking for money on the streets & this busy woman in her 30's just walks right past him & ignores him. Something changes her mind so she turns around & offers to take him to get some food instead. This little moment was the turning point that changed everything in both of their lives. The story is about the influence they both have on each other down the road & the "invisible thread" that tied them together.
As far as Christians receiving the promises, according to the context of Galatians 3, this wasn’t about the land that was promised. As verse 14 tells us it was about the promise of the “spirit through faith”.
On Friday, April 20th, a late afternoon party was hosted by the San Francisco Bay Guardian in honor of "420" which has become an increasingly universal code for marijuana. The slang dates from the early 1970s when a half-dozen stoners at San Rafael High School met at the Louis Pasteur statue at 4:20 after school and athletic practice before going on goofball adventures, usually involving pot. (Click here for an amusing article, "Sparking a Tradition," from the Boulder Weekly.)
Gary Slapper, of the Open University (who is always worth reading in The Times) has a truly weird case this week… and I mean W E I R D
BUT EMMETT WENT TO BED WITH SIMONE!!! Did anything else really register?
Sicko:Bullet for my Valentine .
Trespassing , spazzing, god i am fat,
To add to the list of highlights was a full deli, meat market, fresh seafood counter, and bakery with fresh baked breads and sweet, sweet homemade goodies! Now, sure, all our area grocery stores have a mix of two to three of these, but NEVER all four done to the extent Fairway Market’s is! Anything you could need from any of these sections is available at your fingertips.
Beers is eastern England generally contain more hops than other regions. Traditional styles of English beer are Bitter, Mild, Old Ale, Brown Ale, India Pale Ale, Porter and Stout."
In many series finales fans are often left longing for more. I think Mark Schwahn and the writers couldn’t have wrapped the show up better. The whole episode draws from previous seasons and the fans that have stuck around from the beginning got to enjoy a lot of old references and flashbacks. The episode opens with Nathan watching his 17-year-old self on the River Court, Brooke in high school when she wins class president and Haley making her wish list for senior year.
Yes mother’s day is around the corner and before you know it we’ll be talking again. At that point however I’ll have over a year and to make things even crazier did you know that we only have 2 more phone calls left. Mother’s day and the Next Christmas. It’s odd to see how far I’ve come in such a short time. President has given me the go ahead to start thinking of names to give him for the next financial secretary. When the time comes I’ll give him three names and hell pray about them and then the lord will let us know who I am supposed to train.
We have a bit of a salvia passion in My Florida Backyard. With very few exceptions, they are wonderful for attracting both butterflies and hummingbirds. They are easy to care for, and many of them reseed readily. It seems there are always new varieties to discover, and while they don't all do well in Central Florida, Wendy's Wish should be well suited to thrive here. It's cold hardy to about 25 degrees, and has a long flowering season. Growing experts note that those in hot climates may want to give it a little shade in the hottest part of the day, so we planted ours where it can get some afternoon shade in the summer.
After sewing the side seams, and hemming the bottom, place the bias tape along the hem edge. I divided my front skirt panel in thirds, and placed my bias tape on the 1/3 mark, closest to the right side seam.
So I was given exactly what I asked for, clear verbal and visual communication and a definite experience of mediumship, and I rejected it. Figures. But I felt that I was doing what I needed to do to keep myself safe.
With the sound of Annie Potts yelling “WE GOT ONE” over at Bologna HQ, I tentatively pressed play on Kill The Great Raven to be greeted with the exact kind of insidious skanking we cherish, peppered with unnerving vocal interludes, ping pong percussion, and (possibly) an oud solo meandering into the fade out.
Source: From the Author-Melitta Strandberg
Eyebrows explains that he’s from (or is or something) the Daath (or Da’at or whatever) and that they are deciding the direction of humanity’s evolution taking it to the next stage and he asks whether Shu wants to be the Adam to Mana’s Eve and of course Shu says no whilst apparently Gai said yes without hesitating and that is the explanation.
Mary nodded and returned to the kitchen, humming a tune under her breath.
Those plans collapsed due to construction delays and squabbles over contractual terms. By 2004, most of the minor partners to the consortium posted losses or substantially decreased profits.
I'll let you know how I get on with my "to do" list. However tonight I think that the first thing to do might be to go to bed as it's almost 11pm.
Perhaps to help eliminate that fear or reluctance that building owners and managers might feel, I thought I would point out a few things they can consider doing to attract and retain tenants.
The food tasted like I was in my grandmother’s kitchen, if she was a Southerner. Cooked perfectly and we rounded it out with buttermilk pie a la mode. The ice cream tastes like how it used to taste before companies cared more about profits than product – you could taste the cream. Hank and Bobbie-Joe hadn’t tasted food like this before and both swore if they could, if they ever had the chance, they would move to Texarkana, just for the Dixie Diner’s food. And for the friendly service.
Sure enough a nice climb triggered off the slopes to the south of Blaengarw and once again I was back up at 5,000′ with only 13km to go. I drifted south with it for another couple of kms before either I lost it or it fizzled out, so with 11km to goal and a required glide ratio to goal of 7:1 I decided to get on half bar and follow the arrow on my B1 Nav.
"Grouping order", of course, is how Gevin Giorbran liked to refer to the underlying organizing process that reveals itself within timelessness. If I throw a coin ten times and write down H or T for heads or tails, the highest possible grouping order would look like this: HHHHHTTTTT (or TTTTTHHHHH). The other possible extreme would be HTHTHTHTHT (or THTHTHTHTH), which Gevin referred to as being the highest possible "symmetry order". Both of those orders are, when viewed as a whole, identical: they represent a perfectly balanced symmetry, the "zero" that we start from and the "zero" that our universe returns to. The idea that our universe or any other springs from a breaking of symmetry is not unique to Gevin though. Cosmologists refer to symmetry breaking all the time as the answer to this simple question. "Why is there something rather than nothing?"
Pregnancy is a great thing- it's a time of change, growing, anticipation, and endless thoughts about how wonderful your children are going to be. However, it's also a time when you feel so sick you can't peel yourself off of the couch, eat like crazy, throw up, deal with heart burn, take naps multiple times a day, are crabby, and sore. You also have to buy new clothes every couple of weeks because you grow so fast that nothing fits. Well, I'm expecting twins, so I have experienced double these wonderful pregnancy symptoms. However, I've never been happier, so it's worth it.
Quote 3
Windows 8 will now include Windows store like the Android Market and Apple store. Users can purchase stuff from the Windows store to use it on their
‘King’ Abdullah of Saudi Arabia is a war criminal like GW Bush, Tony Blair, Dick Cheney, Donald Rumsfeld, Colin Powell …. Without Abdullah’s approval, his financial and material support for ‘the coalition of the willing’ and their mercenaries, the Iraqi genocide would not have occurred.
Hi ladies...
"o-bah-mah" "o-bah-mah" "o-bah-mah" "o-bah-mah"
Pewter jumbo eyelets (#108432, $9.95)
Why shouldn't Iran have a nuclear weapon? Israel has it. Why does Israel think it needs a nuclear weapon and Iran doesn't. Why should Israel have nukes in the first place?
In another epitome in my dreams
So I've been thinking about the marathon, and I've become a bit concerned about doing such a large bit of exercise while nursing. Some women experience a decrease in milk supply when they do major feats. Couple that with me being out of country for five days a couple weeks before the walk, and I was getting a bit nervous. I don't want to put my hare-brained ideas before my baby's food supply!
Bran Muffins
i go you go,my dear;and whatever is done
As I have said before, a great nation evolves slowly. Transitional periods take decades. This can generate complacency, as in “there’s no hurry.” That’s wrong, IMO. Rather we’re on the clock. Every day the old regime dies a little, and a new regime takes shape. The longer we wait to join the game, the more difficult it will be to control or reverse current trends. There’s no need to panic; there’s time to think and plan, but there’s no time to waste.
Doctor Who fans are spoilt with the care and attention that is lavished on the DVD releases. But as well as being lovingly restored, should the stories be improved, correcting technical 'errors' of the past? Sparring partners Tony Hadoke and Johnny Candon argue whether rewriting history is ever justified in A Battle of Wits!
Trusting yourself allows you to trust the teachings of the Masters. I am understanding that chaos is light in action and I’ve welcomed light in my life. I wonder if we will ever really be at peace… with our souls constantly working for us and opening new doors and testing us… our poor soul just doesn’t seem to get any rest. Kinda’ interesting too how we tend to want to sweat the small stuff… Man, the small stuff is easy.
When exposed to colloidal silver, harmful bacteria in the affected are killed while viruses which require important proteins and enzymes for their effective function have these striped or disabled by the actions of silver. Today, many hospitals provide silver infused bandages in order to give extra protection.
my driveway, face skyward, cricks in my neck be darned, chasing after my doll as it whirred through the sky. More than once, I had to call my dad outside to fetch it from the gutter or some wayward tree branch.
for the blog header.
And blue spurt of a lighted match,
But if I were writing a screenplay, this would be how the scene would be laid out.
1 package baby spinach
Ted grounds keeper 75 year old and hates kids. He has a limp and very good eye sight.
I went out for a going away dinner at an Indian restaurant and everyone had a million questions about what was going on with me and Mr. Big. I didn’t have anything to tell them except that me and Jo might be moving in together, it wasn’t their business. The sick feeling was still in my stomach but I felt okay.
Writer is the word processor inside LibreOffice. Use it for everything, from dashing off a quick letter to producing an entire book with tables of contents, embedded illustrations, bibliographies and diagrams.
As I gain the cove with pushing prow,
I've been thinking lately what to blog about. Got nothing really. Just a bunch of COAL.
B: The Northwest Ordinance (1787). . . . .pg. 223
Day in Paradise package is from 8am-9pm. Lunch buffet is from 12nn-2:30pm only. Wristbands shall be worn for the day in availing this package. One adult, one child policy applies for your safety. Payment shall be made on the day this package will be availed. Prices may change without prior notice.
The front and back cover of the accordian style invitation was created using Stardream shimmer cardstock in cappaccino. Releasing the ribbon tied around the invitation, the guest was soon gazing at a watercolor illustration of the brides home where the wedding was to take place. The lovely black and white ink drawing she provided was first printed on the invitation then hand painted by me. The entirety of the invitation wording was hand lettered in a custom look to fit the sweet occasion.
My Spider wheel tub repair is dependant on getting the wheel arch repaired and vice-versa. So I need an arch repair panel before I can go any further. It’s a complicated panel with a lot of compound curves and the thought of making one gave me palpitations, so I decided now was the time to open my wallet and buy some of the bits that I can’t avoid having to buy!
Your location: where are you? In Australia? Which state? I especially find that many pages that advertise markets fail to make it clear which STATE they are. Listing a suburb without a state can be very misleading and frustrating; many people who visit your page won’t know where you are. Business lost. Make sure you make it abundantly clear what your full address is, including state.
Not only did I learn useful real world stuff, I got a few ideas for my characters and story from this encounter. Serendipity is a wondrous thing.
Hope you all had a lovely Easter!
See, we screwed up and gave in to evil. The result of evil, is well. DEATH.
In that rich earth a richer dust concealed;
here it is all finnished.
Offering Himself then as an Image and Pattern of that which must be done, and bringing before them that which has been already accomplished by Him in their behalf, He persuades them to imitate their Teacher and themselves to be conspicuous in like righteousness when He says: Ye did not choose Me, but I chose you, and what follows.
Me: STUNNED with gator sized tears, Wow, seriously?! I even flipped to the wrong day in the devotional book!
AdriN2001: Like, it's something incrediable
Thanks for much for wishing the hubberz happy birthday! I think he secretly enjoyed having a bunch of strangers wish him happy birthday :)
13. Kai has father, mother, and sister two years older than him.
Please let me know. I love you, readers.
Agathe – Christine Brewer
Chewing on boys for your survival
And so it goes on. There are monthly variations, too. Twice a month, around the full moon and new moon, we get what is called a spring tide. This is when the high tide is at its highest and the low is at its lowest.
Iron all the wrinkles out and fold the corners very neatly.
“Oh GB!” she cried, shedding bitter tears. “I knew this day would come, yet now that it has arrived, my heart aches like an abandoned puppy!”
Where wide the storms their banners fling,
Don’t get me wrong, I get why you wouldn’t want your man to look at another women dance around with no clothes on, I’m not a moron … I get it. Do I understand how you class that on the same levels as a man cheating on you? No. Not even almost. Women get crazy when they get into relationships and expect a man to lock his vision onto her and only her, acting like he betrayed her if he looks elsewhere.
I have always done a basic baked ham, this year I decided to dress it up with pineapple and cherries. This recipe also has a glaze of brown sugar, pineapple juice and lemon lime soda. Everyone loved it and it looked so pretty, so pretty we wanted to hurry and eat it so there are no after photos.
Yes, we really didn't study any numbers here, but at least the cards shown involved numbers...I tried!!
*plans to get on with stuff*
I also wanted to mention that I did use the "rock 'n roll" technique for stamping my sun. I simply started by inking up with Mustard Seed first and then rolling the stamp in the Orange Marmalade.
You deserved much much more
Despite knowing me as intimately as he does, Dave loves me all the more. What, then, is principle number three? Accept your husband for who he is. You cannot change him. When you are convinced your husband needs to change, begin praying the Lord will change you.
The Catholic tradition has pointed out how this scene expresses Mary’s compassion and attentiveness to others’ needs. Lumen Gentium describes Mary at Cana being “moved with pity.” Pope John Paul II said Mary was “prompted by her merciful heart” to help this family by bringing her concern for them to Jesus: “Having sensed the eventual disappointment of the newly married couple and guests because of the lack of wine, the Blessed Virgin compassionately suggested to Jesus that he intervene with his messianic power.”
He stared at me in shock and then started laughing so hard he had to stop walking. We stood in the middle of the hallway and I watched both directions as I waited for him to get control of himself. If someone came along and saw him like this, it wouldn’t go well for me. When he caught his breath he said, “You never thought of giving me anything.” He repeated it as if it was the punch line to a good joke. “Not even
Our thoughts, prayers and love are especially with those who have lost loved ones, and with all our family and friends in the flood affected areas of Qld and Northern NSW.
And so we come to the fifth and last step: to meet Christ yourself. For the risen Christ is very much alive; and I believe that he will reveal himself to you if you ask him to, and if you make room in time and efforts to find him. Seek him in his Word, in his sacraments, in his real presence in the Blessed Sacrament; in prayer, in his Church, in those who follow him most closely.
It comes with 6 eye colors: Buff Pearl and African Violet, Sateen Eye Colour in Tawny Apricot, Matte Eye Colour in Rich Cocoa, Pale Pink and Black Plum. As well as 2 cheek colors, which are Rose Desire and Fresh peach. All of this for $60 is an amazing deal!
A NOVEL IDEA (Tyndale House Publishers 2009)
This reveal was followed by the unveiling of a track from the album. The song is called “Ekki múkk” (“Not a sound”) and the accompanying video is by the lovely Ingibjörg Birgisdóttir, who is a member of Seabear and an accomplished visual artist (along with Lilja Birgisdóttir she created the artwork for Jónsi’s ‘Go’ as well as this issue of Reykjavík Grapevine). Watch the video embed below, it is very fitting to the song and in tune with Sigur Rós’ established aesthetic.
Coloring: Copic Markers
Bribie definitely offers plenty of them and right across the road from our apartment was this perfect spot that the kids loved. Most days it provided only knee lapping waves, just right for a three year old!
“The list of things they told him
What the jury and the defense lawyers didn’t know about was the evidence that had been concealed by Williamson County law enforcement. Only the sheriff’s office and the district attorney knew about it.
So many good thoughts here. Hard to know what to add, though grateful for them all.
time (a long time – sometimes our industry is slow to see the obvious) level premium
Today my purpose is to communicate GoooodNews. Please join me in bringing GoooodNews stories to the World.
Saor Óglach 22 bl
the heart this heavy
I won’t ever make that mistake again.”
Khadr said building remote-controlled roadside bombs to kill American soldiers in Afghanistan was “the proudest moment of his life.” He had a special hatred for Jews.
"Really, Daniel!" said Mr. Popper. "William has had a shock."
“The Home Minister says the government is not threatened by Bersih 3.0, but then it is trying hard to move the rally out of the city centre.
But what of the writer? OK, she wrote a not very good article, based on assumptions and stereotypes (again) for a fee. It may well have been edited between submission and publication. There is no way however that she deserves all the nastiness directed in her attention. I hope in fact she has been paid a nice fat fee for generating so much interest in the second rate rag she wrote for.
and talk to haints
I have been shouting for over a week, scaring the kids and the Don's cats, at the news of Shannon Messenger's book deal. I mean, she's the reverend mother of Marvelous Middle Grade Monday, which is the only reason I can think of for her ability to keep such a saintly silence about her good fortune for OVER FIVE MONTHS!!
It is always entertaining to see how the cast from the original "Star Trek" television series tried to move on after the show got the ax. Many of the cast members continued to look for jobs in the industry. DeForest Kelley starred in the giant rabbit flick "Night of the Lepus" and Walter Koenig actually began writing episodes for TV series, including the "The Stranger", which introduced Enik on "Land of the Lost". Nichelle Nichols, Leonard Nimoy and William Shatner all attempted singing careers, the less said about that the better.
Here’s another thing that matters: pets. Blue Collar Guy grew up on a farm, so in his mind, there was a place for animals. It was called the barn. He did not grow up with dogs and cats sleeping on the bed. When I first met him, it was pretty weird to me. After a couple of years living without indoor pets, though, I could really see his view clearly. Pets should be outside as much as possible, if you live in a space where it’s possible. Our dog and cats sleep in the garage at night, or during inclement weather. The rest of the time, they have a yard and ten acres to explore. I don’t need to clean cat hair or muddy footprints off of anything. I will say, though, that I know people love their pets and I have no expectation that you’ll turn your pets outside if you were sleeping with a Labradoodle on your bed up until now. That’s fine. Just know that there’s a price to be paid in cleaning for every pet who spends times indoors.
I absolutely love the parables. They are most certainly my favorite form of literature in the gospels. Matthew has packed this chapter full of them.
But let’s not push it.
In several web sites, reviews for feature products written by customers are revealed on the web site.
Anywhere we want to go
Lucas, don’t shave it. No matter what they tell you, you look like a fucking super-human mutant.
Serkan also notes that Facebook would be unlikely to be interested in Mixi, and we agree given that Zuckerberg and company don’t appear to be having difficulty building a user base in Japan.
If you email me any ideas you have so far, Diane and I will post them into the body of the blog. There will be some time lags sometimes, but we'll keep it going.
YOOOOOOOOOOUUUUUUUUUU
compulsive antivirus
We always have a hard time choosing our Top 3, but here they are, in no particular order.
BF: *really cold side eye stare, slight lip curl*
I also love the fact that unschooling allows us the freedom to focus on the application of what we have learned, if we so choose. So much of our Sad American Scholastic System is designed around helping students reach specific goals in order to get into college and enter the workforce as productive Americans. That completely discounts two things. First of all, stating that all children need to operate from the same exact body of knowledge completely negates everything I said above, that is to say that it dismisses the way people actually learn best and how critical learning choices are to maintaining a love for learning throughout your life. But worst of all, by saying that we all need to know the same things in order to succeed in the world, it discounts the fact that this world is a crazy and complex place. I feel very comfortable saying that what we need is fresh and unique perspectives to solve some of our problems and inequities, not a bunch of sheeple who have been born and bred in a world of doctrine and routine.
1/2 tspn vanilla extract
It cost us nothing.
Free things to do in Asheville
While the bird is coming to room temperature, remove the middle rack in your oven and preheat to 450F. Place a 10-inch cast-iron skillet or roasting pan into the oven while it preheats.
And on the heels of that one, the perseverance award because of the pans and pans of broccoli, peas, and green beans she has continued to cook because she has been taught that after plenty of exposure, the 2 year old will one day eat it (yeah, right....)
Then, once you've built up your "closet," you say what you wore on a specific days, for specific things. You can have different outfits for work, the gym, going out to dinner, etc. all in one day. And for adding things to your closet, and choosing your outfits, you get points. And then they do giveaways! I actually won a cool pair of vintage Hugo Boss sunglasses back when it was in Beta, so this shizz is real, y'all! They aren't just pulling your leg.
1. Integrity: Demonstrates the highest standards of behavior through honesty, fairness, and trust in everything that they do. Is direct, forthcoming and does what is right. Honors commitments and is accountable for their actions.
Kenny MacAskill says that he didn't urge the only man convicted of the Lockerbie bombing to drop his appeal to smooth the way for his compassionate release whilst Abdelbaset Ali Mohmed al-Megrahi says that he did. They can't both be telling the truth.
T. = Tuesday
The Squirrel image is a stamp from SU! Animal Crackers, A RAK from B.....
* Met up with this beautiful Senior & we ventured to do some pictures. The rain was still lingering a bit so we just did some pictures & agreed to meet the next day for more. ... here's one of the pictures we got in the midst of running from rain... still turned out cute, huh?
The little baseballs you see sticking out at the top of the scrapbook is attached to inserts I made so my daughter could write down things like Ryan's coach's name and team members. At this point you think you will never forget those details, trust me, 25 years later you will be glad you did.
Three weeks of therapy remain....hopefully I will be strong enough to be done at that point....Hopefully done with the cane, even though I may still be moving slowly.
This is a deceptively simple challenge. The whole point is to physically check your resources for weaknesses. Besides, this may be a good opportunity to clean out the back of the fridge! Good luck
Friday morning and afternoon will be spent entertaining the kids, with visits to local kid-friendly attractions, followed by our traditional pre-game meal/ritual at Dave & Busters. Then, we’ll return to the hotel and get set up for the con, which will open at 6pm. We’ll be flying at warp speed from that point.
and handmade Halloween costumes,
For the feat is strong against them
all the employees. Their well-being, happiness, contentment and job satisfaction will definitely result in the business enjoying good profits while employees may not venture looking for new job opportunities.
03 Time and Time Again
I'm a huge lover of books - not just novels but books about design (hence this blog)...about travel (hence my new blog)...about photography (which there will be lots of on the new blog)...as well as books that are inspirational...and many other kinds...
By the time I arrived at Squaw Creek it was already dark. I was running alone for the most part but since a lot of the course was on fire road I kept getting passed by race traffic, crew and race staff shuttling back and forth from the aid stations. I barely stopped at Squaw Creek as I was eager to start the 2,000+ foot climb to Dutchman Peak. RD Hal Koerner had been on parts of the course checking up on us and I'm assuming the aid stations as well. He was a half mile from the peak warning us about the weather at the top informing us that it gets a whole lot better the moment we drop back down to the lower elevations. The top of Dutchman is the highest point of the course at 7,000+ feet. Since I was on the shielded side and below the peak I made some cocky comment about how the weather was just fine. He gave me a high-five anyway. Dutchman at mile 65 was the shelter from the wind storm. You see the lights before you actually make the station and it was so nice in there. The whole station is shielded from the wind, there are chairs and blankets, hot fresh food and cots for the weary - it felt like the eye of a storm. Dutchman is the second of the three down and back sections. Like Squaw Lakes we had to go out and grab a flag and return to the aid station. Thankfully there wasn't much climbing since we were already at the peak but boy that run along the ridge was a windfest. Wisely I had accessed my Nathan pack before leaving and dug out my Marmot shell and headlamp. It was nice to shed the garbage bag but cursed myself for forgetting to pack extra shirts. Shell went right over the already soaked t-shirt and arm warmers, at least the arm warmers were fleece lined.
It’s a simple fact that gamers will always outstrip the ability of developers to provide content in MMOs. We will always finish what there is to play before the next update is available – look at World of Warcraft and the army of developers they have, and yet the content is almost always played through by some within days of release.
Shining from Vancouver,
Kate: Today's author is Megg Jensen, author of Anathema, Oubilette, and Severed (the Cloud Prophet Trilogy), among other books. That's right, she's giving away THREE books in the Big Awesome YA Giveaway!! She is also the author of Sleepers, which I understand is getting a new cover this week and thus couldn't be included.
She gave me a peck and went away without saying a word.As if she thought she could fool me into thinking how composed and strong she was and she wasn’t crying herself to sleep every single night i did it in my own bed.
Let me tell you a little about her...
and shine you through and through.
HAGUE ABDUCTION CONVENTION
Conservative women have had it up to HERE with these relentless attacks on their hero, Rush Limbaugh. It all began when that birth control-pill-guzzling trollop from Georgetown started saying mean things about Rush. Since then, armies of Femi-Nazis, aided and abetted by the Liberal Media, have been pummeling this poor man nonstop.
Spray bottle full of water
Intellectual Ventures (IV) has insisted for a long while that its accumulation of patents has nothing to do with patent litigation. In fact, the company has prided itself on not filing any lawsuits, despite the claim that its patent portfolio, comprising 27,000 patents, has brought in over $1B in licensing revenue. Recently, IV was rumored to have struck a $120M patent deal with Intuit Inc., and also struck deals with companies like Cisco and Verizon for between $200M and $400M apiece.
It is the purpose that drives us – Smith
Drawn in Photoshop on the graphic tablet.
Personal author:
Along with its other political investments of the I970s and I980s, the corporate community sponsored the growth of institutions such as the American Legal Foundation, the Capital Legal Foundation, the Media Institute, the Center for Media and Public Affairs, and Accuracy in Media (AIM). These may be regarded as institutions organized for the specific purpose of producing flak. Another and older flak-producing machine with a broader design is Freedom House. The American Legal Foundation, organized in I980, has specialized in Fairness Doctrine complaints and libel suits to aid “media victims.” The Capital Legal Foundation, incorporated in I977, was the Scaife vehicle for Westmoreland’s $I20-million libel suit against CBS.
Juliet Wilson
1. A watering can that doesn’t leak- $9.99
Kogii Kogii: 02-543-4244 in the back streets of Apgujung Rodeo.
1/2 red onion
you made child instead
Cooking Time: 35-45 minutes
6. Soylent Green (1973) – This must be Charlton Heston’s “end of the world” period, but I am not sure this qualifies as post apocalyptic. The world is overcrowded and food is at a premium. Only the wealthy can eat steaks and stuff. Everyone else must eat soylent green, which is supposedly made of plankton. Heston is a New York City police officer who embarks on a mystery.
10 ) When your boyfriend tries to set you up with one of his friends. (That’s usually a pretty bad sign…usually.)
There will appear at first to be more of negativity, more of violence. You’re getting it all up, out in the open, so that you can really finally, finally see what the choices are, Dark and Light, and allow yourself to choose the reality you really prefer.
I can also tell you that I’m tired because I’m working longer hours than I’m used to and it’s been an emotional ride getting used to the idea of letting other people take care of my kids (I have a blog post coming about the morning I hid in some bushes to spy on my son at one of those vacation care things).
It looks like today, in East Yorkshire, the last sunny day of this glorious Indian summer draws to a close with increasing cloud and although it's still warm, it is now raining.
1 endanger
Reason is doing good and he’s been carrying the bit well, during his light lunging sessions, since his dental work on Monday. I have yet to hop on him, as he got his feet trimmed and came up sore. The field has gotten pretty dry, crusty and hard which has not helped the situation either. Poor guy can’t seem to catch a break. He should be ready to go early next week and then we begin lots and lots of tack walking. But we’ll see. Thankfully we have two big fields to hack out on so we won’t get too bored too quickly with the walking..
I will never understand, as long as I live, why one of my greatest blessings had to come in the form of someone elses greatest loss. But what I do know is that God understands- first hand-about the loss of a child. His one and only. And I trust that He and only He can bring about complete healing to this family.
35If only God would give ear to me, and the Ruler of all would give me an answer! or if what he has against me had been put in writing!
I should maybe organize a zombie themed photo shoot?
Of course, the old drag queen wants listeners to “silently agree to disagree” (his words) when taking chat rooom issue with the racist guests he has on air. Only yes folk wanted, never a dialogue of opposing viewpoints. Someone has been mind-controlled into narrow-minded dogma.
so far we've tried coin purses, fun new tea towels, and something too cute to even mention!
All are bits of history and past their prime but never failing to stand proud. The three WWII era planes stood at attention waiting for their close ups. The B-17 was first. The line waiting to get inside was at least twenty people long. The line was a lot longer to get inside the B-17 because the Boeing B-17 Flying Fortress is the model of the famous plane the “Memphis Belle.” (I recommend this movie if you haven’t seen it). Behind the B-17 was the B-24 and although the line was not as long here there was a veteran WWII bomber, I would soon meet, named Dell Kenyon who told his story of flying thirty missions on the B-24s in northern Italy.
I made dinner for a woman in mom's club the other day. She just gave birth to a healthy baby girl at the age of 41. I wish I could be happy for her....but you know how that goes. She made my family dinner twice after Camille died, which I thought was incredibly kind. I figured I should return the favor. I told my husband that he had to drive with me over to their house, I didn't want to stay long and I wanted an excuse to leave quickly. She has a 3 year old son too, sigh. Talked to her briefly, asked her how she was feeling....tired of course. She asked me how I was and I don't even know what I said. I managed to ask what her daughters name was, she was holding her the whole time. I couldn't ask about the baby. I wished them a good night and left. My husband drove me to yoga class which I was getting to just in the nick of time. I wasn't sure if I'd be able to get to class that night. It was such a long day. I took Kai to a mom's club event strewn with babies and people who give less than a small shit about my loss. But I took Kai because he needed to get out. The president of the moms club is a very kind woman and just recently sent me a card telling me that she thinks of me all the time. I thought that was incredibly sweet. So between moms club and making dinner for my family and the other family, yoga was not a given.
Minions: “Meals!!!”
That made for a great afternoon, but the bigger treat came for me that night. You see, friends and neighbors, WoWSonya's husband Sean had recently received a beta key for Diablo III! Oh, man! The envy, it must have been streaming off of me when I first heard the news.
May 20
The Santopadres are not alone. The Social Security Administration, which sent out 52 million checks, said some of those checks mistakenly went to dead people because the agency had no record of their death. That amounts to between 8,000 and 10,000 checks for millions of dollars.
And what they have found is, unsurprisingly, a monstrous fucking mess.
Maybe it’s because I’ve also played at more outdoor weddings this year than ever before. There must be something more and more appealing about getting married outside. More adventurous couples, more risk takers willing to give up control and see what the future holds.
when the dark presses
her- what?
Undoubtedly, with such a broad topic, there are numeorous interpretations of this weeks challenge. I’ve chosen to go with some images I took on Fish Hoek Beach not too long ago. Fish Hoek is a little village about half an hours drive from the City Centre, with a wonderful beach. I was out taking some shots in the early morning, when I noticed some activity on the shore near where I was walking. Curiosity got hold of me, and I decided to walk closer and have a look. There were a whole lot of people in the water around what appeared to be a fishing boat. The boat had these timber beams tied to the boat and sticking out on both sides. As the boat got closer to shore a bunch of men from the group of people moved to both sides of the boat, each taking up a postion at one of the beams sticking out of the side of the boat. As this happened it became apparrent that the beams were for them to hold on to , to enable pulling, perhaps even lifting the boat out of the water and onto the shore. So as the boat got closer to the waters edge, “together” they pushed and lifted the boat to the shore. It wasnt long before the boat was clear of the water and secure on the shore, proving the theory ‘many hands make light work”
Lynn, 61, is on trial with the Rev. James Brennan, 48, who is charged with sexually assaulting a teen in 1996. Each has pleaded not guilty. Defrocked priest Edward Avery, 69, pleaded guilty to sexual assault charges days before trial, and is serving a 2-1/2 to 5-year prison term.
· Introduction of a ‘Green Train’ to run through the pristine forests of North Bengal.
You can also contact T.L.Ricks directly at 919 719 2715 to discuss ad possibilities and other marketing options with Raleigh’s very own RoughRiders.
Again: interpret as is your wont.
Return that which you took from us.
Now 12 soldiers and a security guard lie dead. At least 38 people were wounded, 28 of them seriously. If heads don't roll in this maggot's chain of command, the Army will have shamed itself beyond moral redemption.
My next-door neighbor died yesterday, aged 94. After suffering a long time with bronchitis—he hadn’t left the house in three weeks—he finally agreed to go to the hospital; I can only imagine how hard his relatives pushed to make that happen. Fiercely independent, he’d lived happily on his own since his wife died many years ago. The couple had no children but Marcel had lots of attentive family—the Guillots are a big clan who’ve been in St. Remy forever.
If we do not believe we are lovable or loved, it is unlikely we will attract a mate who will abundantly express love to us. We attract those who will reflect to us the very same feelings we harbour for ourselves. Even if the other does not reject us, we will frequently project or imagine that he or she is doing so.
There is a lurking fear that some things are not meant "to be known," that some inquiries are too dangerous for South Africans to make. Without wanting to appear too superficial, the press and whistle blowers has played a constructive role in informing the public about which that could have easily been swept underneath the carpet by the fraternal ‘stomach pushing' comrades in commanding positions of power abusing public resources through inflated charges, colluding, embezzlement and senseless corruption.
So how about you? What identity mark would you create for yourself? What words would you or those close to you use to describe you? How are you unique in what can sometimes feel a world where sameness rules?
I’ve been thinking a lot about this Resistance thing. Eckhart Tolle says it’s the ego trying to protect itself. Resistance causes blockage and dis-ease. (Doesn’t sound like a clear flow to me.) I’ve always been taught to fight through resistance. But I’m getting the message lately that it’s better to accept it. The tides of my life are trying to flow in a different way than how I’m going. That is Resistance. If I let myself move where life wants to take me, perhaps I will align myself with what wants to happen.
All royalty proceeds from this book go to WINGS (Women In Need Growing Stronger) and a student missionary scholarship fund. WINGS is a non-profit organization that provides a domestic violence shelter for women and their children in addition to transitional housing and programs.
Those movie sets were the perfect place for him to show his artwork around. Jason also busied himself back then by collecting and amassing Rocky Point memorabilia. “Online urban exploration sites showed what the park had turned into. I couldn’t believe it,” he says. “So, I tried to come up with Tales of the Crypt type comics… history meets urban legend.”
PM: 1:33, 2500'
Good luck to Kristin and her team!
Hermel pulled the blanket over his ears, having lost any interest in the squeaky voice looking for Lanna. Wisely so, thought Hormel, who did the same.
Join whales,
The Serpent’s Shadow is the 3rd and final installment of The Kane Chronicles. Rick Riordan is one of our favorite authors and we know our customers love him too! Check out what Carter and Sade are up to now.
In terms of my accepted and allowed belief systems, “Money” was not something that I ever considered /saw/recognized as being a Solution For this world. In fact I was not even at a stage where I had really considered actually taking on/ participating in a World Solution For ALL. This kind of “thinking” was still “foreign” to me so to speak. I was still existing how I was trained to exist. For myself. Considering Me First, and not worrying about the rest of humanity because this world is just to big anyways. Yes I was existing within the programming/ beliefs that I was given.
I am excited to turn thirty in a few months. My twenties have been filled with surprises — marrying my college sweetheart, living in NYC, working in finance, starting a healthcare business with my Dad, taking a trip around the world….if you had asked me at 18 – not a single one of those would have been in my expectations for my twenties. Without a plan for work or really much else, I’m excited to see what adventures my thirties have in store.
You are not going to want to miss any of the next 12 weeks. You are going to be blown away with inspiration. And now you have no excuses not to get started on your Christmas cards. The designers will be using new JustRite Christmas stamps as well as some of the Christmas stamps from 2009.
Wow, Im really honoured to be chosen as a guest designer for
Here is what you need to do to be in the drawing for these SIX prizes:
Any tips on getting through hard times that have worked for you?
scars on your co-worker’s chin from 5 feet away and compare it to the moon landing site. I’m sorry, but that doesn’t seem like a fair pay off to me. If I’m paying a few hundred pound to be tortured, I’d expect a knighthood at least for the ordeal.
On my desk is displayed the different elements I used to create the letters and the art to go along with them. First, I traced letters from a template. Then, I measured and placed each letter in the middle of a box.
LOL! Sorry about that up there. I have no idea what that is for. I am just bored and giving you guys some tips on life!!!! Ohmygosh. GUESS WHAT? Journey 2: The Mysterious Island is already out in theaters and has been for a while. I thought it was gonna come out a lot later. But it is in theaters NOW! I am so gonna go see it this weekend. for shooo. It is the second part to Journey to the Center of the Earth. You have to watch that before you can watch this. You will understand at the end of Journey to the Center of the Earth. It is amazing. I might actually read the book. Nah. Not my kind of book. But my kind of movie for sure.! Yep you got that right home dizzle. JK! I am not gangster. I’m white. (No racism, just letting you know!)
● Immortals: Gods & Heroes (Graphic Novel)
“It’s amazing to see how far this collection has come along in a relatively short period of time,” says Lehner.
Within hours of the dancer's claims becoming public, across America, it was as if a switch had been turned on and people from first Durham and then wider America began en masse to behave like pre-programmed jihadis reacting to a stimulus planted deep within a psyche. It was as if a million secret sleeper cells had awoken to a long promised event and were responding as they had been taught to do.
"It's a very silly story. Don't you know one that tells about bacon and candles? Can't you tell us a good larder story?"
The street did contain one pub, the Eagle and Child, which was situated towards the bottom end of the street, near to Queen Street. By the time it closed in 1906 the Eagle and Child was a Tong’s pub and there is one picture of it in the Bolton Museum collection, taken around 1900, a few years before it closed.
Number three: meditation, meditation, meditation. Which made me happy, because, for quite some time now, I’ve been looking for a legitimate excuse to start. Without anti-depressants, meditation’s my best bet for combating social anxiety. I was always worried, however, people would perceive me as a pretentious, yoga-practicing, frappuccino-sipping, Bench-wearing yuppie. Which, obviously, I’m not. I can’t even fit into most of those jackets. After visiting with Julie, however, I gave myself the green light. Let the battle with my alter ego begin. Ding!
But walking was my answer. Even in this weather!
I'm a bit late with this post, as we are well into January! Better late than never, I guess. I've seen several people utilize this format to do an overview of the year in the life of their family. Most recently I was inspired by my friend, Melanie's recap and decided I needed to jump on the bandwagon. Heaven knows I am so.very.behind in documenting our families adventures that this will help me give ya'll a little something to hold you over until I wade out of my apparent blogging fog.
* The time the bookstore manager suggested I help him set up a Twilight display since I wasn’t exactly contracting writers’ cramp at the book-signing table.
All of the moves are repeated in a second round so this is the lowest and highest of the 2 rounds. I don't like the Dive-Bomber Push-Ups in the beginning and I don't like them in the end. I do them like Marain does them and just go under the fence then push up. I was quite happy with my final round today and am so glad to see the vast improvement. I lost my book from the last two rounds I did and I am sad because I know I have improved since then. Anyways, one down, five strength workouts to go!!
It is thus quite fascinating to see that the above passage states that godliness must be added to patience, for what is godliness? It has nothing to do with being godlike or holier-than-thou, for that is being self-righteous. Godliness means being completely devoted to God and His laws, -- in other words, being a devoted Christian! It requires that you thoroughly understand His Word as recorded and preserved through the ages in the Holy Scriptures.
It's a way to force me to get away from the computer
About a week into the auction the hubs decided we were going to go forward and open a used bookstore. While he and his best bud John did almost all of the renovations to our building, I gathered, sorted, inventoried and shelved over a thousand books for the store. Then we opened. And I averaged about $10 a day in sales. And I forgot that I pretty much hate talking to strangers and trying to get them to buy something. Also turns out I have a mini panic attack when referring books to people I don’t know. So my dream wasn’t quite the reality. Then we got hit with an infestation of earwigs at the beginning of August. The store has been closed since. Which my brain took as a failure. And since my brain was still exhausted from the auction, well, it wasn’t a happy situation.
My previous Blog award acceptance speech, if you’re interested, with seven blog suggestions can be found here: http://frivolousmonsters.wordpress.com/2012/03/05/the-seven-x-seven-blogging-award/
you know what your work out post did for me? - Franzi
Just a simple and essentially worthless yellow rubber bracelet, it’s not exactly something I would choose to wear on a daily basis; however, I will be. The bracelet (pictured below) reads “LesMills for a Fitter Planet” on one side and “YOU LEAD THE CHANGE” on the other. It’s symbolic for me. I worked my butt off to get this bracelet and as a result am in physical (yet rewarding) pain today. This piece of yellow rubber is going to be a daily reminder that I need to focus on my health and my happiness. Only I can truly lead change in my own life, so this bracelet’s motto is a fitting one for me right now.
I forget who sang the song might have been John Denver. I am not having a diamond day anway. I should be grateful for being healthy, having someone to love me etc but sometimes things get you down and they don’t even have to be big things. I am doing a BA online and it’s hopeless. We are up to week 10 of this semester and the lecture notes only go up to week 4. Two of the lectures so far have no audio so they are useless to external students. On the ones that do record the tutor talks to the students who are there but we can’t hear their answers. Then they ask the tutor a question and we can’t hear the question. It’s so frustrating.
Addis Ababa Children - Well Dread Version
Duncan Geach
19. Pretentious Assholes - Willow Brook Warriors
Then the match began. And Barca played what many have called the greatest match in soccer history. 90 minutes later, the demolition was over. Barca had torn Madrid to shreds, crushing them by a score of 5-0. They controlled 67% of the possession and limited Madrid – the world’s most expensive side with it’s greatest manager – to five total shot attempts, only two of which were on goal and only one of which required a save from Valdes. But that doesn’t tell even half the story. The biggest shock of all was the way Barca did it: They did it with tikki takka. They did it playing a modern version of total football.
5. Price-wise, I think it's a great deal! For $79 we got the whole kit, which includes the instruction brochure and a DVD, 2 cans of bond paint (which are taken out and tinted at the paint counter), 1 large bottle of De-Glosser, 1 can of Protectant Finish, scrub pads, Decorative Glaze (we didn't use this option), and even applicators for the Decorative Glaze. I didn't really price it out individually, but from what I can tell we got a great deal and the convenience of it is definitely worth it!
After reading a posting on Penelope's Press, I decided to participate in a little sharing experiment. At the end of each school year, I tend to be very introspective, and a little uptight over how the year turned out. This often leads to some frank discoveries. So, here is a little insight into the less obvious part of me.
What is MinneBar?
My husband and I graduated from the same college, way back in the Paleolithic Era. Each year, we have been dutiful alumni, responding to the college’s annual fund drive by sending in a small check. This year, however, with our son off to college, we are sending all spare change to a different institution and I couldn’t for the life of me come up with a good reason to send any more money to our alma mater. Undeterred by our apparent contribution snub, we’ve received numerous phone calls from perky students and the college has sent letters and emails detailing the importance of each and every contribution. We’ve ignored them all. Yesterday they tried a new tactic, sending us a baseball cap with the school name on the front and “proud alumni” stitched on the back (along with a convenient return envelope for our belated contribution). Something for nothing.
read on!
Playing games of arachnid
It is enough that I have to remember to say "Bathers" instead of "Swimmers"or "togs". The kids no longer take a "kit bag" to school to carry their sports gear; they take a plain old "sports bag". And sports gear is called sports gear, not kit. But perhaps that was peculiar to their schools, rather than a general term.
So, I think, I’ll work on my heat training. Into my hot car I dive, close the door quickly, leaving the windows rolled. Must.keep.the.heat.in. Who needs a gym membership? I have my very own moving sauna. Originally, I planned on driving the 20 minutes home all cooped up, until visions of me passing out from a heat overdose on the 4 lane highway made me chicken out. This, my friends, is why my sister, and not I, is the ultramarathoner!
Follow my blog 1 bonus entry
I go running over to her and introduce myself. "Hi, Mom. I'm Andrea." She snaps at me, "I know who you are," but by her conversation, I know she has no idea. I go ahead and introduce her to my BFF, even though they met a couple of times a few years ago. BFF is wiping tears away, because she has heard about the degeneration, but can't believe it.
documentation and procedures and sophisticated tools that are embedded in the customers’ SAP Solution Manager environment.
Certainly that's the very least we can do for our Heroes.
And the Holocaust Memorial day can remind us of what genocide really means.
The film has had other titles over the years -- Island of Death, Death is Child's Play, Lucifer's Curse, Los Niños, etc. -- but Who Can Kill a Child? is apparently the original one, and is the one used on the 2007 DVD from Dark Sky Films, the edition I watched. It's provocative, but it's also perfectly accurate for the movie.
For me, it’s usually the opposite. I’m suspicious of hype. I did not read the Harry Potter books for years because I figured a book everyone was making such a fuss over was probably lowbrow (I’m an intellectual snob).
Miss Anything? walking up to the winery and doing wine tasting with Josh, my favorite navy blue dress pants, and training for/running a Spring half marathon
"And UKIP is, for all its faults, the biggest of the freedom loving, democracy loving, independent minded parties. And I don’t like this splitting off, which is very prone to happen in those smaller parties precisely because you have to be independent minded to start with. And this makes everyone willing to fight and go their own way."
Tune in for part two tomorrow!
I guess I'd appreciate this whole set-up if I hadn't already seen it a bazillion times already. The Slob Comedy has gone through so many permutations and also-rans that by the time National Lampoon's Animal House came out, we were already more-than-familiar with the routine.
Sometimes, a girl just needs her Mama.
Professional track is a business, and talented athletes are going to run where the money is best. So if the sport is truly interested in creating more excitement and finding the next Bolt / Gay rivalry, the 400 sits there waiting! Can you imagine a 9.9x/10.0x sprinter seriously making a move up to the 400? Perhaps something akin to what we've seen in the past when the right athlete finds the right event, such as 46.78 in the 400H, 1:41.11 in the 800, or 9.58 in the 100? Maybe something in the 42.50 range?
Another reason why the 53% label flopped is that it reveals the limits of this conservative model. The 53% is linked to an implicit call to raise taxes on the 47% so that they have some “skin in the game.” In previous years, conservatives were able to elide the tension between their desire for tax cuts and America’s undying love for social insurance – now they’re trapped because they’ve run out of discretionary spending to cut and their Tea Party base relies on Social Security and Medicare benefits.
So, what have you liked? Not liked? Please tell! I would love to hear what you'd like to see more or less of, and will try to please and come up with new ways of getting to the second year.
Simply not doing things without knowing why and without detachment can be laziness or foolishness.. it is not a way to realize God. For anyone in this world, who is not yet a realized soul.. ie who still has some vestiges of ignorance or agnyAna, “doing” is superior to “not doing”. This means that you have to follow the vaidika karma as well as your loukika karma ie your vedic as well as your worldly duties.
- attacked Singapore
At first, the talks did seem (as I had expected) to deal with global issues in both the literal and figurative sense. Soon, however, the talk turned to the situation at the College, which I found much more interesting. Hampshire College may be an "alternative" (or as we prefer: "experimenting") educational institution, but it is also an elite and extremely expensive one: combined cost of tuition, room, and board (or TRB, as the administrators call it) is over $ 53,000 per year. One wondered how students at such an institution (even if 83 percent of them do receive financial aid) would view their own situation.
Oh boy, this is going to be a short one. I’ll admit, the Facebook game Rollercoaster Mania intrigued me. I was a huge fan of the PC game Rollercoaster Tycoon, so I decided to give this one a shot. I’ve also been checking out many of the games put out on Facebook by this company, 6waves. They sure made this review quick, and not in a good way.
However, there's plenty I shall be glad to leave behind. The careerism of professional politicians with their weasel words. Reality TV shows and "talent shows" and Simon Cowell and Jordan (aka Katie Price) and "The Sun" newspaper and people rushing their lives away and tattoos. And I won't miss our monstrous supermarkets and our crowded motorways or graffiti or litter or clusters of people standing outside public buildings like lepers under clouds of blue grey tobacco smoke. Nor shall I miss taxi drivers or potholes in the road, drivers on mobile phones, dog dirt on verges or unsolicited calls from money hungry call centres. No I won't miss any of that.
L - Lost cast member, Hurley, is the cover art for their album Hurley.
Lower heat to sauté
We will also be hooking you up with a pair of meet and greet passes to meet Mat Kearney!
I have neglected this blog a lot. I promised to note when I finished my cardio-cath in the hospital to let folks know I am still alive. I AM. Our cardiologist said that he was surprised and please that all the grafts from my 12 year old bypass are holding fine and that the “anomalies” that were noticed after my last stress test are just that, anomalies. Thanks, I think, to acupuncture and some energetic water aerobics I am feeling better than I have felt in two or three years.
The “Other” side as some of you have pre-ceived it to be and some even call it the “dark” side or oppositional side may it be. See these “movements” in a challenge, strife, war move…etc…. by this you are playing into THEIR HANDS, ringing the bell of truth to their feelings or views. They then feel they need MORE control of you and your movements! You see Chelas, you are playing as I say into the hands of the “Dragon” Which I compare to “FIRE” energy.
Marie Spear: “To my surprise, I found that I had to stop myself from reading into all the different tropes and traits we have looked at class while watching The Avengers so that I could focus on the fun happening onscreen. I like how the director was able to bring in heavy undertones like god vs. science, such as with Thor, or the struggle of dual identities, and still have the movie be a ton of fun. My only criticism is that it is a little too long.”
Weekly Points Remaining: 49
I’ll look forward to sharing some of my favorite poses and yoga tips with you as we gather here under the Pink Moon. It’s going to be a delightful journey. Namaste.
Day 3 of Question week is here. If you want to participate and answer the questions on your blog just copy them and leave me a comment that you joined along. Tell your friends :)
Dreams have been studied throughout history, and dream interpretation has tried to make sense of these nighttime visitations for as long as their have been people to dream. People who could interpret dreams, and those whose dreams were particularly vivid, where often thought to be imbued with divine powers, and they were given a special place in their societies.
“Honor your father and your mother”
left for church. My sister and I
Meeting at strategic gathering locations, activists and weed-smokers hit the pavement and march through the city streets, leaving stunned passer-bys and, in many cities, a large cloud of aromatic marijuana smoke.
T Cells are infected with XMRV in CFS patients . Activated T cells ramp up CD5. Now put this all together and what do you get? .....
Driver: Fernando Alonso
A few days later, I was able to visit the city. The destruction was unbelievable. Pictures and video did not do justice to the actual scene. A big swath of the city looked like a war zone, complete with disturbing images of survivors and volunteers combing through the wreckage. For me, the most lasting image of the storm was seeing a medium sized tree that had it’s bark completely sucked off of it’s trunk and limbs. What kind of a storm could do such damage? It was unbelievable.
“The Night of the Undead” is the seemingly prerequisite foray into voodoo/occultism that any long running show in the late ’60’s/early ’70’s had to do. It is a bit of a mess that is saved by some genuinely scary elements by the television standards of the time.
People can (and will) argue as to whether the impact was significant and whether it will mean anything at all in the medium to long term as far as the game economy goes.
When our husbands went to the Nevada side of the lake one day for guy activities, we wives shopped for food and other supplies. Mrs. C found some blue champagne glasses at a thrift store, from which we drank wine the next evening out in the back yard. I sat in a comfy camp chair that laid my head back such that this was my view, of a pine-rimmed sky.
All the UN can do is pass decrees and sternly worded letters to the civilized countries (who are paying the bulk of the rent) about made-up problems while cow-towing to Islamic extremists and watching countries tear themselves apart with not even being able to yell "STOP IT!"
Australian billionaire Clive Palmer is going to build a 21st-century replica of the Titanic with his pile. He plans to sail it from England to New York – accompanied by the Chinese navy - some time late in 2016, once a Chinese dockyard has built it for him.
Group Lotus has continued to be a major drag on Proton’s earnings after the national carmaker recently posted a steep drop in net profit for a second consecutive quarter.
all the one tree hill memorabilia i can get my hands on.
